FINAL PERFORMANCE EVALUATION OF THE 
LIVESTOCK FOR GROWTH (L4G) ACTIVITY 
IN MALI 
May 15, 2020 

 

 

 

 

Prepared for the United States Agency for International Development under USAID Contract Number: 
AID-OAA-TO-16-00008 

Submitted to: 
USAID/Mali 
Ousmane Samake 
osamake@usaid.gov 

and 

USAID/Bureau for Food Security  
Lesley Perlman 
lperlman@usaid.gov 

Submitted by: 
Philip Boyle, Team Leader 
Embry Howell, Senior Evaluation Specialist 
Almouzar Maiga, Livestock Specialist 
Aliou Badara Samake, Evaluation Specialist 
Jessica Payton, Research Assistant 

Contractor:  
Program Evaluation for Effectiveness and Learning (PEEL) 
ME&A 
1020 19th Street NW, Suite 875 
Washington, DC 20036 
Tel: 240-762-6296 

Cover Photo: Agricultural Specialist, Dr. Almouzar Mohaly Maïga, with his arm around the village chief 
of Tété, Andè Poudiougou by Aliou Maïga. 

DISCLAIMER 
The authors’ views expressed in this publication do not necessarily reflect the views of the United States 
Agency for International Development or the United States Government. 
 

 

 

ABSTRACT 

The Livestock for Growth (L4G) activity aimed to promote inclusive competitive economic growth of the 
livestock value chain in Mali, defined as small ruminants and cattle, by strengthening support services and 
improving access to information and technology. The L4G performance evaluation sought to assess activity 
progress and to inform the design of future activities under the Global Food Security Strategy country 
plan. 
L4G successfully installed the Private Proximity Veterinary Service (SVPP) program in Koro and Bankass 
circles  of  Mopti  region  but  was  unable  to  install  it  in  other  circles  of  Mopti.  The  network  of  SVPP 
veterinarians  and  veterinarian  auxiliaries  (VAs)  offered  an  accessible,  rapid,  and  affordable  range  of 
veterinary services, including vaccination, deworming, and disease treatment. High attrition rates, low VA 
capacity, and the failure to involve local stakeholders, however, hindered the SVPP’s operations. 
Fattening techniques taught in farmer field schools (FFSs) effectively increased farmers’ knowledge and 
practice in fattening techniques and in increasing their productivity, sales, and income from animal raising. 
The cascade training model used for the FFSs, however, did not achieve the outreach envisioned and was 
hampered  by  the  lack  of  financial  resources  and  local  participation.  While  beneficiaries  could  cite 
theoretical and practical benefits of co-locating the SVPP and FFSs, none could identify actual examples in 
practice. 
L4G water point interventions improved water access and decreased wait times and transaction costs for 
residents in villages served by these water points. Overall, water point governance works well, and water 
point committees continue to function in their designated roles. 
 

 

 

TABLE OF CONTENTS 

3.0 

2.0 

1.0 

EXECUTIVE SUMMARY ................................................................................................................................................... i 
Evaluation Purpose .............................................................................................................................................. i 
Activity Background ............................................................................................................................................ i 
Evaluation Methods ............................................................................................................................................. i 
Key Findings, Conclusions, and Recommendations ..................................................................................... i 
EVALUATION PURPOSE AND QUESTIONS ........................................................................................... 1 
1.1  Evaluation Purpose and Audience .......................................................................................................... 1 
1.2  Evaluation Questions ................................................................................................................................. 1 
ACTIVITY BACKGROUND ........................................................................................................................... 1 
2.1  Activity Description ................................................................................................................................... 1 
2.2  Approach and Implementation ................................................................................................................ 2 
EVALUATION METHODS AND LIMITATIONS ...................................................................................... 3 
3.1  Evaluation Methods .................................................................................................................................... 3 
3.2  Methodological Limitations ...................................................................................................................... 6 
FINDINGS, CONCLUSIONS, AND RECOMMENDATIONS ............................................................... 6 
4.1  Evaluation Question 1 ............................................................................................................................... 6 
4.2  Evaluation Question 2 ............................................................................................................................. 19 
4.3  Evaluation Questions 3 and 4 ................................................................................................................ 28 
ANNEXES ......................................................................................................................................................................... 34 
Annex 1: Expression of Interest .................................................................................................................... 35 
Annex 2: Fieldwork Schedule of Focus Group Discussions and Key Informant Interviews........... 52 
Annex 3: Focus Group Discussion and Key Informant Interview Guides .......................................... 53 
Annex 4: List of Documents Reviewed ....................................................................................................... 59 
Annex 5: Disclosure of Conflicts of Interest ............................................................................................. 60 

4.0 

 

 

 

Table 9: Reports from FGDs with 11 POs Concerning Increased Prices for Sales of Fattened Animals 

LIST OF FIGURES AND TABLES 

Figure 1: Map of Mali Showing L4G Intervention Locations.................................................................................... 2 
Table 1: Farmer FGD Participants by Gender, Co-Location, Region, and District ........................................... 4 
Table 2: List of Interviewees for L4G Evaluation ....................................................................................................... 5 
Table 3: Number of Vaccinated Animals Under L4G, 2015-2017 ......................................................................... 7 
Table 4: Positive Impressions of SVPP and VA Services Mentioned by FGD Participants ............................. 11 
Table 5: Challenges to Full Vaccination Mentioned by FGD Participants .......................................................... 12 
Table 6: Presence of Veterinary Auxiliaries in Bankass and Koro Circles under L4G ................................... 15 
Table 8: Prices for Cattle and Sheep Entering and Leaving Fattening Cycles (2019) ...................................... 24 
After L4G FFS Training .................................................................................................................................. 24 
Table 10: Percent of Livestock Holders Making More From Sales After L4G ................................................. 24 
Table 11: Did L4G Make a Difference in the Hunger Period? .............................................................................. 25 
Table 12: L4G Baseline and Annual Indicator Values .............................................................................................. 25 
and 2017) .......................................................................................................................................................... 29 
Photo 1: Focus group with a women’s producer organization in Koro. .............................................................. 3 
Photo 2: A typical water point in Mali. ....................................................................................................................... 28 

LIST OF PHOTOS 

Table 13: Most Severe Livelihood Shocks for Livestock Owners in the L4G Implementation Area  (2014 

Table 14: Characteristics of Water Points and Water Point Committees ....................................................... 30 

 

 

 

ACRONYMS 

Acronym  Description 
AEG 
APIFIMA 
CFAF 
DRPIA 
EQ 
FFS 
FGD 
FTF 
FY 
GFSS 
GOM 
IFP 
ILRI 
IP 
IR 
KII 
L4G 
LCV 
LSMS 
MLNB 
NAIP 
NGO 
PEEL 
PO 
RFS 
SLPIA 
SVPP 
TOT 
U.S. 
USAID 
VA 
ZOI 

Agriculture and Economic Growth Office (USAID/Mali) 
Association of Professionals in Financial Intermediation of Mali 
Confédération Financière Africaine Francs 
Regional Directorate for Animal Production and Industries 
Evaluation Question 
Farmer Field School 
Focus Group Discussion 
Feed the Future 
Fiscal Year 
Global Food Security Strategy 
Government of Mali 
Institute for Professional Training 
International Livestock Research Institute 
Implementing Partner 
Intermediate Result 
Key Informant Interview 
Livestock for Growth 
Laboratoire Central Vétérinaire 
Living Standards Measurements Study 
Multi-Nutritional Licking Blocks 
National Agricultural Investment Plan 
Non-Governmental Organization 
Program Evaluation for Effectiveness and Learning 
Producer Organization 
Bureau for Resilience and Food Security 
Local Service for Animal Production and Industries 
Private Proximity Veterinary Service 
Training of Trainers 
United States 
United States Agency for International Development 
Veterinary Auxiliary 
Zone of Influence 

 

 

EXECUTIVE SUMMARY 

EVALUATION PURPOSE 
This evaluation represents the final performance evaluation of the Livestock for Growth (L4G) activity, 
one of two flagship activities (L4G and Cereal Value Chain) of the United States Agency for International 
Development Mali (USAID/Mali) Agriculture and Economic Growth (AEG) Office. The purpose of the 
evaluation is to assess activity progress in the livestock sector and inform the design of future activities 
under the Global Food Security Strategy (GFSS) country plan. 
ACTIVITY BACKGROUND 
L4G’s  goal  is  to  promote  inclusive  competitive  economic  growth  of  the  livestock  value  chain  in  Mali, 
defined as small ruminants and cattle. L4G was designed to increase the output of the livestock value chain 
by strengthening support services and improving access to information and technology. L4G also sought 
to build the resilience of poorer livestock households through developing the skills necessary to participate 
in commercial activities, livestock production, and sales, or in related service industries (e.g., fodder). L4G 
worked in the Mopti and Timbuktu regions within the Feed the Future Zone of Influence (ZOI). At end 
of activity, the activity was located in three circles (districts) of the Timbuktu region (Diré, Niafunké, and 
Goundam) and five of the Mopti circles (Bankass, Koro, Mopti, Bandiagara, and Djenné). 
EVALUATION METHODS 
This  evaluation  employed  primarily  qualitative  data  collection  and  analysis  methods.  Primary  data 
collection  consisted  of  18  focus  group  discussions  (FGDs)  and  18  key  informant  interviews  (KIIs) 
implemented over a four-week period during October-November 2019 with members of farmer producer 
organizations  (POs),  private  veterinarians,  veterinary  auxiliaries  (VAs),  local  government  officials,  and 
former L4G field staff in the Koro, Bankass, Bandiagara, Mopti, and Djenné circles in the Mopti region and 
in the Diré, Goundam, and Niafunké circles in the Timbuktu region. Both FGDs and KIIs were recorded, 
after which full transcriptions were made for use in analysis using the qualitative data analysis program 
NVivo. Evaluators also extracted summary quantitative data from reports, primarily for background and 
descriptive purposes. 
KEY FINDINGS, CONCLUSIONS, AND RECOMMENDATIONS 
Evaluation Question (EQ) 1: To what extent do the trained auxiliaries continue to engage in 
activities that improve animal health in their villages? Are vaccines available in the villages 
of auxiliaries trained by SVPPs? 
FINDINGS 
The SVPP Program 
Vaccination rates in the L4G implementation area are low due in large part to a lack of human resources 
and material resources (vaccines, vehicles, cold storage) to conduct annual vaccination campaigns. In 2015, 
livestock  and  small  ruminant  owners  in  Bankass  and  Koro  circles  vaccinated  only  21  percent  of  their 
953,512 cattle and 2 percent of their 2,385,376 small ruminants. In response, L4G launched the Services 
Vétérinaires  Privés  de  Proximité  (Private  Proximity  Veterinary  Services,  or  SVPP)  program  in  September 
2015. Under SVPP, L4G trained six private vets and 76 VAs (L4G Final Report count) to improve their 
technical and service delivery skills. SVPPs and VAs vaccinated cattle and small ruminants against local 
diseases, launched deworming efforts, and treated other diseases. L4G reinforced SVPP skills in the use 
of vaccines, proper disposal of needles and glass vaccine containers, and procedures to ensure compliance 
with maintaining the cold chain for live vaccines. L4G also supplied SVPP vets with vaccines on credit 
during campaigns, as well as veterinarian starter kits consisting of furniture, refrigerators, freezers, air 
stabilizers, syringe guns, thermometers, needles, stethoscopes, stoves, and surgical gloves. In Fiscal Year 

 

i 

(FY) 2017, SVPPs reported vaccinating 459,452 cattle, sheep, and goats, for a combined profit of over 43 
million CFAF ($86,162), a large increase over FY 2016. In FY 2018, the three SVPPs reported vaccinating 
171,591 cattle and 115,734 sheep and goats for a combined total of 287,325 animals representing a drop 
of 37.5 percent due to the growing insecurity. Between 2016 and 2018, an average of 22 percent of animals 
were vaccinated, compared to 8 percent in 2014. During FY 2017, L4G expanded the SVPP model into 
four new zones: one in Bandiagara circle, one in Mopti circle, and two in Djenné circle. 
During L4G’s last two years, vaccination campaigns were severely hampered by insecurity in Mopti and 
Timbuktu, which prevented SVPPs and VAs from conducting their vaccination and deworming activities. 
In FY 2019, the number of animals vaccinated was only 63,294, a drop of 78 percent from FY 2018. (The 
FY 2019 Annual Report did not distinguish vaccinations by animal type.) According to L4G, 98 percent of 
the animals actually vaccinated by L4G were vaccinated during the first half of FY 2019 (through March 
31, 2019), and by June none of the SVPP vets or VAs operated outside the main city centers. In its last 
implementation  year  (FY  2019),  the  three  SVPP  private  veterinarians  (one  in  Koro  circle  and  two  in 
Bankass circle) and 76 VAs (49 in Bankass and 27 in Koro) remained functional. From five to 15 VAs 
supported each SVPP vet. 
Continued SVPP Vet and VA Presence in Villages and Their Roles 
FGD participants in the Bankass and Koro circles acknowledged the continued presence of SVPP vets and 
VAs in their village or in nearby villages. The SVPP vets come to their villages once or twice a year during 
vaccination  campaigns.  Outside  of  these  campaigns,  vaccinations  and  treatment  of  sick  animals  in  the 
villages fall to the VAs. VAs also provide other treatments for  sick animals,  including deworming, and 
advisory services, often going door-to-door to dispense advice or raise awareness. 
PO members have overwhelmingly positive perceptions of VAs. Nonetheless, it was widely noted in both 
FGDs and KIIs that the VAs never functioned at full strength, and there was a significant attrition rate 
among VAs. VAs and SVPP veterinarians interviewed reported only 23 active VAs of 76 originally trained 
by  L4G  operating  in  the  Bankass  and  Koro  activity  intervention  areas.  According  to  multiple  key 
informants, this attrition rate was due in large part to a non-participatory VA selection process that did 
not involve the SVPP vets or the state veterinary service. 
The development of the SVPP program in Timbuktu lagged significantly behind Mopti. FGD participants in 
the Niafunké, Goundam, and Diré circles reported that there are no private vets or VAs operating there. 
While state vets exist in the Niafunké and Goundam circle villages of Tonka and Sibonne, there are no 
vets of any kind operating in the Diré villages of Tindirma and Bourem Sidi Amar. 
SVPP and VA Vaccination and Treatment Activities 
As reported by FGD participants, annual or biannual vaccination campaigns normally occur in all villages 
visited in the Mopti region and in two of the three circles visited in Timbuktu (with the apparent exception 
of  Diré).  The  most  frequent  vaccinations  are  for  peri-pneumonia  and  for  livestock  with  diarrhea 
symptoms, but farmers also vaccinate commonly for foot-and-mouth disease, colds, and pasteurollosis. 
FGD and KII participants claimed that vaccination rates have risen notably in recent years, and there has 
been  a  corresponding  decrease  in  livestock  morbidity  and  mortality,  although  they  did  not  provide 
quantitative estimates for these claims. (All claims of improved animal health provided by FGD and KII 
participants were self-reported and not verified by independent sources.) Key informants cited the L4G 
SVPP program as an important contributor to these outcomes. 
POs indicated that L4G incentivized their members to take vaccinations more seriously. In the past, PO 
members vaccinated at most one-half of their animals, both to keep down the cost and avoid paying taxes, 
but now claim to be vaccinating close to 100 percent. Public officials believe the SVPP program can be 
sustained; however, they say the number of trained and active VAs is too low and there are not enough 
SVPP vets or state agents to supervise them or provide them needed ongoing training, 

 

ii 

Availability and Cost of Vaccines 
No POs or other activity stakeholders indicated problems with the vaccine availability. While vaccines are 
always  available  for  purchase  in  the  cities,  the  main  impediment  to  their  use  is  their  cost  (cash  and 
transportation). Because of the cost barrier, in some cases, animals are not vaccinated until they appear 
sick.  During  vaccination  campaigns,  the  state  subsidizes  the  vaccine  cost,  and  key  informants  cite 
vaccination prices ranging from 125 to 225 CFAF for cattle, approximately 100 CFAF for small ruminants 
and poultry, and 200 CFAF for sheep. Outside of the vaccination campaigns, the prices range from 200 to 
1,000 CFAF for cattle and from 100 to 200 CFAF for small ruminants. In addition to the cost of the 
vaccines, farmers pay the VA a labor charge. Labor charges are negotiated between the VA and the farmer. 
Positive Impressions of SVPP/VA Activities 
The SVPP activity was favorably perceived by all stakeholders. POs indicated that the VAs respond rapidly 
when called, if they are able to. Before the VAs, farmers’ only options were to call private vets or state 
technical  agents,  which  were  often  unavailable  or  otherwise  unable  to  provide  prompt  service.  State 
veterinary agents are not numerous enough to cover the entire circle, thus the addition of SVPP vets and 
VAs has materially increased vet resources in the villages. 
PO members claimed to be more aware of the need for vaccination, in part due to the influence of L4G. 
PO members and other activity stakeholders have all observed an improvement in animal health, due in 
part  to  L4G.  Although  they  were  unable  to  offer  precise  estimates  of  improved  animal  health,  they 
indicated that the losses experienced in the past were significantly reduced. During 2019, however, FGD 
participants  indicated  that  vaccination  rates  and  herd  health  declined  with  the  disruption  in  the  SVPP 
program and vaccination campaigns due to worsening insecurity in the regions. 
Challenges to Achieving Full Vaccination 
The primary challenge to achieving full vaccination rates is the insecurity from violent extremism and inter-
community conflict in Mopti and Timbuktu. Farmers are afraid of grouping their animals in vaccination 
parks for vaccination campaigns. Many villages are now inaccessible to vets or VAs because of insecurity. 
Insecurity has also helped give rise to suspicion and lack of trust between farmers and vaccinators making 
private and state vaccinators’ access to farmers difficult. Some herders have sold their animals to avoid 
being robbed. A second barrier to full vaccination is cost. For example, one dose alone for foot-and-mouth 
disease can cost as much as 1,000 CFAF. To avoid paying these costs, stock raisers may vaccinate only a 
portion (for example, 60 percent) of their animals, believing that this will be sufficient to protect the rest 
of the herd. Because people are not vaccinating completely, other diseases have sprung up that were rare 
before. 
The lack of access to credit for SVPP vets is another challenge. The SVPP vets reported that L4G never 
followed up on its plans to link the vets to sources of credit to finance vaccination campaigns. L4G did, 
however,  organize  two  days  of  “Café-Finance”  meetings  in  November  2018  in  which  banks  and 
microfinance institutions (MFIs) met with POs and presented their financial products. There also remains 
a lack of awareness of the value of vaccinations and vaccination practices, in part a function of the lack of 
transportation and social isolation experienced by many farming households. As a result, farmers may not 
follow the correct order of vaccination or may only vaccinate part of their herd to avoid paying taxes. 
The availability and conservation of veterinary products and equipment among VAs is another challenge. 
The  lack  of  cold  chain  equipment  for  vaccine  storage  and  solar  panels  to  power  this  equipment  is 
particularly notable given that VAs must travel long distances (up to 160 kilometers) to obtain vaccines. 
Another challenge is the continuing lack of resources to maintain the SVVP program. The number of SVPP 
vets and VAs remains low and needs to be increased. At L4G’s end, there were three L4G-trained SVPP 
vets and 23 VAs working in the Koro and Bankass circles in Mopti. The limited number of SVPP vets 
restricts the coverage of the SVPP program, and the degree to which they can supervise the services 
delivered by VAs, a problem made more relevant by the lack of capacity to carry out vaccinations and 

 

iii 

treat animals among many of the VAs. This was noted by the SVPP veterinarians from the beginning.  While 
state veterinary agents continue to work in the field, they are inadequate to address the needs in the 
system and what the L4G SVPP program sought to supplement in the first place. 
A final challenge to full vaccination was that L4G failed to implement a participatory process to select VAs 
and, as a result, put unqualified VAs in the field. The lack of qualifications of many VAs was attested to by 
the two SVPP veterinarians and multiple local government officials interviewed. (This was never indicated 
as  an  issue  by  DT  Global,  nor  did  it  provide  any  explanation  for  this  practice.)  Selection  of  VAs  was 
determined in many cases based on local political considerations, not training or technical capacity, and 
without consulting government officials with responsibility over veterinarian services or the SVPP vets. 
Key informants further noted that the tripartite partnership (ostensibly put in place by L4G to oversee 
the SVPP in a participatory manner by L4G, local officials, and SVPP vets) never functioned as intended. 
Government officials and veterinary service officers, moreover, claimed that L4G neglected to coordinate 
with them during activity implementation. 
CONCLUSIONS 
•  The L4G activity successfully installed the SVPP program in the Koro and Bankass circles of the Mopti 
region that involved three accredited private veterinarians and 76 VAs. Despite intentions to expand 
the activity to other circles of Mopti region, L4G was unable to do so by activity end. 

•  The network of VAs was greatly appreciated, easy to access, rapid in response, and affordable. VAs 
provided all vet services, including vaccination, deworming, disease treatment, and advisory services. 
•  L4G allowed local politicians to select their favored and, according to SVPPs and local government 
officials interviewed, at times unqualified VA candidates, some of which never functioned. SVPPs and 
VAs interviewed further claimed that by the activity’s end, only 23 of the 76 VAs trained by L4G 
remained active. 

•  The low number of SVPP vets and qualified VAs, together with the lack of expansion to other areas, 
limit the overall vaccination and animal care coverage of the SVPP program and was an impediment 
to  the  long-term  sustainability  of  the  considerable  improvements  in  veterinary  care  and  coverage 
achieved by L4G. 

•  Despite equipping the SVPP vets with veterinary starter kits and financing for the first two vaccination 
campaigns, L4G was not able to link the vets with bank credit lines for succeeding campaigns. The 
cessation of most bank lending in the Mopti region due to insecurity is probably the major reason for 
this, but L4G failed to come up with an alternative credit mechanism. 

•  There is no shortage of vaccines, and the SVPP vets have cold storage in their offices; however, the 
VAs’ ability to store vaccines is limited. There are ongoing challenges to ensuring that SVPP vets and 
VAs  have  the  cold  storage  equipment  necessary  to  provide  quality  services  and  prevent  vaccine 
spoilage. 

•  The biggest challenge to full vaccination coverage is the insecurity in Mopti and Timbuktu. SVPP vets 
and VAs are hampered in their ability to reach insecure or isolated villages, herders are afraid to mass 
their animals at vaccination parks, and many herders sold off animals or took them south to more 
secure areas. 

•  L4G  failed  to  collaborate  closely  with  state  regional  and  circle  veterinary  officials.  While  these 
stakeholders acknowledge the value of L4G, they feel L4G should have involved them more in activity 
interventions  and  coordination  on  the  ground.  Moreover,  they  have  serious  concerns  about 
supervision of the SVPP vets and VAs and quality control of vaccines and disease treatment. 

•  The L4G SVPP model is viable and appreciated by beneficiaries, but it requires financial resources to 

continue at its current level, let alone expand into new areas. This implies further donor funding. 

 

iv 

RECOMMENDATIONS 
•  USAID should consider household stock raising and animal fattening as important components of any 

future livestock production activities, particularly in Mopti and Timbuktu. 

•  Future livestock activities should support private vets and VAs by equipping new nearby supply points 
with refrigerators, freezers, medicines, and thermo-tolerant vaccines.  Maintaining the cold chain is 
essential to sustaining private and public veterinary care and vaccination campaigns in Mali. 

•  USAID should consider prioritizing credit linkages between vets and banks in future livestock activities. 
Private vets need finance for their vaccination campaigns and under normal conditions can repay bank 
loans. Given declining security conditions, alternative credit sources should be explored, particularly 
non-governmental organizations (NGOs). 

•  With  its  experience  in  financial  intermediation,  the  Association  of  Professionals  in  Financial 
Intermediation of Mali (APIFIMA) could be called upon to develop loan applications for private vets 
and provide advice in reimbursement. 

•  VAs should be assisted with start-up funds to acquire their first stock of supplies and transportation. 
•  Future  livestock  activities  should  increase  the  involvement  of  state  veterinary  services.  Closer 
collaboration with state services and a less-abrupt phase-out of USAID funded activities could improve 
sustainability of the system.  The state veterinary services should be involved in the selection of VAs 
to avoid favoritism and political interference in their selection and to respect essential qualifications 
for these positions. 

EQ 2: From the beneficiaries’ perspective, did their access to the co-located introduction of 
new fattening technologies and vaccination programming improve beneficiary productivity, 
access to markets, and incomes? How did the co-location contribute to the improvements? 
FINDINGS 
L4G sought to improve fodder and feed for livestock by identifying the best practices already in place in 
Mali and then introducing them in the activity intervention areas of the Koro and Bankass circles. One 
approach  L4G  took  was  helping  animal  fatteners  cut  costs  by  producing  their  own  forage  and  feed, 
enriching  hay  with  urea,  and  learning  farm  silage  production.  In  the  L4G  animal  fattening  training, 
participants learned the basic norms and standards for market delivery, buyer preferences and exigencies, 
and innovative marketing plans to sell their animals at peak price periods. One goal was to ensure that 
improved fattening activities were co-located with increased access to veterinary services, through the 
SVPP activities. In April 2016, L4G expanded into seven communes in the Mopti region and six communes 
in the Timbuktu region. While this expansion included improving animal fattening activities, it does not 
appear that expanded veterinary services through the SVPP model were successfully implanted in these 
new areas in either region. 
In  the  third  year  of  L4G  activity  (FY  2017),  L4G  established  Farmer  Field  Schools  (FFS),  which  used 
community-based lead farmers as trainers of neighboring farmers. The FY 2017 Annual Report indicates 
that L4G established 37 FFS demonstration sites, with each L4G field agent responsible for mentoring and 
monitoring  the  activities  of  two  to  three  sites.  There  were  18  FFS  sites  for  demonstrating  forage 
production  and  19  FFS  sites  for  demonstrating  best  practices  for  animal  fattening.  In  FY  2018,  L4G 
reported collaboration with 529 POs to establish 45 new FFS animal fattening demonstration sites in Mopti 
circles and 10 in Timbuktu circles. This same year L4G reported training 650 lead farmers at these 45 FFS 
animal  fattening  demonstrations  who  in  turn  taught  the  techniques  learned  to  590  POs  with  31,912 
member farmers (20,987 women and 11,065 men). 
Finally,  during  FY  2019  L4G  reported  creating  an  additional  69  FFS  sites,  including  28  sites  for  cattle 
fattening in Mopti region, five sites for cattle fattening in Timbuktu region, 28 sites for sheep fattening in 
Mopti, and eight sites for sheep fattening in Timbuktu. In addition, L4G conducted information campaigns 
by radio and mobile phone and continued to promote the cultivation of dual-use fodder crops such as 

 

v 

cowpea, groundnut, sorghum, millet, and moringa. In theory, each lead farmer was to train at least 25 
others  who  would  in  turn  train  another  25  animal  fatteners.  Because  of  insecurity  and  resulting 
governmental  restrictions  on  motorcycle  movement,  however,  the  actual  number  of  participants 
decreased to about 32,000 from the original target of 101,000. 
Animal Fattening Training in Farmer Field Schools 
All PO members included in the 18 FGDs, both in co-located and non-co-located circles, had participated 
in the FFSs. All POs had practiced fattening before L4G but claimed to have learned new techniques from 
the FFSs; and the basic fattening techniques taught in the FFSs were recalled by the members of all 18 
POs. Normally, a few members of each PO (usually two) attended the FFS and were then expected to 
pass  on  the  training  to  their  PO  members  and  others  in  their  own  and  surrounding  villages.  Formal 
extension of this training to at least a first group of 25 more persons was the objective, but this cascade 
training appears to have fallen short of expectations for lack of per diems and difficulty of travel. It was 
probably known to these leaders that no per diem was forthcoming, but they hoped for better turnout in 
any case. Nevertheless, extension of these teachings seems to have occurred among PO members, since 
all FGD participants revealed solid knowledge of the full set of new techniques. PO members in non-co-
located POs demonstrated a similar recall and understanding of the concepts taught in the FFSs as those 
in Koro and Bankass. 
Responses indicated a high degree of satisfaction with the business knowledge gained from the training, in 
addition to the specific new fattening techniques acquired. PO members recognized that they had not 
been  doing  fattening  efficiently  in  the  past.  Nor  did  they  previously  have  a  method  for  tracking  and 
calculating costs and gross profit margin for their animals. Other stakeholders—including local government 
officials, SVPP vets, VAs, and former L4G field agents—universally expressed positive perceptions of the 
FFSs and the value of the fattening techniques taught there. 
Issues with the Cascade Training Model 
PO members identified several ways in which FFSs might be improved, including offering more training of 
the same type closer to more villages, involving more people in the training, and extending the length of 
the training in each case. These recommendations do not account for L4G’s cascading strategy, which 
would presumably extend the geographic coverage of training. At the same time, involving more people 
in FFS training addresses the risk of knowledge loss if those people trained at FFSs either do not fulfill 
their cascading role or are unable to grasp the fattening techniques well enough to communicate them to 
others. In other words, the number initially trained would be much greater with better retention and the 
need for subsequent cascade training reduced. Another issue raised across FGDs and KIIs was that the 
per diem for the FFS training and the lack of a per diem for the cascading of training were regarded as 
“entirely  inadequate.”  This  issue  clearly  limited  the  educational  reach  of  the  planned  cascade  training. 
According to PO members, the plan for cascading training fell well short of its intended reach, although 
they  could  not  provide  specific  numbers.  PO  members  attending  the  FFS  training  all  claimed  to  have 
informed other PO members, but not much beyond that. 
A final concern with the L4G cascading model was raised by government technical officials who noted that 
L4G  agents  did  not  establish  a  supervisory  link  with  the  state  technical  services.  The  state  technical 
services  felt  that  their  staff  should  have  participated  in  the  FFS  training.  They  could  also  have  helped 
facilitate  the  cascading  of  training.  Sustainability  may  also  have  been  compromised  by  this  lack  of 
collaboration. 
Gains in Productivity, Access to Markets, and Incomes 
An L4G commissioned survey of 58 animal fatteners in 2019 found that they earned an average gross 
margin of 135,530 CFAF per head of cattle, 80 percent higher than the purchase price, and an average 
gross  margin  of  41,596  CFAF  per  head  of  sheep,  115  percent  higher  than  the  purchase  price.  If  the 
fatteners respect the 3-4 month fattening period with three cycles per year, this could provide an annual 

 

vi 

income of 406,590 CFAF for three cycles of cattle fattening and 124,788 CFAF for three cycles of sheep 
fattening. 
FGD participants were asked about their fattening activities before and after their training in FFSs and 
their income earned. In all cases, these responses suggest that PO members were receiving substantially 
more for the sales of their cattle and sheep after adopting improved fattening approaches taught in the 
FFSs. However, FGD participants in the co-located circles did not indicate profits that were higher than 
in the other circles without activity co-location. FGD participants did not provide quantitative measures 
of weight gains or profits, but they often indicated purchase and sales prices. These qualitative impressions 
are confirmed in an L4G survey of beneficiary farmers in which 90 percent of respondents said they were 
making  more  money  from  livestock  sales  after  L4G  than  before.  In  another  L4G  survey  of  528 
beneficiaries, 56.1 percent of respondents indicated that L4G had made a difference in their livelihoods. 
L4G performance monitoring results reported to the Feed the Future Monitoring System and found in its 
Annual Reports broadly confirm the positive KII and FGD findings reported above. From the baseline in 
FY 2014 through FY 2018, gross margins, incremental sales, and offtake rates for cattle and sheep (or 
small ruminants) all showed significant improvements, although with some ups and downs along the way 
for gross margins. The sole exception to this trend is exports of cattle and sheep, which reached a peak 
in FY 2016 only to fall again in succeeding years to settle in FY 2018 at values lower than in the baseline. 
Beneficiary Access to Markets 
PO members primarily engage in individual selling in local markets, either by selling to traders at the farm 
gate or by transporting the animals and selling in local markets. About one-half of the POs indicated that 
they join together for group sales. With a single exception, the POs sell their animals at the prevailing 
market price at the time of sale absent a formal sales contract. 
Combined Impact of SVPP and FFS Activities (Co-location) 
POs  and  other  key  informants  all  recognized  the  enhanced  value  of  placing  SVPP  and  FFS  activities 
together. They indicated that their animals gained weight faster due to FFS training and remained healthier 
and suffered less mortality as a result of vaccination campaigns and rapid VA animal treatment. Due to the 
qualitative nature of this evaluation, there was no accurate way to measure the impact of this interactive 
relationship, except to recognize the value of vaccination and disease treatment, including quarantine of 
animals purchased for fattening and maintaining the health of animals undergoing fattening regimes. POs 
recognized the link between vaccination and fattening activities and the value of VAs in providing advice 
to them about general animal health as well as nutrition, but they could not provide any clear sense of the 
combined impact. Other key informants were more able to define how these two interventions might 
produce higher-level results in theory and in practical terms. They were not, however, able to provide 
specific examples of where this occurred in actual practice. 
Limiting Factors 
When asked for recommendations on how future livestock activities might be improved, not surprisingly, 
many  recommendations  involved  the  provision  of  additional  resources,  including  financial  assistance, 
animals,  storage  warehouses,  feedlots,  and  equipment.  Key  informants  pointed  out  that  insufficient 
resources are the most important limiting factor in fattening activities followed by insufficient access to 
the necessary products. They suggested that future livestock activities should invest more in developing 
market  infrastructure,  such  as  a  fattening  pen  for  each  PO  or  a  few  villages,  in  addition  to  funding  a 
component to help animal fatteners and then reimburse loans after selling. 
Stakeholder Participation 
Several  stakeholders  again  raised  the  issue  of  a  lack  of  local  participation  in  activity  planning  and 
implementation. In this case, the state technical services in charge of animal production say they were not 
involved in the FFSs nor were they kept abreast of activity interventions. While all stakeholders agreed 

 

vii 

that the FFSs and other livestock support activities should be expanded to other areas of Mali, they also 
agreed that future activities need to involve the locals more in planning and implementation, in particular, 
the state technical services. 
CONCLUSIONS 
•  The fattening techniques taught in the FFSs were highly valued by participants. They recall all of these 

techniques, most of which were new to them. 

• 

•  Beneficiaries particularly valued FFS training in the proper selection of animals for fattening, dual-use 
forage crops, fabrication of licking blocks, improvement of hay with urea, development of correct 
animal food rations, and management of forage crops after harvest. 
In the Koro and Bankass circles of Mopti region where SVPP/VA services and FFS training were co-
located, beneficiaries recognized the value of easy and rapid access to vaccination and animal treatment 
by VAs. Between the new fattening techniques taught and enhanced veterinary services, their animals 
are in better health, grow more quickly, and generate greater income than before L4G. 

•  The presence of private vets and VAs in other circles of Mopti meant that the value of new fattening 
techniques could be enhanced in these other circles. However, the lack of a private veterinary system 
in Timbuktu circles where L4G installed FFSs meant that synergistic effects could not be expected. 

•  According to FGD participants, new knowledge of animal fattening techniques and close proximity of 
the  VAs  decreased  animal  loss,  increased  the  number  of  animals  fattened,  and  encouraged  more 
farmers to engage in this profitable activity if it is treated as a serious business. 

•  L4G donated animal feed, seed for forage, dual-use crops, and materials for making licking blocks, 
which permitted more FFS beneficiaries to fatten animals. Without this assistance, they would have 
had great difficulty using the new fattening techniques. Many seek more financial assistance to continue. 
•  Stock raisers and animal fatteners overwhelmingly report a growth in animal productivity, exemplified 
by greater and faster weight gain and reduced morbidity, coupled with increased incremental sales 
from shortening fattening cycles, and an increase in income, in part due to L4G livestock interventions. 
However, outcomes in these areas fell sharply FY 2019 due to increased insecurity. 

•  The  cascading  training  model  used  by  L4G  was  seriously  limited  by  the  lack  of  per  diems  for 
participants in cascade training sessions. Nevertheless, an informal spread of knowledge did occur in 
villages,  since  all  PO  members  met  seemed  equally  aware  and  appreciative  of  the  new  fattening 
techniques. 

•  The state technical services in charge of animal production were not involved in the FFSs nor were 
they kept abreast of activity interventions. Nevertheless, local government officials have a favorable 
view of the activity’s accomplishments and recommend extending the activity to other areas of Mali. 

RECOMMENDATIONS 
•  The area of co-location of SVPP/VA services and animal fattening training sites should be expanded to 
the other circles of Mopti region and to the circles of Timbuktu. This was not accomplished under 
L4G, but it could be attempted under any USAID or other donor follow-on project. 

•  USAID could extend the L4G activity, or similar large-scale effort to improve livestock productivity, 
to other areas of Mali, security permitting. Most agriculturalists in the southern part of the country 
do fatten animals and could improve these fattening activities. This would be an excellent additional 
source of revenue for women. 

•  The  state  technical  services  in  animal  production  should  be  integrated  into  any  new  livestock 
productivity activity design and implementation, just as they should be integrated into vaccination and 
veterinary  treatment  activities  in  villages.  The  co-location  of  vaccination,  treatment,  and  fattening 
techniques  should  require  the  full  partnership  of  the  state  services  for  implementation  and 
sustainability. 

•  To better diffuse new animal fattening techniques in any future livestock activity, it will be necessary 
to improve participation in cascade training sessions to mobilize a greater number of beneficiaries in 

 

viii 

future activities. This will require a system of per diem payment and transportation allowance coupled 
with training in a larger number of villages with more representatives from each PO. This model is 
viable and cost effective compared to others, but it must take into account the need to compensate 
trainees fully for their time and perceived costs. 

EQ  3:  “How  has  the  presence  of  water  management  systems 
impacted  the 
relationship/cohabitation between users?” / EQ 4: “How effectively are water management 
systems meeting the needs of the users?” 
Findings, conclusions, and recommendations for EQs 3-4 are based largely on two FGDs with water point 
committee members in Tori village and Koro Center in the Mopti region. Given this and the overlapping 
nature of the two EQs, they are addressed jointly. 
FINDINGS 
Drought and limited water access are common in the implementation area of L4G. The nine-month dry 
season presents particular difficulties, especially when drought is severe. In response, L4G devised a plan 
to rehabilitate or drill six boreholes with solar powered pumps and water tower storage in the livestock 
markets of the villages of Doundé, Koulogon Habbé, Ouonkoro, and Tori in the Bankass circle of Mopti 
and in Youdiou in the Koro circle of Mopti, in addition to improving the manual pump at the Koro District 
central market by installing a solar powered pump and water tower. Insecurity impeded the water point 
development in Youdiou. The borehole had been dug and equipment purchased, but the water point was 
subsequently sabotaged and work halted. This left five water points with completed, operational pumps 
by 2019. L4G worked with local governments to train water point committees at the five improved water 
points which were charged with developing a governance structure for administering the water points, 
including rules for water use and fee collections. In August 2019, L4G officially transferred responsibility 
for the water points and their equipment to the water point committees. 
FGD participants indicated that conflicts at the water points were minimal and always verbal. The “first 
come, first served” rule is strictly applied except for elders during long waits. During the winter months 
when  there  is  more  cloud  cover,  there  is  occasionally  not  enough  water  from  the  pump  to  meet  all 
customers’ needs quickly, which may result in longer waits. People may also wait longer just before market 
days, when people are watering their animals. Having separate taps for home use and watering animals 
also reduces wait times. Overall, wait times are substantially shorter than before L4G. 
There have been disagreements concerning fund distributions between the water management committee 
and the mayor’s office. Both committees have set up financial checks and balances and have a treasurer 
and an auditor to manage the money and checks the accounts. Each water tank also has a water meter, 
which can be used to estimate the amount of money that should be collected. Although not necessarily 
precise, the meter is a check on unauthorized water use. Each water point has an employee responsible 
for collecting fees. It has been challenging, however, to provide proper oversight for this person. 
The  impressions  of  committee  members  and  government  officials  about  water  point  management  are 
overwhelmingly  positive.  Overall,  the  water  point  governance  structure  works  well.  Nonetheless, 
committee members conceded that governance and accounting practices could be strengthened and that 
more training should be provided to water management committees to assist them in this process. Benefits 
of the improved water points include shorter wait times, greater convenience, automatic pumping that 
reduces  manual  labor,  and  reduced  transaction  costs  by  reducing  walking  distances.  Water  point 
conditions at villages not served by L4G are far worse in comparison to the L4G-supported water points. 
CONCLUSIONS 
•  Several months after the water points became operational, they continue to function well, although 
vandalism by unknown persons during  a village attack prevented the development of one planned 
water point. 

 

ix 

•  Conflicts around the water points are rare. When they do occur, they are typically associated with 

longer wait times and are limited to verbal conflicts. 

• 

•  Access to water is impeded when there is more cloud cover/less sunshine, because the solar power 

is not adequate to pump water into the tower. 
In the two villages visited with newly drilled or rehabilitated water points, the water point committees 
are established and continue to govern the water points. 

•  Overall, the water point governance works well resulting in reduced wait times and increased fee 
collection. Other benefits include less unauthorized water use, greater convenience, reduced need 
for manual labor, and reduced travel times. 

•  The water point committees have rules for usage and fees. However, there are some disputes around 

distributing water fees between the committee and municipality that remain unresolved. 

•  L4G  has  made  an  important  incremental  contribution  to  improving  water  access  in  the  relevant 

communities, particularly in comparison to villages not supported by the activity. 

RECOMMENDATIONS 
•  A follow-up intervention by USAID, other donors, or state technical and administrative services could 
provide  technical  assistance  to  water  point  committees  around  financial  oversight  and  planning, 
including site maintenance and repairs/replacement. 

•  USAID should construct new water points in the parts of those regions that have the least access to 

improved water, should security conditions in Mali allow it. 

•  Water user fees fixed by the municipalities should be kept as low as possible to maintain, repair, and 

establish a depreciation allowance for the new water points. 

•  A transparent system of public feedback should be put in place at the new water points involving the 

division and use of water user fees between municipalities and water point committees. 

•  Public  feedback  sessions  can  be  the  framework  for  exchanges  where  users  will  can  express  their 

expectations and make recommendations with respect to improving the water points. 

•  Future water interventions should use a participatory process to select water management committee 

members to promote transparency and public confidence in management decisions. 

•  The one non-functional water point built under L4G could be fully restored and made operational by 
continued  USAID  or  other  donor  activities  in  the  area  once  security  permits.  The  investment  is 
substantial and should be recouped. 

 

x 

1.0  EVALUATION PURPOSE AND 
QUESTIONS 

EVALUATION PURPOSE AND AUDIENCE 

1.1 
This evaluation represents the final performance evaluation of the Livestock for Growth (L4G) activity, 
one of two flagship activities (L4G and Cereal Value Chain) of the United States Agency for International 
Development Mali (USAID/Mali) Agriculture and Economic Growth (AEG) Office. The purpose of the 
evaluation is to assess activity progress in the livestock sector and to inform the design of future activities 
under the Global Food Security Strategy (GFSS) country plan. 
The main audience for this evaluation is USAID. This includes the USAID/Mali AEG office but also the Mali 
Mission and the Bureau for Resilience and Food Security (RFS) in Washington, D.C. As the final report 
will be publicly available, USAID expects that the Government of Mali (GOM) and a wide variety of other 
development partners will find the results useful. 
1.2 
The L4G performance evaluation seeks to answer the following four evaluation questions (EQs): 

EVALUATION QUESTIONS 

1.  To what extent do the trained auxiliaries continue to engage in activities that improve animal 
health in their villages? Are vaccines available in the villages of auxiliaries trained by the Services 
Vétérinaires Privés de Proximité  (Private Proximity Veterinary Services, or SVPPs)? 

2.  From  the  beneficiaries’  perspective,  did  their  access  to  the  co-located  introduction  of  new 
fattening technologies and vaccination programming improve beneficiary productivity, access to 
markets, and incomes? How did the co-location contribute to the improvements? 

3.  How  has  the  presence  of  water  management  systems  impacted  the  relationship/cohabitation 

between users? 

4.  How effectively are the water management systems meeting the needs of the users? 

2.0  ACTIVITY BACKGROUND 

ACTIVITY DESCRIPTION 

2.1 
L4G’s  goal  is  to  promote  inclusive  competitive  economic  growth  of  the  livestock  value  chain  in  Mali, 
defined as small ruminants and cattle. The development hypothesis for L4G is that if (1) the quality of 
livestock improves, (2) market access and incentives for semi-sedentary and small producers—including 
women and youth—are expanded, and (3) the enabling environment of the livestock sector improves, 
then Mali’s livestock sector will be more domestically and internationally competitive and contribute to 
increased agriculture gross domestic product and to broad-based economic growth. 
L4G was designed to increase the output of the livestock value chain by strengthening support services 
(e.g., advisory, inputs, finance, and research) and improving access to information and technology. Activity 
interventions  aimed  at  increasing  access  to  products  and  services  and  identifying  incentives  for  wider 
participation in livestock activities. L4G also builds the resilience of poorer livestock households through 
developing the skills necessary to participate in commercial activities, livestock production, and sales, or 
in related service industries (e.g., fodder). 
To achieve Feed the Future’s objectives, L4G has integrated gender and household nutrition and hygiene 
practices into its approach and outputs. While not an objective, it is expected that improved management 

1 

APPROACH AND IMPLEMENTATION 

of  livestock  will  result  in  increased  meat  and  milk  production,  which  can  have  nutritional  benefits  for 
livestock households. 
2.2 
L4G  implemented  a  market-oriented  approach,  which  integrates  improved  production  with  market 
demand. In line with this approach, most of L4G’s interventions responded to existing market demands 
both within Mali and the West African sub-region. Specifically, production activities and activity targets 
responded to market demand related to increasing domestic and export trade. 
Organization capacity strengthening and leadership building and training were critical factors underpinning 
most of L4G’s interventions. From basic literacy to business skills, organizational management, production 
and  management  technologies,  marketing,  and  advocacy,  there  is  a  great  need  for  strengthening  the 
capabilities of all actors to catalyze the necessary upgrading and investments. Building the management 
and leadership capacity of men and women throughout the value chain was critical to ensure that L4G’s 
results are market driven and sustainable in the long term and at multiple levels. 
The L4G activity worked in the Mopti and Timbuktu regions within the Feed the Future Zone of Influence 
(ZOI). At end of activity, the activity was located in three circles of the Timbuktu region (Diré, Niafunké, 
and Goundam) and five of the Mopti region circles (Bankass, Koro, Mopti, Bandiagara, and Djenné). (See 
Figure 1 for a detailed map of Mali showing L4G intervention locations.) 

Figure 1: Map of Mali Showing L4G Intervention Locations 

 

2 

L4G interventions focused on multiple value chain actors, including but not limited to livestock producers, 
traders, aggregators, transporters, inputs suppliers, and other service providers. For L4G, producers were 
broadly defined to be those households with members who raise small ruminants and/or cattle. While 
semi-sedentary herders, small producers, and small traders were its primary focus, L4G did not exclude 
working with medium and large producers and traders, as these are often the initial (or early) adopters 
and can demonstrate the benefits of technologies. Providers of inputs (e.g., forage and fodder seed, feeds 
and ration supplements, vaccines, and veterinary pharmaceuticals) and services (e.g., veterinary services) 
were the main focus on the inputs side. 

3.0  EVALUATION METHODS AND 
LIMITATIONS 

EVALUATION METHODS 

3.1 
Qualitative Methods 
This  evaluation  employed  primarily  qualitative  data  collection  and  analysis  methods.  Primary  data 
collection  consisted  of  18  focus  group  discussions  (FGDs)  and  18  key  informant  interviews  (KIIs) 
implemented  over  a  four-week  period  from  October  7  to  November  10,  2019.  FGDs  and  KIIs  were 
carried out by a field team of Malian livestock and evaluation specialists and a team leader based in Bamako. 
Discussions  in  village-level  FGDs  addressed  primarily  EQs  1  and  2,  while  KIIs  provided  additional 
viewpoints  from  administrative  and  technical  service  officials.  Other  FGDs  were  held  with  veterinary 
auxiliaries in the Koro and Bankass circles and with water point management committees in Koro center 
and from Tori village (Bankass circle). Annex 2 includes a schedule of field work, and Annex 3 includes 
FGD and KII guides. 
Focus Group Discussions with Village Farmers 
The evaluation team received a list of villages 
where SVPPs/Veterinary Auxiliaries (VAs) and 
Farmer Field Schools (FFSs) were co-located. 
From  that  list,  the  team  chose  seven  co-
located  villages  in  the  Bankass  and  Koro 
circles.  These  are:  Koro  Center,  Tere, 
Koporona,  Pel-Maoude,  Ende  Toro,  Logon, 
and Tori. For contrast, the team next chose 
seven non co-located villages within the Mopti 
and Timbuktu regions where FFSs existed, but 
there  was  no  SVPP/VA  service.  These  are 
Mopti/Bandiagara 
(Dandoli), 
Mopti/Mopti 
and 
Mopti/Djenné  circle  (Sofara).  Within  the 
Timbuktu  region  the  evaluation  team  chose 
Diré circle (Bourem Sidi Amar and Tindirma), 
Goundam circle (Tonka), and Niafunké circle 
(Sibonne).  Since  five  villages  had  two  FGDs 
each,  the  number  of  FGDs  for  co-located 
villages (10) was slightly more than the number of FGDs for non-co-located villages (8). This selection of 
villages was done purposively within type of village (co-located or not), in order to assure geographic and 
ethnic distribution and with security concerns taken into account. Two co-located villages also had new 
water points, Koro and Tori. The number of FGD participants by gender is provided in Table 1. 

Photo 1: Focus group with a women’s producer 
organization in Koro. 

circle 
(Gnimitongo), 

circle 

3 

Once  the  villages  were  finalized,  the  evaluation  team  contacted  a  representative  of  the  producer 
organization (PO) in the village and asked him or her to invite up to 10 people to the FGD on the appointed 
day. The team asked that they invite a mix of male, female, and youth members (if it was a mixed PO). 
The following table shows the final number of FGD participants by gender and region/circle. 

Table 1: Farmer FGD Participants by Gender, Co-Location, Region, and District 

Region 

Male 

Female 

Youth 

Total 

Co-Located 
Mopti/Koro 
Mopti/Bankass 
Non Co-Located 
Mopti/Bandiagara 
Mopti/Mopti 
Mopti/Djenné 
Timbuktu/Diré 
Timbuktu/Goundam 
Timbuktu/Niafunké 
Total 

- 
0 
13 
- 
8 
5 
- 
5 
4 
8 
43 

- 
26 
31 
- 
8 
6 
- 
11 
6 
- 
88 

- 
14 
 
- 
- 
- 
9 
- 
- 
- 
23 

- 
40 
44 
- 
16 
11 
9 
16 
10 
8 
154 

Number 
of FGDs 

- 
5 
5 
- 
2 
1 
1 
2 
1 
1 
18 

Focus Group Discussions with Veterinary Auxiliaries 
The  evaluation  team  conducted  two  FGs  with  VAs,  one  in  Mopti/Bankass  with  eight  men  and  one  in 
Mopti/Koro with six men. The VAs were brought to a central location from the various villages where 
they are located. The FGD participants were selected purposively, considering geographic distribution and 
availability to travel to participate in the FGD. 
Focus Group Discussions with Water Point Committees 
The  evaluation  team  conducted  two  FGDs  with  members  of  water  point  committees.  There  are  five 
improved water points; four are new and one is a replacement for a previous manual pump. The evaluation 
team  conducted  one  FGD  with  the  committee  for  a  new  water  point  (Tori)  and  one  FGD  with  the 
committee for the improved water point (Bankass Center). The first FGD was composed of four men and 
the second of two men, one woman, and three youth. Due to security concerns, it was necessary to bring 
the  Tori  committee  members  to  a  central  location  (Koro  Center)  for  the  FGD.  The  water  point 
committee chose the FGD representatives, based on those best able to provide the overall opinions of 
the committee and of their constituent water users. 
Key Informant Interview Respondents 
To  identify  key  informants  for  the  KIIs,  the  evaluation  team  developed  a  list  of  desired  interviewees, 
according to the following categories: 

1.  Government representatives at the regional and circle levels 
2.  Representatives of non-governmental organizations (NGOs) or private sector organizations 
3.  Private veterinarians contracted with L4G 
4.  Representatives of the implementing organization 

The evaluation team chose to focus on the Mopti region, and in particular the Bankass and Koro circles 
within Mopti, since that is where the activities of concern for the EQs were concentrated. The team next 
developed  a  list  of  potential  interviewees  and  contacted  them  to  schedule  interviews.  A  total  of  18 
interviews (with 19 persons, as a result of one group interview) in the categories above were conducted. 
The final list of interviewees is provided in Table 2. 
 

 

4 

Table 2: List of Interviewees for L4G Evaluation 

Title 

Organization 

Name 

Government Representatives 
Oumar Din  
Issa Coulibaly 
Issa Sagara  

President 
Chief of Veterinary Service 
First Deputy to Mayor  

Hamidou Dougnon 

Chief of Services 

Mamadou Samassekou 

Hammadi Kane Diallo 
Jean Baptiste Traore 
Moussa Maiga 
Hama Sy  
Kaleb Tessougue and Mr. 
Soumbougou 
Youssef Traore 
Abdul Aziz Traore 
NGO Sector Representative 

Advisor for Rural Development, Regional 
Council 
Regional Directorate for Animal Production 
and Industries (DRPIA) 
Director for Veterinary Services 
Chief of Veterinary Service  
First Deputy to Mayor 
First Vice President and General Secretary, 
Circle Council  
Head of Pasture Resources 
Director of Hydraulic Services 

Housseyni Kokena 

Project Supervisor  

Private Veterinarians Contracted with L4G (SVPPs) 
Laya Togo 
Hamidou Sokonda 
Former L4G Staff 
Thomas Herlehy 
Izza Soubiane  
Jean Poudiougo 

Senior Program Manager Advisor to L4G  
Data Manager  
Former L4G Field Agent 

SVPP 
SVPP  

Koro circle  
Koro circle 
Koro circle 
Local Service of Animal 
Production and Industries 
(SLPIA), Koro circle 
Mopti region 

Mopti region 
Mopti region 
Bankass circle 
Bankass circle 
Bankass circle 
SLPIA, Bankass circle 
Bankass circle 

International Livestock 
Research Institute 
(ILRI)/Mopti 

Bankass District 
Bankass District 

DT Global  
DT Global  
DT Global/Mopti 

The field team visited the two L4G activity regions in Mopti, and Timbuktu. Both FGDs and KIIs were 
recorded, while assistants to the field researchers also took notes of each FGD and KII. Both synthesis 
reports and full transcriptions were made of each FGD and KII. The qualitative analysis also included a 
review of documents, primarily those produced as reports to USAID from the implementing partner (IP) 
DT Global (formerly AECOM). Qualitative data were then analyzed/coded using content analysis and the 
qualitative data analysis program NVivo to identify salient themes and sub-themes in the data. (Annex 4 
provides a comprehensive bibliography of documents reviewed for the evaluation.) 
Quantitative Methods 
The evaluation team accessed the following measures of the activity’s quantitative progress for this report. 
•  The Mali Living Standards Measurements Study (LSMS) for 2014 and for 2017. These are nationally 
representative population-based surveys conducted by the GOM with USAID support. They use 
a two-stage design and the analyses are weighted. The 2014 survey included 3,805 households and 
the 2017 survey included 8,390 households. 

•  The “Final Survey” conducted by International Business and Technical Consultants, under contract 

to DT Global. This was conducted in 2019 with a sample of 538 L4G program participants. 

•  A survey of 58 L4G-trained fatteners conducted for DT Global in July 2018. 
•  Reports from private SVPP veterinarians. 
•  L4G performance monitoring data. 

5 

In some cases, secondary data were disaggregated to the circle level, which allowed the evaluation team 
to specifically analyze data for Bankass and Koro (the co-located circles). 
The evaluation team also requested and obtained disaggregated data from the IP, DT Global. These data, 
in the form of Excel spreadsheets, were primarily partial lists (from some parts of the activity area, and 
only selected time periods), so the team was ultimately unable to extract useful indicators from those 
data. 
Outcome Measures  
The qualitative nature of the four EQs coupled with the data collection techniques meant that the data 
produced outcome measures that are not generally quantitative, such as majority consensus; subjective 
estimates of quality, value, practice, and availability; concurrence among respondents; and frequency of 
responses. Beyond the concepts linked to the EQs, several themes and patterns emerged from the content 
analysis across the FGDs and KIIs using NVivo, which are reported below as evaluation findings. 
3.2 
The villages visited for the evaluation were selected purposively to assure geographic representation and 
a  mix  of  co-located  and  non-co-located  villages.  Security  concerns  in  the  two  regions  of  Mopti  and 
Timbuktu  affected  the  selection  of  villages.  All  KIIs  were  also  selected  purposively.  A  few  selected 
interviewees could not be contacted or were unavailable. Thus, the samples were not fully representative 
of L4G as a whole. 
Some of the quantitative data used for this evaluation were collected by the IP and could not be validated. 
A baseline data survey was carried out in 2015 and a final impact study was carried out late in 2019. There 
was no midterm evaluation. A complicating factor was that L4G had ended just prior to the evaluation 
team’s arrival in Mali, and all key staff had left the country. Quantitative performance monitoring data 
were provided by DT Global, but the personnel to answer questions concerning those data were not 
readily available. Consequently, the evaluation team relied primarily on previously processed data whose 
quality and methods were outside the team’s control. 

METHODOLOGICAL LIMITATIONS 

4.0  FINDINGS, CONCLUSIONS, 
AND RECOMMENDATIONS 

EVALUATION QUESTION 1 

This section presents the findings, conclusions, and recommendations for each of the four EQs. For the 
recommendations,  it  should  be  noted  that  many  recommendations  are  contingent  on  the  easing  or 
cessation  of  insecurity  and  inter-ethnic  strife  in  the  country.  In  addition,  as  L4G  has  now  ended, 
recommendations pertain largely with what USAID/Mali should do for future livestock support activities 
in Mali. 
4.1 
To  what  extent  do  the  trained  auxiliaries  continue  to  engage  in  activities  that  improve 
animal health in their villages? Are vaccines available in the villages of auxiliaries trained by 
SVPPs? 
BACKGROUND 
Vaccination rates at the time of the launch of L4G were very low in the activity implementation area. Lack 
of  human  and  material  resources  (vaccines,  vehicles,  cold  storage)  to  carry  out  annual  vaccination 
campaigns contributed to low vaccination rates. The Regional Directorate of Veterinary Services for Mopti 
(DRSV in French) reported in 2015 that the Bankass and Koro circles had 953,512 bovine cattle, of which 
about 200,000 were vaccinated (21 percent). For small ruminants the situation was far worse. Of 2,385,376 

6 

animals,  only  about 50,000  were  vaccinated  (2  percent).1  Few  herders  even knew who  could  provide 
veterinary services for their animals. 
To  respond  to  this  shortage  of  veterinary  services,  the  L4G  activity  formally  launched  the  SVPPs  in 
September  2015. The  fee-based  model  included  L4G-trained  private  veterinarians  and  76 L4G-trained 
VAs. Between March and July 2015, L4G trained six private veterinarians (including one female), in order 
to improve their technical and private service delivery skills. L4G staff also provided training to 76 VAs, 
including 24 women (31 percent).2 The VAs were given 20 days of training on seven modules. The Fiscal 
Year (FY) 2015 Annual Report stated that many of these VAs were also enrolled in the Institut de Formation 
Professionnelle (Institute for Professional Training, or IFP) in Bankass. L4G trained the VAs to buy and stock 
livestock  inputs  and  veterinary  medicines  in  order  to  provide  basic  veterinary  services  and  advice  to 
herders and animal fatteners. At SVPP launch in September 2015, only two vets remained active in the 
SVPP program. A third SVPP was fully certified in January 2016 and joined the other two. L4G helped the 
SVPPs  to  strengthen  their  businesses  by  developing  a  private  sector  revenue  stream.  All  three  SVPPs 
created business plans by early 2016. 
The SVPP system encouraged private veterinarians to expand beyond vaccination to focus more broadly 
on animal health, while expanding the number and quality of VAs to provide animal fattening and animal 
health services in tandem with private veterinarians. The private veterinarians managed the supply chain 
of veterinary medicines and supplies, including the vaccination doses. SVPPs and VAs vaccinated cattle and 
small  ruminants  against  common  local  diseases  (peri-pneumonia,  foot-and-mouth,  and  pasteurollosis), 
launched a deworming effort at the beginning and end of the rainy season, and treated other diseases. L4G 
reinforced SVPP skills in the use of vaccines, proper disposal of needles and glass vaccine containers, and 
procedures to ensure compliance with maintaining the cold chain for live vaccines. 
L4G  supplied  veterinarian  starter  kits  worth  1,740,000  CFAF  ($2,950)  to  each  of  the  three  private 
veterinarians.  These  consisted  of  furniture,  refrigerators,  freezers,  air  stabilizers,  syringe  guns, 
thermometers,  needles,  stethoscopes,  stoves,  surgical  gloves,  and  other  supplies.  For  the  vaccination 
campaign in FY 2016, L4G purchased vaccines and provided them on credit to the three SVPPs to promote 
future sustainability. These loans were repaid and were intended to provide a model for bank credit in 
future. 
Table 3 shows the number of animals vaccinated in FY 2016 and FY 2017 under L4G. In FY 2017, the 
SVPPs  reported  vaccinating  459,452  animals  (cattle,  sheep,  and  goats)  against  diseases,  a  substantial 
increase over FY 2016. They also reported combined profits of over 43 million CFAF ($86,162). 

Table 3: Number of Vaccinated Animals Under L4G, 2015-2017 

2015-2016 

Type of Vaccine 

Koro 
4,327 
17,000 
38,645 
59,972 
  Source: Vaccination records compiled by L4G SVPP veterinarians. 

Contagious Cattle Pneumonia 
Cattle Pasteurollosis 
Sheep/Goat Pasteurollosis 
Total 

Bankass 
36,266 
24,910 
82,534 
143,710 

Total 
40,593 
41,910 
121,179 
203,682 

2016-2017 

Koro 
Bankass 
85,081 
78,283 
23,366 
65,154 
166,628 
40,490 
310,065  148,937 

Total 
163,364 
88,520 
207,568 
459,452 

In FY 2018, the three SVPPs reported vaccinating 171,591 cattle and 115,734 sheep and goats, a combined 
total of 287,325 animals, but a drop of 37.5 percent due to the growing insecurity. Between 2016 and 
2018 an average of 22 percent of animals were vaccinated, compared to 8 percent in 2014. 

                                                 
1 L4G Annual Report 2014-2015, p. 4. 
2 The L4G Final Report (FY 2014-2019) gives a figure of 76, one less than the 77 given in previous annual reports, including the 
last annual report (FY 2019). No reason is given for this by DT Global.   

7 

During FY 2017, L4G expanded the SVPP model into four new zones: one in Bandiagara circle, one in 
Mopti circle, and two in Djenné circle. L4G conducted community outreach that resulted in the selection 
of 26 new VAs for further training and service delivery under the direction of four private veterinarians. 
The L4G sub-contractor,  AMRAD, also worked with existing veterinarians in the Timbuktu region to 
identify 10 VAs who could be paired with veterinarians and be trained by them to provide auxiliary animal 
health care services in the Timbuktu region. In its last implementation year (FY 2019), the three SVPP 
private veterinarians (one in Koro circle and two in Bankass circle) and 76 VAs (49 in Bankass and 27 in 
Koro) remained functional, and from five to 15 VAs supported each SVPP. 
For the last two years of activity implementation, however, these vaccination campaigns were severely 
hampered  by  insecurity  and  inter-community  strife  in  the  Mopti  and  Timbuktu  regions.  In  addition, 
insecurity in the Mopti and Timbuktu regions prevented SVPPs and VAs from conducting their normal 
vaccination and deworming activities. The FY 2019 annual report stated that more than 98 percent of 
vaccinated animals and revenues generated by the SVPPs were realized during the first half of FY 2019 
(through March 31, 2019), with only 2 percent of vaccinations carried out during the second half of FY 
2019 (after April 1, 2019). In FY 2019 the number of animals vaccinated was only 63,294, a drop of 78 
percent from FY 2018. (The FY 2019 Annual Report did not distinguish vaccinations by animal type.) By 
June 2019, none of the SVPP veterinarians or VAs were able to operate outside the main city centers.3 
FINDINGS 
To investigate the availability of continued veterinary services, the evaluation team conducted 10 FGDs 
with participants from POs in the initially targeted SVPP areas, including four villages in Koro circle and 
three villages in Bankass circle. The team also conducted FGDs in seven other villages, three in Mopti 
region and four in Timbuktu region. Finally, the team conducted two FGDs with VAs, one with VAs from 
Bankass circle and one with VAs from Koro circle. These findings are enhanced by KIIs with the two 
Bankass SVPPs and with other knowledgeable individuals, including circle and regional-level government 
officials, the directors of veterinary services for the Bankass and Koro circles and for the Mopti region. 
Continued SVPP Veterinarian and VA Presence in Villages and Their Roles 
Participants in all 10 of the FGDs in Bankass and Koro circles acknowledged the continued presence of 
SVPP veterinarians and VAs in their village or in nearby villages. They report that the SVPP vets come to 
their villages once or twice a year during vaccination campaigns. Outside of these campaigns, vaccinations 
and treatment of sick animals in the villages fall to the VAs. In addition to vaccinations, VAs provide other 
treatments  for  sick  animals,  including  deworming,  and  advisory  services,  often  going  door-to-door  to 
dispense advice or raise awareness. 
The two SVPPs in Bankass circle operate in Bankass city and in Diallassagou, to the southwest of Bankass 
city. They both report continuing to treat, deworm, and vaccinate livestock in the Bankass and Mopti 
circles. The two SVPPs reported that L4G trained VAs in Bankass for three days per quarter, provided 
them kits with basic materials and tablets for deworming, and put them under the vets’ authority. They 
also report having initially received financial support from L4G to provide equipment to carry out the 
vaccination campaign. They reimbursed those funds, but the following year L4G allowed them to use the 
funds as working capital (a grant rather than a loan). Each continues to supervise VA activities in the field, 
visiting vaccination parks once a quarter to supervise and train VAs. They also provide loans to the VAs 
for vaccines: 

“If a VA needs vaccines he is given them, and after the treatment he reimburses the SVPPs and is given 
half as much again because there is lack of liquidity.” (Government official) 

The following quote by a PO member in Koro circle aptly sums up the benefits VAs offer PO members: 

                                                 
3 L4G Annual Report 2018-2019, p. 6. 

8 

“His role is to vaccinate during vaccination campaigns and to follow the treatment of our animals. Each 
time we do fattening, we call him to check the condition of the animal. The fact that he resides in the 
village makes it easier for us to access his care services quickly, and it costs us less money. This allows us 
to save our animal in case of emergency. In short, it reduces our losses in terms of income. (PO member) 
Notwithstanding PO members’ generally positive perception of VAs, it was widely noted in both FGDs 
and KIIs that the VAs have never functioned at full strength employing the full cohort of  trained VAs, a 
point confirmed by the SVPP vets and state veterinary service officials. Many had been appointed through 
favoritism by local officials and lacked the will or qualifications to carry out their duties. 
There was initially a tripartite agreement in FY 2016 between the town hall, L4G, and the SVPP vets to 
manage the SVPP system. As part of this agreement, the VAs are supposed to get their vaccines and other 
supplies from the SVPP vet, although reportedly this does not always occur. According to the SVPP vets, 
this  agreement  also  included  a  plan  to  expand  their  coverage  areas.  However,  the  plan  was  never 
implemented due in part to the change in the L4G director, which, they claimed, adversely affected the 
expansion by delaying it to the point of abandon. 
In contrast, the development of the SVPP program in Timbuktu lags significantly behind Mopti. In the four 
FGDs conducted in the Niafunké, Goundam, and Diré circles, participants reported that there are neither 
private veterinarians nor VAs operating in their villages. While state veterinarians exist in the Niafunké 
and Goundam circle villages of Tonka and Sibonne, there are no vets of any kind operating in the Diré 
villages of Tindirma and Bourem Sidi Amar. 
SVPP and VA Vaccination and Treatment Activities 
As reported by FGD participants, annual or biannual vaccination campaigns normally occur in all villages 
visited in the Mopti region and in two of the three circles visited in Timbuktu (with the apparent exception 
of  Diré).  PO  members  reported  that  the  most  frequent  vaccinations  are  for  peri-pneumonia  and  for 
livestock with diarrhea symptoms, but farmers also vaccinate commonly for foot-and-mouth disease, colds, 
and pasteurollosis. FGD and KII participants claimed that vaccination rates have risen notably in recent 
years, and that there has been a corresponding decrease in livestock morbidity and mortality, although 
they did not provide quantitative estimates for these claims. (All claims of improved animal health provided 
by FGD and KII participants were self-reported and not verified by independent sources.) Key informants 
widely cited the installment of vets and VAs under SVPP as an important contributor to these outcomes. 
PO members in the Bankass and Bandiagara circles indicated that L4G incentivized their PO membership 
to take vaccinations more seriously. Prior to L4G, in Bankass there was a VA in the PO’s village, but there 
was relatively little demand among members for his services. L4G, however, helped them understand the 
importance  of  herd  health  and  herd  fattening  in  value-added  economic  terms.  While  in  the  past  they 
vaccinated at most one-half of their animals, they now claim to be vaccinating close to 100 percent. 

“We now vaccinate our animals normally, even if they do not show signs of sickness symptoms.” (PO 
member) 

Similarly, PO members in Bandiagara vaccinated their animals prior to L4G, but only some of them, and 
there were problems with the cost and quality of the vaccines. 

“The  problems  we  had  with  vaccination  have  disappeared,  because  with  the  L4G  activity  everyone 
understood the importance of vaccination. Previously, people did not vaccinate all their cattle, because 
they  did  not  understand,  but  with  the  training  received  with  L4G  they  understand  everything.”  (PO 
member) 

In Mopti, where L4G SVPP vets do not operate, POs receive vaccination and other veterinary services 
from state-supported private vets who are not part of the L4G SVPP. In addition to vaccination services, 
these state agents treat sick animals and do deworming when necessary. However, in the villages where 

9 

VAs  do  exist  outside  the  SVPP  area,  they  provide  similar  veterinary  services  as  the  state  agents,  as 
reported by FGD participants from a men’s cooperative in Bandiagara circle. 
The head of the veterinary service of Bankass circle indicated that he does not know which vaccines L4G 
has provided VAs, but a number of other initiatives in the area are supplying them with vaccines, which 
are, in turn, administered by state veterinary agents. These state veterinary agents are volunteers trained 
by  the  state.  According  to  this  key  informant,  the  VAs  have  the  advantage  of  being  able  to  travel 
throughout the circle providing veterinary services, despite the ongoing insecurity in the area. 
Even  in  Timbuktu,  where  L4G  SVPP  activities  had  little  direct  influence  on  vaccination  and  veterinary 
treatment activities, one PO in Niafunké circle indicated that the L4G activity had helped to reinforce the 
skills of the state veterinary services. According to PO members, the L4G activity helped them become 
more  aware  of  the  need  for  regular  deworming  and  a  quarantine  period  after  animal  purchases  for 
fattening before mixing them with the other animals on the homestead. 
In response to a question about continuing the activities of the auxiliaries after L4G, one public official 
believes they can be sustained. However, he argues that the number of trained and active VAs is currently 
too low, and that there are not enough approved (mandated) agents to supervise them. In addition, he 
stated that the VAs require ongoing training, noting “it is above all necessary to motivate those auxiliaries and 
give them refresher training.” 
Availability and Cost of Vaccines 
None of the 18 POs visited in Mopti or Timbuktu indicated problems with the vaccine availability in their 
villages, whether during campaigns or at other times. This echoed similar claims made by SVPP vets and 
VAs regarding vaccine availability. In Bourem Sidi Amar (Diré circle), where the PO indicated that no state 
agents were available for vaccination campaigns or treatment, FGD participants, nonetheless, claimed to 
be satisfied with the availability of vaccines. One of the two SVPPs in Bankass indicated that he has never 
faced a vaccine shortage. He has a freezer and two solar-powered refrigerators in a field site for storage 
and is thus able to provide his VAs with a steady supply of vaccines. 
While vaccines are always available for purchase in the cities, the main impediment to their use is their 
cost, both cash and transportation costs. As noted by a member of the Koporona PO in Bankass, “We 
have the vaccine every time we need it. It just depends on your having money or not.” 
During vaccination campaigns, the state subsidizes the vaccine cost, and key informants cite vaccination 
prices ranging from 125 to 225 CFAF for cattle, approximately 100 CFAF for small ruminants and poultry, 
and 200 CFAF for sheep. Outside of the vaccination campaigns, the prices ranged from 200 to 1,000 CFAF 
for cattle and from 100 to 200 CFAF for small ruminants. The prices during and outside campaigns do not 
appear to differ, according to the FGD participants. The youth platform in Sofara, however, claimed that 
the cost to vaccinate cattle outside of the vaccination campaigns can be as high as 3,000 CFAF. At this 
time, vaccinations and treatments are often mixed, and the price charged depends on the animal and the 
specific disease. Because of the cost barrier, in some cases, animals are not vaccinated until they appear 
sick. 
In addition to the cost of the vaccines themselves, farmers pay the VA a labor charge. Labor charges are 
negotiated  between  the  VA  and  the  farmer  and  include,  among  other  things,  compensation  for 
transport/fuel and other costs for the VA plus a profit bump. 
Positive Impressions of SVPP/VA Activities 
The SVPP system installed by L4G was favorably perceived by members of POs who were included in the 
FGDs. Table 4 shows some of the favorable impressions expressed by FGD participants. 
 

 

10 

Table 4: Positive Impressions of SVPP and VA Services Mentioned by FGD Participants 

Type of Positive Impression 

Learning about how to improve animal health 
More ready access to veterinary services 
Higher number of animals vaccinated 
Fewer animal deaths due to vaccines 
Greater payment flexibility 

  Note: Out of 18 FGDs. 

Number of Mentions 

14 
7 
3 
8 
3 

All FGDs indicated that the VAs respond rapidly when called, if they are able to. According to the chairman 
of Bankass circle, for example, “The [SVPP] approach has effectively improved the vaccination coverage rate 
because the auxiliaries are close to the population.” A PO member noted “They [VAs] occupy a very large place 
in the village. They are very important to us, because when your animal gets sick and you call them, they come 
very quickly to treat it.” 
Before the installation of the VAs under L4G, farmers’ only options were to call private vets or state 
technical agents, which were often unavailable, busy, or otherwise unable to provide prompt service.  
Said one PO member in Koro circle, “Before L4G, veterinarians were only in Koro, and it was not easy to 
mobilize them. But nowadays, auxiliaries are living with us in the village, and we have access to their services very 
easily.” 
A PO member in Bankass circle similarly noted that previously, when an animal showed signs of illness, 
they would have to call a veterinarian from Bankass city observing, “He might spend two to three days before 
coming. It causes us many losses.” 
Another benefit is that having people who live in the same or a nearby village provide services introduces 
greater payment flexibility, which in turn promotes increased utilization. 

“When they are in the village, even if you have no money, they take care of your animal and then you pay 
them their money later. When the person comes from Koro or Bankass, you do not know each other so 
you are obliged to pay them the same day.” (PO Member) 

FGD participants from women’s PO in Mopti circle emphasized that the presence of VAs nearby, together 
with the L4G intervention, have made a significant difference in their ability to earn income from their 
animal raising activities. 
A high-level official in Bankass city maintained that herders are no longer holding back from vaccinating 
their herds stating, “Mortalities we knew before have greatly decreased.” 
Similarly, another Bankass city official asserted that the VAs play a vital role assisting livestock raisers in 
vaccination and providing different animal treatments. 

“Due to the assistance of these young auxiliaries, treatments and vaccinations are no longer difficult to 
do. They are there in town, and we benefit from their services at any time, whenever we wish. So having 
them  close  to  us  is  an  important  thing  initiated  by  the  activity.  And  in  addition,  it  helped  to  absorb 
unemployment.” (Government official) 

In Koro circle, a high-level government official noted that state veterinary agents were not numerous 
enough to cover the whole circle and that the addition of SVPP vets and VAs has materially increased 
available vet resources leading to an improvement in animal health. 

“We think it was a very good thing to have brought these auxiliaries closer to the stock raisers. But it 
should be noted that auxiliaries are also insufficient.” (Government official) 

In this light, he said that state agents require much time and effort to visit villages in the circle during and 
outside the vaccination campaigns and that, ideally, there should be at least five VAs in each commune. 

11 

Key informants also uniformly agreed that the SVPP program has helped stock raisers to improve the 
health of their herds. VAs are active in the villages and always respond to requests for animal treatment 
and vaccinations with an attendant rise in the number of livestock vaccinated and improvement in herd 
health. During 2019, however, FGD participants indicated that livestock vaccination rates and herd health 
declined concomitantly with the disruption in the SVPP system and vaccination campaigns brought about 
by increasing levels of insecurity in the regions. Stock raisers were afraid to group the animals because of 
bandits. 
All of the FGDs with POs in the Mopti region, whether within the L4G SVPP/VA core zones of the Bankass 
and Koro circles or in adjoining circles, claimed to be more aware of the need for vaccination, in part due 
to the influence of L4G. FGD participants also uniformly claimed to have observed a significant impact on 
animal health through decreased animal morbidity and, more importantly, decreased mortality, again due 
in part to L4G. Although the FGD participants were unable to offer precise estimates of improved animal 
health, they were adamant that the losses typically experienced in the past have been significantly reduced. 
These were self-reported results with no actual data to back them up. 
Challenges to Achieving Full Vaccination 
Table 5 lists prominent challenges to achieving full herd vaccination, as indicated by FGD participants. 

Table 5: Challenges to Full Vaccination Mentioned by FGD Participants 

Type of Challenge 

Cost of vaccinations 
Theft of herds or insecurity at vaccination campaigns 
Lack of vaccines available  
Lack of quality vaccine 
Vaccines not located in close proximity 
Note: Out of 18 FGDs. 

Number of Mentions 

3 
2 
1 
1 
1 

KIIs  with  government  administrative  and  technical  officials  further  identified  several  challenges  to  full 
implementation, expansion, and sustainability of the L4G SVPP approach now that the activity is over, 
including insecurity, cost, access to and availability of services, training and availability of VAs, and poor 
state oversight and coordination with L4G 
Insecurity 
Insecurity from violent extremism and inter-community conflict in Mopti and Timbuktu was the number 
one reason cited in KIIs for the limitations in the reach of the L4G SVPP activity. Indeed, as indicated 
earlier, the vaccination campaign in Mopti was suspended in April 2019 due to growing insecurity. Many 
villages are now totally inaccessible because of insecurity. One official said that, in the past, the challenge 
was the lack of qualified and competent veterinarians, but now it is their ability to get out to the areas 
they wish to serve. 
For example, there is considerable fear among herders of grouping animals for vaccination because of 
banditry. Indeed, some herders have sold their animals to avoid being robbed. 

“The theft of the herds of some stock raisers by armed bandits greatly discouraged these stock raisers 
from bringing their animals to the vaccination parks for fear of being robbed of their property. At the same 
time, growing insecurity means that mandated private technical or veterinary agents are no longer able to 
reach certain inaccessible localities.” (Government official) 

Another  factor  that  results  from  insecurity  is  that  stock  raisers  may  distrust  the  vaccinators  and  the 
vaccines they use, if they do not personally know the vaccinator. Consequently, they may not bring their 
animals to them. The VAs have helped to continue veterinary services because they reside in the villages 
and do not have to travel through insecure areas in order to provide services. However, insecurity does 

12 

affect the VAs’ ability to do their job. For example, the VAs must come into town to pick up vaccines and 
submit statistics on their vaccinations for official reports. During the latter part of L4G, there was a ban 
on motorcycle use in the field to limit terrorist displacement; however, this ban has now been removed. 
High Cost 
The second barrier to full implementation and a 100 percent vaccination rate is cost. One official reported 
that some costs are very high for the herders. Such is the case for foot-and-mouth disease. The dose 
alone can cost as much as 1,000 CFAF and would seem cost-effective only for cattle. The cost for providing 
the vaccination can be another 500 CFAF. The GOM has started to subsidize this vaccine down from 
1,000 to 150 CFAF. Participants in the youth FGD in Sofara  claimed that the cost to vaccinate cattle 
outside  of  the  vaccination  campaigns  can  be  as  high  as  3,000  CFAF.  One  of  the  two  Bankass  SVPP 
veterinarians indicated that complete clinical treatment varies from 1,500 to 9,000 per head of cattle and 
400 to 500 CFAF for small ruminants. This is very expensive for a herd of animals. 
To avoid paying these costs, stock raisers may vaccinate only a portion (for example, 60 percent) of their 
animals,  believing  that  this  will  be  sufficient  to  protect  the  rest  of  the  herd.  Because  people  are  not 
vaccinating completely, other diseases have sprung up that were rare before. 
One official recommended that, with donor support, it is beneficial to provide vaccinations free of charge 
initially.  He feels the solution is to gradually raise the subsidized price and let the herders pay an increasing 
share of the real price, once they begin to realize the value of the practice. This value is now recognized 
in L4G core areas by its impact on herd mortality. Once this occurs, the price the stock raisers pay can 
be used to pay the VAs and replenish the stock of vaccines. 
Lack of Credit Access for SVPPs 
SVPP vets reported that L4G never followed-up on its plans to link the vets to sources of credit to finance 
vaccination campaigns. L4G did, however, organize two days of “Café-Finance” meetings in November 
2018  in  which  banks  and  microfinance  institutions  (MFIs)  met  with  POs  and  presented  their  financial 
products, but little progress was achieved beyond this point. 
Lack of Awareness 
The SVPPs and VAs indicated that there is continued lack of awareness of the value of vaccination among 
many herders reportedly contributes to the lack of willingness to pay for vaccinations. In addition, there 
can be a lack of understanding of the importance of having multiple vaccinations, in the correct order. The 
isolation of many villages, and the general lack of transportation for the population, results in this lack of 
awareness. As a result, farmers may not follow the correct order of vaccination or may only vaccinate 
part of the herd to avoid paying taxes. 
Limited Access to and Availability of Services 
The evaluation team heard from multiple respondents that there are not enough accessible vaccination 
parks,  especially  those  suitable  for  small  ruminants.  Those  that  do  exist  often  do  not  meet  minimal 
standards. The current instability has meant that existing parks are no longer maintained and some are 
badly damaged. One head of veterinary services suggests building vaccination parks in some new localities 
to avoid long-distance travel. This would be especially useful in view of the current insecurity in many 
parts of the Mopti region, especially the Bankass and Koro circles. In addition to terrorist activity, there 
is a good deal of banditry, and stock raisers fear losing their herds if they have to travel far for vaccinations. 
Several officials asserted that the conservation of veterinary products, especially vaccines, is a challenge. 
The  lack  of  cold  chain  equipment  for  vaccine  storage  and  solar  panels  to  power  this  equipment  is 
particularly notable in the villages given that VAs must often travel long distances (up to 160 kilometers) 
to obtain vaccines. One proposal would be to obtain refrigerators fueled by solar panels. In FGDs, this 

13 

was confirmed by the VAs themselves, who claimed to have insufficient vaccination materials, for example 
syringes and coolers. 

“To further improve local services, it is necessary to provide stations with solar refrigerators and freezers 
to ensure the conservation of veterinary products so that people who travel 60 to 100 kilometers to come 
to Bankass can stock up there directly. This saves enormous time and resources and makes it possible to 
give adequate treatment on time and help reduce mortality.” (SVPP) 

Training and Availability of VAs 
The evaluation team heard repeatedly that the number of VAs needs to be increased, even in Bankass and 
Koro, where they are reportedly still insufficient in number to cover the whole circle. For example, a 
senior  official  in  Bankass  stated  that  a  major  obstacle  to  vaccination  activities  is  the  lack  of  private 
veterinarians in the localities to ensure effective vaccination, coupled with an insufficient number of trained 
VAs to support them. 

“We think it was a very good thing to have brought these auxiliaries closer to the stock raisers. But it 
should be noted that auxiliaries are also insufficient.” (Government official) 

In this light, he noted that VAs require much time and effort to visit villages in the circle during and outside 
the vaccination campaigns and that, ideally, there should be at least five VAs in each commune. 
In addition to an inadequate number of VAs, there is an issue of the inadequacy of their training and skills, 
compounded by how the VAs were selected. Government officials expressed their opinions as follows: 

“Trained  auxiliary  agents  [VAs]  do  not  have  the  required  knowledge.  They  do  not  manage  to  do  the 
activities as they should. There are also agents who are not operational at all.” (Government official) 
“[L4G] should have called on agents who were qualified enough to improve the vaccination coverage rate, 
like graduates of IFP.” (Government official) 
“The  choice  of  auxiliaries  was  made  by  the  agents  of  the  town  hall.  The  choice  was  more  political.” 
(Government official) 
“At first, the mayors who made the choice of auxiliaries thought that after the training, these people would 
continue to do the activities and it would be a job for them forever, but that is not the case.” (Government 
official) 
“The activity chose two youths in each village and trained them in preliminary care. But after observation 
with injections and others, it was clear that they were not qualified enough to do it. Therefore, the best 
option is to choose people who are involved with the field. Unfortunately, the program did not do what 
was best regarding that.” (Government official) 
“[L4G-trained VAs] do not have all the necessary technical skills to ensure the application of good and 
adequate practices. This is not limited to vaccination work, but also includes treatment of sick animals.” 
(Government official) 

Observers of the VAs, including the two L4G SVPP veterinarians, indicate that most of the VAs were not 
graduates  of  the  IFP  in  Bankass,  or  other  similar  technical  schools,  but  rather  were  chosen  by  local 
politicians and administrators. In addition to formal training, the graduates of IFP would have had four 
years of experience in the field. They reported in KIIs that only a few of the initial group of L4G-trained 
VAs were graduates of the IFP.  In addition, some of those receiving L4G training were illiterate, and many 
of  those  that  were  literate  were  not  educated  beyond  the  9th  grade  diploma.  Some  stock  raisers 
themselves  have  complained  that  the  VAs  were  only  trained  in  primary  treatment,  deworming,  and 
vaccination, without much knowledge of the various diseases their animals have. This was echoed by one 
of  the  former  L4G  activity  agents  as  well  who  indicated  that  the  training  should  be  deepened  and 
lengthened, particularly in how to diagnose and treat certain diseases. 

14 

The lack of skills and training of the initial group of VAs led to the result that only a portion of the trained 
VAs were operational by the end of the L4G activity, compounding the problem of limited availability of 
VAs. It was widely noted in both KIIs and FGDs that the VAs have never functioned at full strength, a 
point confirmed by the SVPP vets and state veterinary service officials. Of the 76 originally trained, a large 
number were never operational and at activity end only 23 were in place in their villages, including 14 in 
Bankass and nine in Koro. 
Table 6 shows the number of VAs trained, operating, and working with SVPP vets in Bankass and Koro 
circles toward the end of the activity as reported by Fraym. The numbers in Table 7 roughly corroborate 
the ET’s own findings confirming that a significant attrition has occurred among trained VAs, both in terms 
of the total number who remain operating and the number who remain operating with SVVP private vets. 

Table 6: Presence of Veterinary Auxiliaries in Bankass and Koro Circles under L4G 
Number of VAs 

Number of VAs 

Trained 

Number of VAs 

Operating 

Working with SVPP 

Circle 

Bankass 
Koro 
Total 
Source: Fraym report “High-Level Analysis of Animal Health in Target Communities before and During L4G Activities,” citing 
L4G report “Mali Livestock for Growth (L4G) Diagnostic Report on Private Veterinary Services of Proximity.” 

49 
27 
76 

12 
15 
27 

Vets 
12 
6 
18 

According to the SVPPs and state veterinary services officials, a factor contributing to this attrition rate 
was  that  the  selection  of  VAs  was  not  done  in  a  participatory  manner  and  did  not  involve  the  SVPP 
veterinary agents nor the state veterinary service. (This was never indicated as an issue by DT Global, nor 
did it provide any explanation for this practice.) Most of the operational VAs were graduates of the IFP. 
A regional director asserted that regulations prohibit using unqualified personnel, and that VAs should be 
graduates of an agro-pastoral school such as the IFP. 
Another factor in the attrition is that an SVPP reported that he did not make the selection of the VAs he 
would be expected to supervise. 

“The bad part of the L4G activity was the selection of auxiliaries. The selection of auxiliaries was poorly 
made by politicians. In the beginning, we were asked to make a list of people capable of ensuring the 
vaccination and treatment of animals in the field. We made a list, but ultimately the activity gave this task 
to  politicians.  These  politicians  also  chose  people  who  have  never  held  a  syringe  and  who  have  no 
knowledge in terms of farming. We knew many people who have the competence to do the job and who 
already worked with us long before the activity. There are also young people from IFP who can do these 
tasks well.  In the context of the activity, the whole problem lay only in the choice of auxiliaries.” (SVPP) 
He goes on to say that they continue to rely on the VAs that the activity trained and put at their disposal, 
but  only  12  are  now  functional  in  six  municipalities,  because  a  majority  of  the  initial  group  were  not 
qualified. Another problem this SVPP points out is that while the selection criteria are the main source of 
non-functionality of VAs, another problem is the lack of respect of the agreement between agents and 
VAs. 

“But L4G never reacted whereas it had to bring us together and find a solution to the issue.” (SVPP) 

In response to a question about continuing the activities of the auxiliaries after L4G, one public official 
believes they can be sustained. However, he argues that the number of trained and active VAs is currently 
too low, and that there are not enough approved (mandated) agents to supervise them. In addition, he 
stated that the VAs require ongoing training, noting “It is above all necessary to motivate those auxiliaries and 
give them refresher training.” 
 

 

15 

State Oversight and Coordination with L4G 
In order to sustain the benefits of the SVPP/VA activities, it will be important to involve the government 
veterinary  services  in  Bankass  and  Koro.  However,  the  evaluation  team  heard  that  there  is  a  lack  of 
vaccination monitoring and lack of control by state agents, which puts the sustainability of the L4G SVPP 
program at risk. 
While this is partially a function of their lack of financial resources, it is also due to the lack of buy-in to 
the program by the government veterinary services. 
Evaluation interviews carried out with state functionaries and technical service officers revealed that they 
perceive  L4G  to  have  neglected  to  coordinate  with  them  sufficiently  during  implementation.  This  is  a 
common problem in development activities that seek to avoid bureaucratic delays while trying to achieve 
accomplishments on the ground, often in difficult circumstances. However, neglecting the state technical 
services in this case, particularly the veterinary service, was clearly seriously resented by key respondents. 
For example, one head of veterinary services indicated that even as head of the service he did not have 
any role to play in the L4G activity. 

“This is because in the beginning, the activity promised us to hire young graduates who were going to work 
as auxiliaries, but in the end, it was the opposite. So, I was disappointed and had no commitment to the 
activity….Despite  the  fact  that  they  gave  me  some  materials  in  the  beginning  of  the  activity,  I  was 
disappointed by their approach. And since then I have not had any contact with L4G.” (Government 
official) 

Another head of the veterinary services felt that the sharing of vaccines and vaccination materials should 
pass  through  the  state  technical  service  for  quality  control  before  being  administered  to  animals.  He 
emphatically stated that, “If you undertake an activity and you do not engage in synergy of actions with the 
technical services of the State involved in the field, I would say that it will fail at 95 percent.” 
One way that the government veterinary services could have been involved is participation in the selection, 
training, and supervision of the SVPPs and VAs. One veterinary service head stated that L4G indicated at 
the beginning that there would be a tripartite partnership in place between the veterinary service, the 
circle council, and the SVPP/VA system to carry out supervision. However, he indicated that from the 
beginning of activities, L4G hired people from outside the country to train the auxiliaries and that was a 
loss for the state and for the veterinary service. He claimed that competent human resources are to be 
found in Mali to conduct training of VAs and carry out vaccinations. However, L4G used an expert from 
Niger  to  train  the  VAs,  which  annoyed  some  of  the  Malian  technical  staff  and  set  the  stage  for  the 
inadequate buy-in to the program by government agencies. 

“I would not say that their strategy does not work, but if we work together, we have to make the right 
decisions together and examine the relevant things together, which has not been the case with them.” 
(Government official) 

The  government  agencies  are  responsible  for  collecting  routine  statistics  on  vaccination.  One  official 
criticized one of the SVPPs, indicating that it had been six months since he had received any vaccination 
reports from him. Another person, a rural development advisor, also felt left out. 

“They never called us to attend a meeting or anything else of the activity. Whereas we just wanted to be 
a witness to what they are doing. They forget that we are a major player. Even in the documents of the 
activity, there is a place which is reserved for the regional council in order to supervise what they are doing, 
but nothing happened.” (Government official) 

The  presidents  of  the  circle  councils  also  indicated  that  they  were  also  kept  apart  from  activity 
implementation. 

16 

“As chairman of the circle council, I have had no specific role to play in the implementation of the L4G 
activity, but we were invited to its launching and to its closing ceremonies. L4G did not involve us in its 
achievements, so we didn’t collaborate much. We waited for them to come to us first, because we are the 
entry point, but they did not do it.” (Government official) 

One head of veterinary service summed up the opinions of the officials who were interviewed: 

“From  now  on  the  activity  must  review  its  collaboration  with  the  technical  services  of  the  State.  It  is 
necessary that the competent technical services at the local level be involved for the areas which fall within 
their competence and district. And that it hires people who have the necessary skills to carry out the tasks 
of auxiliaries. As for technical training, it must promote national talent who have the necessary skills to 
provide training in terms of animal health.” (Government official) 

CONCLUSIONS 
•  The L4G activity succeeded in devising and putting into place an SVPP in the Koro and Bankass circles 
of the Mopti region that involved three accredited private veterinarians and 76 VAs. Despite intentions 
to  expand  this  model  to  other  circles  of  the  Mopti  region,  L4G  was  unable  to  extend  the  SVPP 
program by activity end. 

•  The network of VAs backed by SVPPs was greatly appreciated by beneficiaries, easy to access, rapid 
in response, and affordable. The VAs covered their areas well and provided all veterinary services, 
including vaccination, deworming, disease treatment, and other advisory services. Although VAs were 
only  given  basic  training,  villagers  felt  that  VAs  provided  quality  services  and  provided  valuable 
information on the value of vaccination. 

•  While L4G intended in the beginning to choose VAs from qualified graduates of the IFP in Bankass or 
other similar schools, SVPPs and local government officials claimed that it allowed local politicians in 
the administrative circles or communes to push forward many of their favored candidates. This led to 
a large number of unqualified VAs, some of which never functioned in their communities. Although 
L4G in its final activity report continued to tout the training of 76 VAs, at activity end the evaluation 
team found only 23 active in their areas. 

•  The low number of SVPP vets and trained and qualified VAs, together with L4G’s lack of expansion to 
other circles in Mopti region and to the Timbuktu region, limit the overall vaccination and animal care 
coverage the SVPP program has been and will be able to achieve, despite considerable improvements 
in both over L4G’s lifetime. These low numbers of veterinary service providers, combined with the 
historic  high  attrition  rate  among  VAs,  is  an  impediment  to    the  long-term  sustainability  of  the 
considerable improvements in veterinary care and coverage achieved during L4G’s lifetime. 
In spite of equipping the SVPP veterinarians with essential veterinary starter kits and lending them 
financing  for  the  first  two  vaccination  campaigns,  L4G  was  never  able  to  successfully  link  the 
veterinarians with bank credit lines for succeeding campaigns. The cessation of most bank lending in 
Mopti region due to insecurity is probably the major reason for this, but L4G failed to come up with 
an alternative credit mechanism. 

•  According to beneficiaries and service providers, there is no shortage of vaccines available for use in 
the villages. The VAs obtain their supplies in nearby towns, but their ability to store them is extremely 
limited.  The  SVPPs  still  have  sufficient  cold  storage  in  their  offices.  Notwithstanding,  there  exist 
ongoing challenges related to ensuring that SVPP vets and VAs possess the necessary equipment, in 
particular cooling equipment for vaccines, to provide quality services and prevent vaccine spoilage. 

•  The  most  important  challenge  to  full  vaccination  coverage  is  the  insecurity  and  inter-community 
violence. L4G VAs and SVPPs, as well as other private veterinarians and auxiliaries, are hampered in 
their ability to reach insecure or isolated villages, and herders are afraid to mass their animals to take 
them to vaccination parks. Many herds have been sold off or taken south to safer areas. 

•  L4G  failed  to  collaborate  closely  with  relevant  state  regional  and  circle  veterinary  officials  in  its 
intervention  areas.  This  caused  resentment  among  local  government  stakeholders.  While  the 

• 

17 

veterinary services recognize the value of L4G, they feel it should have been involved far more in 
activity training activities and coordination on the ground. They have, moreover, serious concerns 
about supervision of the SVPPs and VAs and quality control of vaccines and disease treatment. 

•  The L4G SVPP model is viable and appreciated by beneficiaries, but it requires financial resources to 
continue at its current level, let alone expand into new areas in the Mopti and Timbuktu regions. This 
implies further donor funding. 

• 

RECOMMENDATIONS 
•  USAID could consider implementing a follow-on livestock activity in Mopti and Timbuktu where stock 
raising and animal fattening are such an important component of household welfare. Obviously, this 
will depend on the return of security in these regions. 
In order to increase population access to vaccines  and medicines, future activities  should  support 
private  veterinarians  and  VAs  by  equipping  new  nearby  supply  points  with  refrigerators,  freezers, 
medicines, and thermos-tolerant vaccines. This will be important as the initial equipment provided by 
L4G deteriorates. Maintaining the cold chain is essential to sustaining private and public veterinary 
care and vaccination campaigns in Mali. If state resources are not sufficient, donor support will be 
necessary, whether by USAID or through a collaborative effort by donor agencies. 

•  Credit linkages between SVPPs and local banks need to be prioritized and established by any future 
activities.  Contacts with banks were initiated in the Mopti region during L4G, but there was no follow 
through.  The  private  veterinarians  need  to  finance  their  vaccination  campaigns  and  under  normal 
conditions can reimburse these bank loans. Of course, currently banks have cut back lending even to 
agriculturalists, but with a return to security they can begin to lend again. Given declining security 
conditions, alternative credit sources should be explored, particularly NGOs. 

•  With  its  experience  in  financial  intermediation,  the  Association  of  Professionals  in  Financial 
Intermediation  of  Mali  (APIFIMA)  could  be  called  upon  to  develop  loan  applications  for  these 
veterinarians and provide advice in reimbursement. The state will need to provide more resources 
for its own agents. This should be a part of any new USAID or other donor effort in the livestock 
sector. 

•  At the same time, VAs should be assisted with a start-up fund to acquire their first stock of supplies, 
as well as some measure of transportation assistance.  In the absence of L4G, this will probably require 
further  donor  resources,  since  this  is  a  private  system.  If  USAID  chooses  to  finance  a  follow-on 
livestock activity in Mali, it should include such a fund in expansion activities in Mopti and Timbuktu. 
It  will  be  necessary  to  increase  the  involvement  of  the  state  veterinary  services  at  the  various 
administrative levels through specific agreements with a future SVPP model activity. Such an activity 
will  need  to  be  donor  supported  at  first,  but  closer  collaboration  and  a  less-abrupt  phase-out  of 
USAID-funded activities could improve the sustainability of the system. 

•  At a minimum, the state veterinary services should be involved in the selection of future VAs to avoid 
favoritism and political interference in their selection and to respect essential qualifications for their 
positions and duties. 

• 

 

 

18 

EVALUATION QUESTION 2 

4.2 
From the beneficiaries’ perspective, did their access to the co-located introduction of new 
fattening  technologies  and  vaccination  programming  improve  beneficiary  productivity, 
access to markets, and incomes? How did the co-location contribute to the improvements? 
BACKGROUND 
L4G sought to improve fodder and feed for livestock by identifying the best practices already in place in 
Mali and then introducing and spreading them in the activity intervention areas of the Koro and Bankass 
circles. L4G also sought to identify and build relationships with risk-tolerant forage producers to adopt 
new techniques from other areas. This included the identification and introduction of seed technologies 
that would improve fodder production and help roll them out to the wider population. 
One approach L4G took was helping animal fatteners cut costs by producing their own forage and feed, 
enriching  hay  with  urea,  and  learning  farm  silage  production.  Bottom-up  investment  would  then  keep 
fattening costs reasonable. In the L4G animal fattening training, participants learned the basic norms and 
standards for market delivery, buyer preferences and exigencies, and innovative marketing plans to sell 
their animals at peak price periods. According to the L4G 2016 Annual Report, the methods for animal 
fattening that L4G promoted increased the number of annual animal fattening cycles possible from one or 
two to three or four. The L4G-assisted fatteners were reported to be selling livestock with greater mass 
than animals fattened by traditional means. 
In FY 2016, L4G pursued initiatives to sensitize herders on improved animal fattening techniques. L4G 
organized several training sessions for POs in new communes of the Koro and Bankass circles on three 
topics that contributed to animal fattening: techniques for enriching hay and straw with urea, fabrication 
of  multi-nutritional  licking  blocks  (MLNBs)  for  livestock,  and  forage  management.  With  the  limited 
agricultural land available, developing dual-purpose fodder crops was determined to be a sound strategy 
to meet the nutritional needs of livestock in Bankass and Koro. Improving the production and productivity 
of these fodder crops would allow producers to generate a surplus sufficient to be marketed to other 
livestock owners, earning the household an income while meeting household nutritional needs. 
One  goal  was  to  assure  that  improved  fattening  activities  were  co-located  with  increased  access  to 
veterinary services, through the SVPP activities, as occurred in the Bankass and Koro circles. In April 2016, 
L4G expanded into seven communes in the Bandiagara, Djenné, and Mopti circles and a select number of 
activities  in  six  communes  in  the  Timbuktu  region.  While  this  expansion  included  improving  animal 
fattening activities, it does not appear that expanded veterinary services through the SVPP model were 
successfully implanted in these new areas in either region, as noted above under the findings for EQ 1. 
Consequently, co-location of veterinary and fattening activities was focused primarily in the Koro and 
Bankass circles. 
In the third year of L4G activity (FY 2017), L4G established FFSs, which involved using community-based 
lead farmers as trainers of neighboring farmers. These individuals demonstrated and taught practical skills 
to POs and their member livestock farmers as well as dual crop and/or forage farmers. The FY 2017 
annual  report  indicates  that  37  FFS  demonstration  sites  were  established,  with  each  L4G  field  agent 
responsible for mentoring and monitoring the activities of two to three sites. There were 18 FFS sites for 
demonstrating forage production (i.e., cowpea, groundnuts, and an indigenous grass) and 19 FFS sites for 
demonstrating best practices for animal fattening. 
In the fourth year of L4G implementation, the major means to disseminate information on new techniques 
and technologies in animal fattening continued to be through FFSs. The L4G FY 2018 Report indicates that 
L4G collaborated with 529 POs to establish 45 new animal fattening demonstration sites in Mopti region 
circles (16 in Bankass, seven in Koro, four in Mopti, three in Bandiagara, and five in Djenné) and 10 in 
Timbuktu region circles (five in Diré, three in Niafunké, and two in Goundam). A cost-sharing model was 
used in which L4G and POs agreed to co-finance the supplies, equipment, and materials, with the POs 

19 

providing  roughly  70  percent  of  the  total  investment,  including  all  animals  used  for  demonstration 
purposes. This same year L4G trained 650 lead farmers at these 45 FFS animal fattening demonstrations 
who in turn taught the techniques learned to 590 POs with 31,912 member farmers (20,987 women and 
11,065 men). In theory, each lead farmer was to train at least 25 others who would in turn train another 
25  animal  fatteners.  Because  of  insecurity  and  resulting  governmental  restrictions  on  motorcycle 
movement, however, the actual number of participants decreased to about 32,000 from the original target 
of 101,000. 
Other  activities  promoted  by  L4G  in  its  target  areas  focused  on  support  to  livestock  fattening  and 
production methods, including enhanced production of fodder and local forage crops, MNLBs, and regular 
off-take of animals from herds. 
In L4G’s last year of operation (FY 2019), the FFS remained its primary mechanism to disseminate best 
practices in animal fattening. During that year, L4G created an additional 69 FFS sites, which included 28 
sites for cattle fattening in Mopti region, five sites for cattle fattening in Timbuktu region, 28 sites for sheep 
fattening in Mopti, and eight sites for sheep fattening in Timbuktu. In addition, L4G conducted information 
campaigns by radio and through mobile phone service providers and continued to promote the cultivation 
of dual-use fodder crops such as cowpea, groundnut, sorghum, millet, and moringa. 
FINDINGS 
Findings are based on 18 FGDs, 10 in the Koro and Bankass circles, four in other circles of Mopti, and 
four in Timbuktu. These findings are augmented by findings from 18 KIIs. 
Animal Fattening Training in Farmer Field Schools 
All PO members included in the 18 FGDs, both in co-located and non-co-located circles, had participated 
in the FFSs. All POs had previously practiced fattening but claimed to have learned new techniques from 
the FFSs. Normally, a few members of each PO (usually two) attended the FFS and were then expected 
to pass on the training to others in their PO, as well as on to others in their own and surrounding villages. 
Formal extension of this training to at least an initial group of 25 more persons was the objective, but this 
cascade training appears to have fallen short of expectations for lack of per diems and difficulty of travel. 
It was probably known to these trainee leaders that no per diem was forthcoming, but they hoped for 
better turnout in any case. Nevertheless, extension of these teachings seems to have occurred among PO 
members, since all FGD participants revealed solid knowledge of the full set of new techniques. 
The basic fattening techniques taught in the FFSs were recalled by the members of all 18 POs visited, and 
included choosing the right animal for fattening (breed, age, weight), use of a zoometric tape for measuring 
animal weight and gains, treating hay with urea for higher digestibility and nutritional value for animals, 
feed  rationing  when  fattening  animals,  producing  MNLBs,  understanding  animal  health  care  practices, 
techniques  for  forest  harvest  and  conservation,  and  prophylactic  guidance  for  preventive  vaccinations 
against diseases and other treatments. When asked for additional techniques learned, PO members most 
commonly identified necessary quarantine and treatment for purchased animals, vaccination, use of fodder 
and dual-use crops (human and animal consumption), and use of a measuring tape to gauge animal size 
during fattening. They also occasionally mentioned the use of an operating account to track expenses and 
profitability. All POs, moreover, also mentioned receiving seed to produce fodder and dual-use crops. 
Responses indicated a high degree of satisfaction with the business knowledge gained from the training, in 
addition  to  the  specific  new  fattening  techniques  acquired.  They  indicated  that  one  of  the  important 
business lessons taught was how to shorten the fattening to an optimal period, assuming the other feeding 
techniques were followed. They recognized that they had not been doing fattening efficiently, keeping the 
animals around the homestead for far longer than necessary to make a reasonable profit. Nor did they 
previously have a method for tracking and calculating costs and gross profit margin for their animals, until 
L4G gave them training in what these beneficiaries called the “operating account.” 

20 

To examine the additional benefits of co-location of the SVPPs and FFSs, the evaluation team held FGDs 
outside  of  the  co-located  circles.  PO  members  in  these  non-co-located  FGDs  demonstrated  a  similar 
recall and understanding of the concepts as those in Koro and Bankass. As mentioned, these POs had also 
been exposed to the techniques taught in the FFSs of L4G. 
Participation in the FFS was not only effective in teaching participant farmers new fattening methods, it 
also helped them understand better how fattening can help them earn more from their animal raising 
activities, as the following quotes illustrate: 

“And that is how many of us understood the training. So, we understand a lot about the period during 
which we have to fatten and then when we sell, we can know how much we spent and how much we 
have as profit.” (PO member, Koro circle) 
“These  items  were  given  for  demonstrations  in  order  to  know  the  added  value  of  these  different 
technologies and to develop an operating account to see the profitability of the different technologies.” 
(PO member, Koro circle) 
“With training and support of the project, we learned a lot in terms of fattening. We continue to practice 
these techniques, because they bring us a lot of income.” (PO member, Bankass circle) 

POs visited included some that had received previous training in fattening techniques and others that had 
not. In the first case, members of one PO indicated that they had learned valuable new information and 
techniques despite past trainings, with one member remarking: 

“I told the agents that they had nothing to teach us because this is an activity we already know. But after 
some sessions, I realized that I had a lot to learn. Techniques for selecting animals for fattening, making 
the licking blocks, improving straw with urea, post-harvest management, and estimating the live weight of 
animals.” (PO member, Djenné circle) 

In the POs without previous instruction in fattening techniques, members were effusive about the valuable 
new techniques and skills they had learned. Table 7 shows some of the benefits of the FFSs mentioned by 
FGD participants. 

Table 7: Skills Learned at Farmer Field Schools Mentioned by FGD Participants 

Type of Skill Learned 

How to grow and improve fodder 
Fattening techniques (i.e., timing of fattening) 
Estimating weight of animals 
Marketing techniques and contracts 
Calculating profits 
Ability to fatten more heads 
Note: Out of 18 FGDs. 

Number of Mentions 

17 
17 
7 
7 
7 
15 

PO members observed that, although they had been doing fattening prior to L4G, they now realized that 
the FFS showed them the professional, agribusiness way to do it. Said a PO member from Diré circle, 
“This is really something new for us, because we didn’t know it before. We continue to apply everything that the 
project has taught us.” 
Other stakeholders—including local government officials, SVPP veterinarians, VAs, and former L4G field 
agents—universally expressed positive perceptions of the FFSs and the value of the fattening techniques 
taught there. The following quotes are typical of the views expressed by these stakeholders: 

“It has greatly helped stock raisers. In the past, people practiced activities but they had no experience of 
it. But thanks to L4G, farmers are able to distinguish the difference and usefulness of chemicals, having 
the experience of new techniques and even the time that it takes to feed animals.” (VA Koro circle) 

21 

“It is very useful to do fattening because it allows producing good quality of animals and providing healthy 
meat and then generating incomes. If one succeeds in managing well his fattening income, he will make 
his own business.” (Local government official) 
“In my opinion, when we talk about fattening, we are also talking about income. When this income is 
acquired, there is surely an improvement in living conditions. This means that the program has served a 
lot, and so far, others continue to use the techniques learned through the program.” (SVPP) 

Issues with the Cascade Training Model 
Although  highly  satisfied  overall  with  the  fattening  training  received  in  the  FFSs,  PO  participants  also 
identified a number of ways in which FFSs might be improved. Among the most common recommendations 
included offering more training of the same type closer to more villages, reducing travel time and distance, 
including more people in the training, and extending the length of the training in each case. The first two 
of these recommendations, however, do not account fully for L4G’s cascading strategy in which these 
initial  training  of  trainers  (TOT)  sessions  would  lead  to  a  cascading  down  of  training  across  multiple 
villages, thus reducing the travel time and distance for all participants. 
At  the  same  time,  however,  embedded  in  the  recommendation  to  increase  the  number  of  training 
participants is the recognition that initially training a small number of people risks knowledge loss if those 
people trained either do not fulfill their cascading role or are unable to grasp the fattening techniques well 
enough to communicate them to others. In other words, the number initially trained would be much 
greater with better retention and the need for subsequent cascade training reduced. The following two 
quotes illustrate this point. 

“It will be necessary to carry out training in our own village where we can mobilize more people for the 
demonstration sessions. Because during sessions at the central level where several villages meet, there are 
only one or two representatives per village and during the feedback session in their own villages. There is 
a risk of information loss because the only delegate is not able to retain or record all the information given 
his level of education.” (PO member, Tere) 
“If the project can increase the number of participants or come to us for local training, it would be even 
better to avoid loss of information.” (PO member, Logon) 

Another issue brought up in multiple FGDs was that PO members considered the per diem for the FFS 
training and the lack of a per diem for the cascading of training “entirely inadequate.” The male Ende Toro 
PO members indicated that the project (or a future similar project) needs to review the per diem given 
for both initial and cascading training because: 

“They are very insufficient to cover what we spend. We want the per diem to be given according to the distance 
of the participants’ localities. Of course, we go to learn but we leave our families for three days when we do 
not work as well. Who will feed our families? After that, we must plan for another per diem for the other 
members, because many do not come because of that.” (PO Member Ende Toro) 

This issue clearly limited the educational value of the planned cascade training sessions supposed to occur 
as PO representatives returned to their villages and trained their fellow PO members or PO members in 
neighboring villages. What emerged from the FGDs was that the plan for cascading of training fell well 
short  of  its  intended  reach,  although  the  PO  members  could  not  provide  specific  numbers.  The  PO 
representatives  that  had  attended  the  initial  FFS  trainings  all  indicated  they  had  informed  other  PO 
members, but not much beyond that. 
For example, the women of the female PO in Koporona indicated that L4G chose 10 women from their 
PO to attend the FFS training. On return to their village, these women did pass on the teachings, but not 
in formal training sessions: 

22 

“Since people are not stable, we  communicated one by one to  transmit the information.  Even  during 
ceremonies, we shared information with everyone.” (PO member, Koporona) 

The mixed PO in Koporona also noted issues with the cascading model, particularly related to the lack of 
a per diem: 

“When a person goes to training in Koro, comes back, and asks people to come for the feedback session, 
people are not motivated. They say there is no per diem to receive, so they do not come. At the beginning 
we even called mayors and chiefs and they all stopped coming to the trainings, because we don’t give 
money.” (PO member, Koporona) 

In  the  latter  case,  the  cascading  training  model  was  not  working  well,  not  because  of  the  PO 
representatives chosen to attend the FFS training, but again because of the lack of per diem. 

“The problem is that the villagers refuse to come and listen to him. They say there is no per diem to 
receive.  I think we should plan local trainings. They must be held in our village. And that we plan to have 
food, because it is not easy to go on an empty stomach for training. There is also the fact that money 
motivates people. We have also seen examples of trainers here who do not give training correctly without 
the per diem.” (PO member) 

The  per  diem  issue  came  up  again  and  again,  both  in  all  of  the  PO  FGDs  but  also  in  KIIs  with  local 
government officials. In Bankass circle, for example, government officials reiterated the need for the L4G 
to improve its training conditions, particularly the transportation allowance and per diem. A former L4G 
field agent in Mopti also identified this as an important impediment to cascade training remarking that 
“During the feedback sessions, it is not easy to mobilize the participants, because there is no food catering or 
appropriate lodging at the village level. The establishment of lodging at the village level or to provide food can help 
mobilize more people during training sessions on secondary sites.” 
A final concern with the L4G cascading model was raised by a regional government official Bankass who 
noted that, in addition to the lack of sufficient per diems during the training, L4G agents did not establish 
a  supervisory  link  with  the  state  technical  services  (SLPIAs).  He  believes  that  the  FFS  must  have 
representatives at the local levels. The local SLPIAs have personnel there for that, so they should have 
had  representatives  at  the  training.  This  would  also  have  helped  facilitate  the  cascading  of  training.  
Sustainability may also have been compromised by this lack of collaboration. 
Gains in Productivity, Access to Markets, and Incomes 
EQ 2 refers specifically to whether there were beneficiary gains made under L4G in livestock productivity, 
access to markets, and incomes. 
An L4G-commissioned survey of 58 animal fatteners in 2019 provides information on the profitability of 
fattening activities in the L4G activity areas. As seen in Table 8, the fatteners earned an average gross 
margin of 135,530 CFAF per head of cattle, 80 percent higher than the purchase price, and an average 
gross  margin  of  41,596  CFAF  per  head  of  sheep,  115  percent  higher  than  the  purchase  price.  If  the 
fatteners respect the 3-4 month fattening period with three cycles per year, this could provide an annual 
income of 406,590 CFAF for three cycles of cattle fattening and 124,788 CFAF for three cycles of sheep 
fattening. This all depends on having the resources to feed the animals correctly and keep them free of 
disease. 
 

 

23 

Table 8: Prices for Cattle and Sheep Entering and Leaving Fattening Cycles (2019) 

Type of 
Animal 

Number of 
Enterprises 

Number 

of 

Livestock 

Average 

Acquisition 
Price (CFAF 
thousands) 

Average Sales 
Price (CFAF 
thousands) 

Gross Margin 

(CFAF 

thousands) 

Percent 
Increase 
in Value 

Cattle 
Sheep 
Source: “Ruminant Livestock Fattening under L4G: Findings of a Sample Survey and Recommendations for Future 
Programming.” Holtzman and Sidibé, September 2019.  Gross margin does not include costs of fodder or other inputs. 

168.8 
36.2 

304.3 
77.8 

135.5 
41.6 

182 
216 

21 
33 

80% 
115% 

The evaluation team asked FGD participants about their fattening activities before and after their training 
in FFSs and their income earned. Table 9 shows responses from 11 FGDs to the questions: “Do you now 
earn more money selling fattened animals than before the training? Can you estimate how much more for 
different animal types?” 

Table 9: Reports from FGDs with 11 POs Concerning Increased Prices for Sales of 

Fattened Animals After L4G FFS Training 

POs/Circles 

Increased Prices in CFAF 

(Thousands) 

Co-Located Circles/Mopti 

Cattle 

-- 

75-100 

-- 
-- 

25-50 

50-100 
100-125 

-- 

75-90 
100 

100-150 

Sheep 

10-50 

25 

10-15 
25-35 
5-20 

30-60 
5-20 

30-60 
30-50 
10-50 
30-50 

Non Co-Located Circles/Mopti 

Non Co-Located Circles/Timbuktu 

PO 1 
PO 2 
PO 3 
PO 4 
PO 5 

PO 1 
PO 2 

PO 1 
PO 2 
PO 3 
PO 4 

In all cases, these responses suggest that PO members were receiving substantially more for the sales of 
their cattle and sheep after adopting improved fattening approaches in the FFSs. However, it does not 
appear that profits were higher for FGD participants in the co-located circles than in the other circles 
without activity co-location. FGD participants did not provide quantitative measures of weight gains or 
profits, but they often provided purchase and sales prices. 
These qualitative impressions are confirmed in a survey of beneficiary farmers who were asked whether 
respondents felt they were making more money from sales of livestock after L4G than before the activity. 
As seen in Table 10, 90 percent of respondents answered in the affirmative. 

Table 10: Percent of Livestock Holders Making More From Sales After L4G 
Cattle 

Sheep 

 
Total selling livestock  
Total who made more money 
Percent who made more 
Source: Final L4G Survey by International Business and Technical Consultants, 2019. 

Goats 

89.4% 

47 
42 

391 
351 
89.8% 

115 
104 
90.4% 

24 

L4G also conducted an endline survey of 528 beneficiary farmers on their perceptions of the activity’s 
impact on income or food supply during the hunger period when crops are growing and not yet harvested 
(May to October). Table 11 shows that 56.1 percent of respondent farmer beneficiaries felt that L4G had 
made a difference in their livelihoods compared to 43.9 percent who did not. 

Table 11: Did L4G Make a Difference in the Hunger Period? 
Percent 

Number 

 
Yes, it made a difference 
No, it did not 
Total 
Source: Final Survey by International Business and Technical Consultants, 2019. 

302 
236 
538 

56.1 
43.9 
100.0 

Table 12 presents the values for four of L4G’s key performance indicators beginning with the baseline in 
FY  2014  through  FY  2018.4  The  four  indicators,  each  disaggregated  by  cattle  and  sheep  (or  small 
ruminants), are: 1) gross margin per head; 2) value of incremental sales due to L4G assistance, 3) value of 
exports, and 4) off-take rate by L4G-assisted POs. A sixth indicator on the occurrence of parasitic and 
contagious livestock diseases was added but was not measured or reported on until FY 2017 (see response 
to EQ 1). 
Data on these indicators were collected in parts of the Koro and Bankass circles only in the baseline study. 
As it expanded to new areas, L4G project included these new zones in its indicator values for that and 
succeeding years. In this way, the indicators do not strictly represent progress in the original communes 
of the Koro and Bankass circles, but rather the overall accomplishments of L4G. The results are presented 
in United States (U.S.) dollars, as reported in the L4G annual reports. 

Table 12: L4G Baseline and Annual Indicator Values  

Baseline 
(2014) 

$48 
$41 

$40 
$33 

FY 2017 

FY 2016 

FY 2015 

Indicator 
Gross Margin: Cattle5* 
Gross Margin: Sheep* 
Value of Incremental Sales: Cattle* 
Value of Incremental Sales: Sheep* 
Value of Exports: Cattle* 
Value of Exports: Sheep* 
Offtake Rate: Cattle6** 
Offtake Rate: Small Ruminants** 
*Source: Feed the Future Monitoring System 
**Source: L4G Annual Reports from FY 2015 to FY 2018 (Bankass and Koro circles only at baseline 2014). 
***Sheep only. 

$618,691 
$289,530 
$867,194 
$1,663,373 

$98,369 
$18,531 
$644,395 
$181,780 

$781,257 
$417,453 

$1,038,091 
$703,008 
$735,041 
$353,948 

28.6% 
40.1%*** 

14.5% 
19.9% 

21.0% 
20.5% 

34.9% 
36.9% 

$235 
$64 

$156 
$27 

- 
- 

FY 2018 

$288 
$47 

$1,656,264 
$843,649 
$737,447 

$0 

83.1% 
71.1% 

The results shown in Table 12 broadly confirm the positive KII and FGD findings reported above. From 
the baseline in FY 2014 through FY 2018, gross margins, incremental sales, and offtake rates for cattle and 
sheep (or small ruminants) all showed significant improvements, although with some ups and downs along 
the way for gross margins. The sole exception to this trend is exports of cattle and sheep, which reached 
a peak in FY 2016 only to fall again in succeeding years to settle in FY 2018 at values lower than in the 
baseline. 

                                                 
4 Data for FY 2019 is available, but it is not considered reliable by RFS and is thus not reported in Table 12. 
5 Gross margin is a measure of sales proceeds less input costs and does not take into account labor time. 
6 The off-take rate is the percentage of animals sold or consumed in a year compared to their number at the beginning of the 
year. An improvement in this rate indicates growth in herd size through reproduction and reduced mortality. It represents the 
basic cropping rate for herd livestock and is a measure of herd productivity. 

25 

Beneficiary Access to Markets 
FGDs and KIIs also asked about how POs marketed their livestock.  Responses indicated that PO members 
primarily engage in individual selling in local markets, either by selling to traders at the farm gate or by 
transporting the animals and selling in local markets. About one-half of the POs indicated that they join 
together for group sales. With a single exception, the POs sell their animals at the prevailing market price 
at the time of sale absent a formal sales contract. The exception is the youth livestock platform in Sofara 
in Djenné circle, which acknowledges L4G’s assistance in setting up the contracts. Another PO in Ende 
Toro village in Bankass circle said that L4G attempted to facilitate contact with traders and promoted the 
idea of a contract, but it did not pan out. 
Combined Impact of SVPP and FFS Activities (Co-Location) 
The evaluation team asked PO members and other key informants to place a value on the co-location of 
private  veterinarian  vaccination  campaigns  and  new  fattening  techniques  taught  in  the  FFSs.  Everyone 
recognized the enhanced value of placing both together in the same villages of Koro and Bankass circles, 
which marked the limit of SVPP veterinary activities in a project intervention zone that had established 
FFSs in all areas. They indicated that their animals gained weight faster due to FFS training and remained 
healthier and suffered less mortality as a result of vaccination campaigns and rapid VA animal treatment. 
Due to the qualitative nature of this evaluation, there was no accurate way to measure the impact of this 
interactive  relationship,  except  to  recognize  the  value  of  vaccination  and  disease  treatment,  including 
quarantine of animals purchased for fattening and maintaining the health of animals undergoing fattening 
regimes. The POs recognized the link between vaccination and fattening activities and the value of VAs in 
providing advice to them in general animal health as well as nutrition. In short, FGD participants uniformly 
grasped the value of the two occurring together but could not provide any clear sense of the combined 
impact. 
On the other hand, KIIs were more able to define how these two interventions might produce higher 
level results, as the following quotes indicate. 

“Of course, there is an advantage. Farmers are now selling their peanut and cowpea fodder to livestock 
raisers. This was not the case before the arrival of L4G. In addition, the auxiliary gives them treatment 
and vaccination, and he also provides advisory support. So, stock raisers will have very easy access to 
services without calling upon the state veterinary service. Again, it makes it possible to produce good quality 
animals and healthy meat. So, I think there is a very great advantage in having Farmer Field Schools and 
auxiliaries at the same time and in the same village.” (Government official, Koro circle) 
“The advantages are that before the farmers cultivated their fields and after the harvest threw out the 
fodder. But with L4G they learned its usefulness and finally sold them to fatteners. Then with the training, 
the fatteners got to know the enrichment of straw with urea and the manufacture of licking blocks. So, 
with the usefulness and the use of these foods, the animals are well fed. As far as the auxiliaries are 
concerned, they do the treatment, vaccination, and deworming of animals. So, the presence of farmer field 
schools and veterinary auxiliaries not only maintains the health of the animals but also makes it possible 
to produce good quality animals and healthy meat.” (VA, Koro circle) 
“On the one hand, the new techniques offer a way to producing quality animals for slaughter. It provides 
for quality meat and generates incomes for fatteners. When coupled with the presence of an auxiliary to 
deworm and treat other diseases it can quickly fatten animals and produce greater incomes for the owners. 
In addition, it reduces animal loss during epidemics? (SVPP private veterinarian, Bankass circle) 

Whereas  these  key  informants  could  clearly  articulate  the  advantages  of  co-location  in  theory  and  in 
practical terms, they were not, however, able to provide specific examples of where this occurred in 
actual practice. 
 

 

26 

Limiting Factors 
The evaluation team asked PO members and other stakeholders for recommendations on how future 
livestock activities, such as L4G, might be improved. Not surprisingly, many recommendations involved 
the provision of additional resources, including financial assistance, animals, storage warehouses, feedlots, 
and equipment. A high-level official in Koro circle validated these many financial aid requests, stating that: 
“The only bottleneck to fattening is the lack of financial means. People like to do the activity, but they can’t afford 
to do it. Sometimes they force themselves to practice fattening, while they don’t have enough to feed the animals.” 
Former field agents at L4G agreed with this assessment by pointing out that insufficient resources are the 
most important in limiting factor in fattening activities followed by insufficient access to the necessary 
products.  They  suggested  that  future  livestock  activities  should  invest  more  in  developing  market 
infrastructure, such as a fattening pen for each PO or a few villages, in addition to a funding component 
to help fatteners fatten and then reimburse loans after selling. It would be especially useful to support 
young graduates who practice a lot of the fattening activities. 
Stakeholder Participation 
Several  stakeholders  again  raised  the  issue  of  a  lack  of  local  participation  in  activity  planning  and 
implementation. In this case, the state technical services in charge of animal production were not involved 
in the FFSs. In most cases, moreover, local administrative authorities say they were not kept abreast of 
activity interventions. Whereas all stakeholders agreed that the FFSs and other livestock support activities 
should be expanded to other areas of Mali, they also largely agreed that such future activities need to 
involve the locals more. In particular, future livestock activities need to improve collaboration with the 
technical services by involving them more in implementation of activities on the ground. 
CONCLUSIONS 
•  The fattening techniques taught in the FFSs were highly valued by participants. They recall all of these 

techniques, most of which were new to them in their fattening activities. 

• 

•  Beneficiaries particularly valued FFS training in the proper selection of animals for fattening, dual-use 
forage crops, fabrication of MLNBs, improvement of hay with urea, development of correct animal 
food rations, and management of forage crops after harvest. 
In the Koro and Bankass circles of the Mopti region, where SVPP/VA services and FFS training were 
co-located,  beneficiaries  recognized  the  value  of  easy  and  rapid  access  to  vaccination  and  animal 
treatment by VAs located in or near their villages. Between the new fattening techniques taught and 
enhanced  veterinary  services,  their  animals  are  in  better  health,  grow  more  quickly,  and  generate 
greater income in more fattening cycles during the year than before L4G. 

•  The presence of private vets and VAs in other circles of Mopti meant that the value of new fattening 
techniques could be enhanced in these other circles. However, the lack of a private veterinary system 
in Timbuktu circles where L4G installed FFSs meant that synergistic effects could not be expected. 

•  According to FGD participants, new knowledge of animal fattening techniques and close proximity of 
the  VAs  decreased  animal  loss,  increased  the  number  of  animals  fattened,  and  encouraged  more 
farmers to engage in this profitable activity if it is treated as a serious business. 

•  L4G donated animal feed, seed for forage, dual-use crops, and materials for making MLNBs, which 
permitted more FFS beneficiaries to fatten animals. Without this assistance, they would have had great 
difficulty using the new fattening techniques. Many seek more financial assistance to continue. 

•  Stock raisers and animal fatteners overwhelmingly report a growth in animal productivity, exemplified 
by greater and faster weight gain and reduced morbidity, coupled with increased incremental sales 
from shortening fattening cycles, and an increase in income, in part due to L4G livestock interventions. 
However, outcomes in these areas fell sharply FY 2019 due to increased insecurity. 

•  The  cascading  training  model  used  by  L4G  to  spread  between  villages  and  among  the  general 
population was seriously limited by the lack of per diems for participants in cascade training sessions. 

27 

These  sessions  were  part  of  a  TOT  system  by  which  initial  PO  representatives  taught  the  new 
techniques to the other members of their POs and they in turn taught others from other villages. 
Nevertheless, an informal spread of knowledge did occur in villages, since all PO members met seemed 
equally aware and appreciative of the new fattening techniques. 

•  The technical services in charge of animal production were not involved in the FFSs, and in most cases, 
local administrative authorities were not kept abreast of activity interventions. Nevertheless, state 
services,  authorities,  and  administrators  have  a  favorable  view  of  activity  accomplishments  and 
generally recommend extending the activity to other areas of Mali. 

RECOMMENDATIONS 
•  The area of co-location of SVPP/VA services and animal fattening training sites should be expanded to 
the other circles of the Mopti region and to the circles of Timbuktu. This was not accomplished under 
L4G, but it should be attempted under any USAID or other donor follow-on project. 

•  USAID could extend the L4G activity, or similar large-scale effort to improve livestock productivity, 
to other areas Mali, assuming security so permits. Most agriculturalists in the southern part of the 
country do fatten animals and could improve these fattening activities. This would be an excellent 
additional source of revenue for women. 

•  The  state  technical  services  in  animal  production  should  be  integrated  into  any  new  livestock 
productivity activity in Mali, just as they should be integrated into vaccination and veterinary treatment 
activities in villages. The co-location of vaccination, treatment, and fattening techniques should require 
the full partnership of the State services for implementation and sustainability. 

•  To better diffuse new techniques of animal fattening in any future livestock activity in Mali, it will be 
necessary  to  improve  participation  in  cascade  training  sessions  to  mobilize  a  greater  number  of 
beneficiaries in future activities. This will require a system of per diem payment and transportation 
allowance coupled with training in a larger number of villages with more representatives from each 
PO. This model is viable and cost effective compared to others, but it must take into account the need 
to compensate trainees fully for their time and perceived costs. 

EVALUATION QUESTIONS 3 AND 4 

4.3 
EQ  3:  “How  has  the  presence  of  water  management  systems 
impacted  the 
relationship/cohabitation between users?” / EQ 4: “How effectively are water management 
systems meeting the needs of the users?” 
Findings for EQs 3 and 4 are based largely on two FGDs 
with water point committee members in Tori village and 
Koro Center in the Mopti region. Because the findings 
focus  on  these  two  water  point  committees,  and 
because of the overlapping nature of the two EQs, they 
are addressed jointly in this section. 
BACKGROUND7 
The  background  information  below  on  water  points 
applies to both EQs 3 and 4.  Mali lies in the Sahel region 
of Africa, where drought and limited access to water 
are  common.  This  chronically  limits  the  ability  of 
farmers and herders to have access to the water that is 
essential for their family, their herds, and their crops. The long nine-month dry season presents particular 
difficulties, especially when drought is severe. Indeed, in 2017, 56 percent of livestock owning households 
                                                 
7 Unless otherwise cited, information in the background section comes from L4G annual reports for FY 2017, FY 2018, FY 2019, 
and FY 2019 Quarter 2 reports. 

Photo 2: A typical water point in Mali. 

28 

in the L4G target area experienced drought, by far the greatest shock to their livelihood, as reported in 
the Mali LSMS of that year, and an increase over that reported in 2014 (51 percent) for the same group 
(see Table 13).8  
Table 13: Most Severe Livelihood Shocks for Livestock Owners in the L4G Implementation 

Area  (2014 and 2017) 

Shock to Livelihood 

Drought 
Violence and Conflict 
Illness and Accident 
High Food Prices 
Source: Mali LSMS, as reported by Fraym. 

2014 (%) 

51 
8 
7 
5 

2017 (%) 

56 
2 
7 
13 

While access to water is a serious problem in the L4G implementation area over the early period of the 
activity, access to water was already increasing in the target regions. The Fraym study examined the use 
of unimproved water sources by livestock owning households by circle in the Mopti region. The rate of 
use of unimproved water went down between 2014 and 2017 in both Bankass and Koro (where L4G 
water points were eventually constructed). Use of unimproved water also declined in two of three other 
Mopti districts studied. The L4G water point improvements were only completed in 2019. Thus, these 
data show that use of unimproved water sources was on the decline throughout the Mopti region before 
the water points were established. 
In  May  2014  and  again  in  August  2015,  L4G  conducted  stakeholder  workshops  to  identify  the  most 
important constraints to the livestock value chain. These workshops confirmed the data provided above, 
showing that access to water is among the principal issues that limit the ability of herders to develop their 
herds  for  market.9  This  led  to  a  plan  to  rehabilitate  or  drill  six  new  boreholes  with  associated  solar 
powered pumps and water tower storage in the livestock markets of the villages of Doundé, Koulogon 
Habbé, Ouonkoro, and Tori in the Bankass circle of Mopti and in Youdiou in the Koro circle of Mopti. 
The plan was also to improve the previous manual pump at the Koro District central market by installing 
a  solar  powered  pump  and  water  tower.  In  August  of  2018,  L4G  contracted  with  Sonikara,  a  private 
engineering firm specializing in solar water pumps and water towers, to construct the water points. 
Civil conflict leading to violence in the Mopti region impeded many aspects of L4G, including water point 
development. A report by Fraym assessed the impact of violence on the L4G project in general, and on 
the water points in particular.10 Fraym found that during the L4G project period there were six violent 
civil conflicts within 5 kilometers of the five completed water points. In addition, before the work was 
completed there was an assault on the Youdiou water point, leading to a decision to abandon the work. 
The borehole had been dug and equipment purchased, but the water point was subsequently sabotaged 
and work halted. This left five remaining water points with completed, operational pumps by early calendar 
year 2019. L4G later held a workshop in Timbuktu to assess the need for new water points in that region. 
Those efforts occurred too late in the project to lead to any new water points in Timbuktu, in spite of 
the identified need for them. 
As part of the process of establishing improved water points, L4G worked with local governments to train 
water point committees at the five improved water points. The committees were to develop a governance 
structure for administering the water points, including setting rules for water use and establishing and 

                                                 
8“High-level Analysis of Livestock-owning Households in Target Communities Before and During L4G Activities,” by Fraym for 
DT Global. 
9 “Portrait and Mapping of Livestock Value Chain in the Implementation Areas of the Livestock for Growth Program: Analysis 
and Classification of Constraints and Actions of Priority,” November 2015. Prepared by AECOM. 
10 “The Security Context in Target Communities during L4G Activities,” by Fraym for DT Global. 

29 

collecting fees from the users. A former L4G staff member described the purpose of the water point 
committees as follows: 

“This committee is the best way to manage a water point, because we need a group of people and not a 
single  person  in  the  management.  In  this  group,  there  must  be  a  chief  who  controls  the  situation,  a 
manager who is there to sell the water, a treasurer to keep the cash, and an auditor to control the finances. 
And in the case of damage, there has to be someone to fix it.” (Former L4G staff member) 

On August 20, 2019, just as the activity was coming to a close, L4G organized a ceremony to transfer 
responsibility for the water points and their equipment to the water point committees. Representatives 
from the five committees formally accepted responsibility for the water points and the equipment at this 
ceremony. 
FINDINGS 
The evaluation team conducted FGDs with selected members of two water point committees and farmers 
in  Tori  village  and  Koro  Center.  Due  to  insecurity  in  the  area  of  Tori,  its  water  point  committee 
representatives  and  users  were  brought  to  Bankass  for  the  FGD.  The  team  also  conducted  KIIs  with 
government officials in Bankass and Koro. Table 14 shows some of the characteristics of the two point 
committees in Tori village and Koro Center, including their water usage rules and pricing structures. 

Table 14: Characteristics of Water Points and Water Point Committees 

Characteristics 
Number of Members 
Initiation Date 
Method of Member 
Selection  
Membership Criteria 
Rule for Water Use 
Type of Use 
Fees 

Use of Water Point Fees 

Tori Village 

8 

February 2017 

Chosen by the mayor’s office in 
consultation with others including 
village chief 
Literate and resident of village 
First come, first served (exception for 
elders) 
For home use and for animals 
Per bucket: 5-10 CFAF; Per cow: 10 
CFAF; Per sheep: 5 CFAF 
80% to the mayor’s office for general 
use of the commune; 20% for 
committee to maintain infrastructure 
and to pay the guardian of the pump 
who collects fees. This is clearly not 
sufficient to sustain the water point.   

Koro Center 
16 (8 active) 

December 2018 

Chosen by the mayor’s office 

Not specified 
First come, first served (exception for 
elders) 
For home use and for animals 
Per bucket: 5 CFAF; Per cow: 25 CFAF; 
Per sheep: 10 CFAF 

3% to mayor’s office (currently under 
dispute); remainder for committee to 
maintain infrastructure and to pay the 
guardian of the pump who collects fees 

Water Point Governance 
Wait Times 
The evaluation team asked FGD participants whether there was any conflict around water point usage or 
conflicts concerning issues in governance. In both cases, FGD participants indicated that conflicts at the 
water points were minimal and always verbal (no violence in either case). The “first come, first served” 
rule is strictly applied except on occasion for elders during long waits, as indicated by the following quotes: 
“Even if it is urgent and the person waiting is one of our relatives, he will follow the queue for the proper 
functioning and compliance with the regulations of the water point.” (Water point committee member) 
“No matter the positions or tactics with which you come, you will respect the queue unless you are an 
elder and the one in front of you gives you the permission.” (Water point committee member) 

30 

“I am satisfied with the management of the committee. And there is no conflict or problem at this level. 
In the beginning when it was PMH [human motricity pump] system, there were conflicts because people 
waited a long time to have access to water. But since the water point was restored, that is no longer the 
case. If you have your money, you come, and you follow the queue. After a short time, you will have access 
to water without any difficulty.” (Mayor) 

There are times when there is not enough water from the pump to meet all customers’ needs quickly; 
this generally is in the winter months when there is more cloud cover/less sunshine. This problem, as 
noted by water point committee members in both FGDs, may result in longer waits. However, they also 
mentioned that this is the time of the year when there is rain, so there is less demand for water from the 
water point. 
Another time that people may wait is on Thursdays before the market day, when people are watering 
their animals. According to one committee member, “The main users are the population and animals of the 
village and surrounding villages on the day of the fair. The population takes enough water on Thursday and stores 
it in order not to be missing and also to make juice drinks for potential customers at the fair.” 
Thus, during selected times the waits may be longer than at other times, and small disputes may arise, but 
overall the process works well. One thing that helps is having separate taps for people filling buckets for 
home  needs  and  for  watering  animals.  The  key  finding,  however,  is  that  FGD  participants  from  both 
committees acknowledged that the wait times and associated frustrations are substantially less frequent 
after the L4G-supported water point improvements than before. 

“In the past, there was not a precise or determined time to have water because some can have it easily 
which other can spend a whole day without having some…A standpipe was installed for the needs of 
humans and four pipes for animals. So, animals and humans can both use the water point simultaneously, 
which has considerably reduced the waiting times.” (Water point committee member) 

Payment 
The evaluation team also sought to determine whether there were conflicts concerning money collected 
from water point users. There have been disagreements concerning the distribution of funds between the 
water management committee and the mayor’s office. Both committees have set up financial checks and 
balances in accounting by having a treasurer who keeps the money as well an auditor who checks the 
accounts periodically. Each water tank also has a meter that measures the amount of water still in the 
tank, which can be used to estimate the amount of money that should be collected, although it is not 
necessarily precise, and it acts as a check on unauthorized water distribution. 

“The people do not try to bribe you but try to beg you by asking you to give them water for free, something 
that is impossible because the water meter calculates.” (Water point committee member) 

Each water point has an employee responsible for collecting the fees. It has proven challenging, however, 
to provide proper continuous oversight for this person leading one committee member to recommend 
the use of a sub-meter. 

“The improvement we want at our water point is to have a sub-meter to know the exact volume of water 
sold  during  a  day…a  sub-meter  can  allow  us  to  have  this  information  and  to  better  follow  with  the 
saleswoman.”  (Water point committee member) 

The impressions of government officials interviewed about water point management are overwhelmingly 
positive, as indicated in the following quote: 

“If these committees are present for the sale of water and maintenance, the points will last longer, and 
they will remain and keep serving the population. Otherwise without these committees, the points will not 
last, and it would be a loss for the population because there will be no one to repair them in the absence 

31 

of the project. The Tori management committee even has currently 200,000 CFA francs in its cash.” 
(Chairman, District Council) 

Overall 
Overall, the  water point  governance  structure works well, a finding uniformly echoed by  water point 
committee  members  and  other  key  informants.  Nonetheless,  committee  members  conceded  that 
governance and accounting practices could be strengthened and that more training should be provided to 
water management committees to assist them in this process. 

“From now on, for the establishment of the water point management committee, it will be necessary that 
we make it through a general assembly where the members are chosen by consensus with their roles and 
responsibilities well defined. The management committee should be coupled with a monitoring committee 
to ensure the proper execution of the missions of each one and ensure a good governance process. It is 
also necessary to set up feedback sessions at the town hall with the various stakeholders  to improve 
transparency.” (Water point committee member) 

Benefits of L4G Water Point Interventions 
The FGDs and KIIs uncovered several benefits to the improved water points. These include shorter wait 
times, greater convenience in the form of separate waterspouts for animals and human use, automatic 
pumping that reduces the need for manual labor, and reduced transaction costs by reducing the need for 
people to walk long distances for water. The following quotes illustrate these benefits in the words of 
water committee members and other water users. 

“In the past, there was no specific or definite time to get water because some people could have some 
easily while others could spend a whole day without having any. Especially on the fair days, the water point 
was inaccessible to the populations and the water point because the cattle market is invaded by animals.” 
(Water point user) 
“Earlier it was PMHs [manual pumps] which were frequently broken, almost once a fortnight. The access 
to water was very painful…Today, with solar pumping, the difficulty obtaining water has considerably 
decreased, and this leaves time for people to do something else.” (Chairman, Circle Council) 
“L4G has rehabilitated the water point in the cattle park and I must admit that it has relieved us. It is a 
total relief for the town hall, the farmers, in short everyone”. (Mayor) 
“Those  [water  points]  allow  animals  to  be  watered  easily,  but  it  also  allows  us  to  vaccinate  easily, 
especially  small  ruminants,  because  when  the  vaccination  parks  were  built,  the  dimensions  were  not 
respected, which means that small ruminants can jump the walls during vaccination.” (Veterinarian) 
“All the population has access to water without problem and the animals also come to drink in good 
conditions.” (VA) 

In contrast, in FGDs with farmers in villages not served by the improved water points, the consistent 
finding was the need for improved water access with prevailing conditions worse by comparison to the 
L4G-supported villages and water points. 

“L4G promised a water point for our field work, and we want it to keep that promise.” (Farmer) 
“We want to have a water point in our parcel to continue producing fodder crop even in the dry season.” 
(Farmer) 
“From now on, my wish is to make a lot more water points, because when we have water, we can achieve 
a lot.” (President, District Council) 

 

 

32 

CONCLUSIONS 
•  Access  to  water  remains  a  continued  and  serious  problem  throughout  the  Mopti  and  Timbuktu 

regions. 

• 

•  At the time the evaluation fieldwork, several months after the water points became operational, water 
points installed with L4G support continued to function well, although vandalism by unknown persons 
during a village attack a violent conflict prevented the development of one planned water point. 
In the two villages visited with newly drilled or rehabilitated water points, the water point committees 
are established and continue to govern the water points. 

•  Overall, the water point governance structure exists and works well resulting in reduced wait times 
and increased fee collection. Other benefits include less unauthorized or unpaid water use, greater 
convenience, reduced need for manual labor, and reduced transaction costs/travel times. 

•  Conflicts around the water points are rare. When they do occur, they are typically associated with 

longer wait times and are limited to verbal conflicts and have not involved physical violence. 

•  Access to water is impeded when there is more cloud cover/less sunshine, because the solar power 

is not adequate to pump water into the tower. 

•  The  water  point  committees  have  established  rules  for  usage  and  fees;  however,  there  are  some 
disputes concerning how the money should be distributed between the committee and municipality 
that remain unresolved. 

•  Quality  water  access  had  been  improving  in  the  Mopti  region  before  the  water  points  were 
established.  While  there  are  no  quantitative  data  on  the  specific  contribution  made  by  L4G  on 
improved water access, the evidence from key informants interviewed by the evaluation team indicates 
that  L4G  has  made  an  important  incremental  contribution  to  improved  water  access  in  the  five 
locations  where  new  water  points  were  developed.  This  conclusion  is  further  supported  by  the 
relative conditions in villages supported by the activity and villages not supported by the activity. 

RECOMMENDATIONS 
•  A follow-up water point intervention by USAID, other donors, or state technical and administrative 
services could provide ongoing technical assistance to water point committees concerning financial 
oversight and planning, including financial and manpower planning related to site physical maintenance 
and repairs/replacement. 

•  Depending  on  resources  available,  the  security  situation  in  Mopti  and  Timbuktu,  and  further 
experience with the five pilot water points over the next year, USAID should construct new water 
points in the parts of those regions that have the least access to improved water. 

•  Water user fees fixed by the municipalities should be kept as low as possible to maintain, repair, and 

establish a depreciation allowance for the new water points. 

•  A transparent system of institutionalized feedback to the public should be put in place at the new 
water points involving the division and use of water user fees between municipalities and water point 
committees. 

•  Public feedback sessions can be the framework for exchanges where users will also be able to express 

their expectations and make recommendations with respect to improving the water points. 

•  A  process  of  participatory  selection  of  the  members  of  the  management  committees  will  help  to 

promote transparency and population confidence in management decisions taken. 

•  The one non-functional water point built under L4G could be fully restored and made operational by 
continued  USAID  or  other  donor  activities  in  the  area  once  security  permits.  The  investment  is 
substantial and should be recouped. 

 

 

33 

ANNEXES 

 

 

34 

ANNEX 1: EXPRESSION OF INTEREST 

EXPRESSION OF INTEREST – PERFORMANCE EVALUATION 

PEEL TASK ORDER 

I.  BACKGROUND INFORMATION 
A) Identifying Information 
1.  Project/Activity Title 
2.  Award Number 

Livestock for Growth (L4G) 

Cereal Value Chain  (CVC) 

AID-688-C-14-00004 

AID-688-C-13-00002 

3.  Award Dates 
4.  Project/Activity 

Funding 

5.  Implementing 

Organization(s) 
6.  Project/Activity 

COR/AOR 

September 30, 2014  September 

29, 2019 

October 17, 2013 October 16, 

2018 

$14,489,448 

DT Global (formerly AECOM) 

Mamoutou Diarra 

$24,971,628 

ACDI/VOCA 

Amadou Diane 

B) Development Context 
1.  Problem or Opportunity Addressed by the Project/Activity Being Evaluated 
On March 22, 2012, a military coup overthrew the elected president of Mali and his administration. Taking 
advantage of the political vacuum in the south, armed rebels led by Islamic extremists took control of the 
northern  two-thirds  of  the  country.  On  January  11,  2013,  following  southward  movement  of  the 
extremists, the French Government intervened to help Malian and African forces repel the insurgents and 
regain  the  occupied  territory.  The  country  has  since  returned  to  relative  calm,  with  two  rounds  of 
peaceful presidential elections conducted in 2013, followed by legislative elections in the same year. Over 
3 million Malians voted again in presidential elections in 2018. 
In support of the Government of Mali’s (GOM) National Agriculture Investment Plans (NAIP) of 2011-
2015 and 2015-2025, USAID restarted activities in Mopti and the region of Timbuktu to address the food 
security  needs  as  the  physical  security  situation  allowed.  The  overriding  goal  in  the  GOM’s  National 
Agriculture  Investment  Plan  is  to  strengthen  the  agriculture  sector  so  that  it  is  the  main  engine  for 
economic growth to address hunger, malnutrition, and poverty. 
Mali’s Feed the Future Strategy for 2010-2015 was approved in April 2011. It provides the roadmap for 
investments in agriculture and nutrition aimed at reducing poverty and hunger in Mali. The strategy uses 
a value chain approach to increase economic opportunities and it focuses development interventions on 
three core value chains: sorghum/millet, rice, and livestock. These three value chains are key to Mali’s 
development and overall food security as the majority of the population relies directly on these staple 
foods for their livelihoods and food security. 
In 2013 the Cereal Value Chain activity began in the Mopti and Sikasso regions and in 2014 the Livestock 
for Growth Activity started in Mopti and Timbuktu regions. The purpose of these flagship activities was 
to increase agricultural production, productivity and incomes, by both increasing direct income to men 
and women farmers, as well as through various value-added income generating activities carried out by 
value  chain  actors  (including:  input  suppliers,  farmers,  traders,  processors,  wholesalers,  buyers,  and 
exporters), and through support services that strengthen the value chain including agricultural technology 
providers and financial service providers. 
 

 

35 

CVC 

2.  Intended Results of the Project/Activity Being Evaluated 
a. 
CVC refers to a series of interventions that contribute to the Feed the Future (FTF) strategy for sorghum, 
millet, and rice value chains. The purpose of the project is to increase agriculture production, productivity, 
and incomes, by both increasing direct income to men and women farmers, as well as through various 
value-added  income  generating  activities  carried  out  by  value  chain  actors  (including:  input  suppliers, 
farmers,  traders,  processors,  wholesalers,  buyers,  and  exporters),  as  well  as  support  services  that 
strengthen the value chain including agricultural technology providers and financial service providers. 
The Intermediate Results (IRs) that the CVC activity seek to achieve are: 

Increased agricultural production and productivity in the cereals value chain; 

• 
•  Expanded market and trade of core value chain products; 
• 
•  Strengthened local capacities and systems. 

Increased resiliency of vulnerable communities and households; 

The activity assumes that increased productivity in and commercialization of rice, sorghum, and millet 
value chains, along with growth in private sector engagement in these value chains, attention to existing 
and  new  end-markets,  and  the  appropriate  facilitating  policies,  will  increase  the  availability  of  these 
important staple crops and access to these foods through positive impact on incomes of actors along the 
value chains. 
Overarching these results is a vision whereby strengthening the cereals value chains is achieved through 
the connection across and facilitation of relationships among value chain actors, support services, and 
other key market participants, as well as addressing key policy constraints relating to these value chains, 
whereby the entire value chain is positioned for sustainable growth, upgrading, and value addition which 
brings the benefits to the target smallholder and beneficiary households. 
Key CVC investments in local capacity building were expected to ensure that results were market driven 
and continue in the long-term after the completion of the activity, reflecting USAID’s emphasis on locally-
led  and  implemented  development  efforts.  Successful  integration  of  approaches  aimed  at  improving 
household nutrition practices, increasing youth participation, incorporating environmental management 
and resilience to climate change and prioritizing gender equity were determined as essential to CVC’s 
long-term results. 
Due to both agricultural potential and the tremendous need, it was expected that FTF interventions had 
the  greatest  impact  within  these  regions.  Approximately  3.15  million  people  live  in  the  ZOI,  and  an 
estimated 300,000 people will be directly affected by the FTF initiative, while approximately 1.3 million 
are expected to benefit indirectly. 
b. 
L4G’s  goal  is  to  promote  inclusive  competitive  economic  growth  of  the  livestock  value  chain  in  Mali, 
defined as small ruminants and cattle. The development hypothesis for L4G is that if (1) the quality of 
livestock improves, (2) market access and incentives for semi-sedentary and small producers—including 
women and youth—are expanded, and (3) the enabling environment of the livestock sector improves, 
then Mali’s livestock sector will be more domestically and internationally competitive and contribute to 
increased agriculture GDP and to broad based economic growth. 
The activity aims to achieve this goal through four IRs including: 

L4G 

Increased livestock productivity 
Increased domestic and export livestock trade 

• 
• 
•  Strengthened local capacities and systems 

36 

• 

Improved enabling environment for livestock sector 

L4G was designed to increase the output of the livestock value chain by strengthening support services 
(advisory, inputs, finance, research) and improving access to information and technology. Activities aimed 
at increasing access to products and services and identifying incentives for wider participation in livestock 
activities. L4G also builds resilience of poorer livestock households through developing skills necessary to 
effectively  participate  in  commercial  activities,  livestock  production,  and  sales,  or  in  related  service 
industries (e.g., fodder). 
To achieve FTF objectives, the L4G Activity has integrated gender and household nutrition and hygiene 
practices  into  its  approach  and  outputs.  While  not  an  objective  of  L4G,  it  is  expected  that  improved 
management of livestock will result in increased milk production, which can have nutritional benefits for 
livestock households. 
3.  Target Areas and Groups 
Geography 
The CVC activity worked in the Sikasso and Mopti regions within the FTF Zone of Influence (ZOI). The 
list of the villages can be found here. This includes 117 communes within Sikasso, Mopti, Koulikoro, and 
two communes in Ségou that encompasses the MCC Alatona Irrigation Project (AIP) sites. The communes 
were selected on the basis of agricultural potential, poverty and nutritional status of the population as 
indicated by stunting and wasting indices. 
Target Groups 
CVC: The target audiences for CVC includes male and female farmers as well as other actors in the cereal 
value chains including; input suppliers, farmers, traders, processors, wholesalers, buyers, and exporters, 
as well as support services that strengthen the value chain including agricultural technology providers and 
financial service providers. Women are a target audience for both activities. For CVC specifically, the 
overall goal of the program was to achieve a one-to-one men to women ratio of beneficiaries. 
L4G: The L4G contract will focus on multiple value chain actors, including but not limited to livestock 
producers, traders, transporters, and inputs/other service providers. For the L4G Activity, producers are 
broadly defined to be those households with members who raise small ruminants and/or cattle. While 
semi-sedentary  herders,  small  producers,  and  small  traders  will  be  the  primary  focus,  L4G  does  not 
exclude working with medium and large producers and traders as these are often the initial adopters and 
can demonstrate the benefits of technologies. Providers of inputs—e.g., forage and fodder seed, feeds and 
ration supplements, vaccines, and veterinary pharmaceuticals—and services such as veterinary services 
will be the main focus on the inputs side. 
4.  Approach and Implementation 
a. 
CVC  was  implemented  by  ACDI/VOCA,  with  local  non-governmental  organizations  (NGOs),  Nyèta 
Conseils and G-Force. Overall CVC direction, support, and administrative management were provided by 
ACDI/VOCA through their Bamako office, with specific regional coverage by Nyèta Conseils for Mopti 
and Timbuktu and G-Force in Ségou and Sikasso. 
CVC implementation focused primarily on production and sales. It incorporated multiple interventions 
and multiple VC actors; including producer organizations (POs), traders, processors, government-based 
extension services, financial intermediaries, women’s groups, cereal associations, and private sector firms. 
New technology, new processes, and new practices were adopted to increase production. CVC built the 
capacity of actors and business services, which enabled access to new credit options. The activities worked 

CVC 

37 

to strengthen relationships among actors, to promote a stronger and more inclusive enabling environment 
to create sustainable economic opportunities for women and men involved in these VCs. 
Community Agrobusiness Teams (CAT) 
A CAT is made of five to eight female and male, literate, youth PO members. Their main duties were to 
share  knowledge,  provide  technical  assistance  to  producers,  and  contribute  to  a  number  of  PO 
management  tasks.  To  facilitate  technology  transfers,  CVC  trained  CATs  theoretically  (in  classroom 
settings) and with demonstration plots. In turn, trained CATs used the demonstration plots and their 
knowledge to train other farmers.  CATs’ establishment started in the third year of CVC. Thus members 
received training during year three and four. CATs play an interfacing role between village POs and input 
and cereal dealers, Government Technical Services, NGOs, and financial services. 
According to reports, the CVC organized trainings of 90 CAT members in Koro, Bankass, and Mopti 
districts, including 36 women, on post-harvest practices, maintenance of family storage, and management 
of cereal stocks to strengthen household food security. CAT members then trained 4,356 producers, 
including  2,365  women.  The  training  focused  on  the  provision  and  management  of  cereal  stocks  for 
commercialization, after setting aside stocks for household consumption, monitoring and managing cereal 
stocks, marketing, and the use of increased revenue to strengthen household food security. 
Federations of POs 
The  security  crisis  in  the  Northern  and  Central  Mali  forced  the  region’s  banks  and  microfinance 
institutions  to  move  further  south.  As  a  result,  producers  in  Mopti  and  Timbuktu  found  themselves 
without any financial institutions to finance their agricultural inputs. Consequently, producers decided to 
create federated societies to improve their negotiation power. CVC supported the creation of two large 
Federations of POs in the Mopti and Timbuktu regions. These two Federations, with support from CVC, 
were able to access in-kind loans for farm inputs and equipment from “Planète Distribution,” a private 
business  in  the  Mopti  region,  so  they  could  continue  their  activity.  Establishing  confidence  among 
producers, intermediaries and Planète Distribution enabled the timely supply of inputs and equipment 
(pump, power tillers, fertilizers, and diesel oil) to producers and the prompt repayment with rice paddy 
following  harvest.  According  to  CVC  reports,  Planète  Distribution  mobilized  investment credit  worth 
approximately  $1,782,830  (CFAF  1  billion)  in  the  Mopti  region  in  2018  for  pumps.  A  total  of  251 
cooperatives received 308 GMP pumps on credit, with a total value of $4,392,900 (CFAF 2.46 billion). 
In addition, CVC worked with each Federation to provide trainings to POs. Supported by CVC staff, 27 
local trainers from the Federation of Rice Producers in Tombouctou (FUSCOCYN) trained 7,471 irrigated 
rice  producers.  The  training  focused  on  addressing  water  pollution,  the  risks  associated  with  the 
consumption  of  irrigation  water,  and  good  hygiene  and  sanitation  practices  related  to  the  spread  of 
waterborne diseases. The Federation of the Faranfasi-So in Niono, through its collaboration agreement 
with CVC, trained producers on Systems of Rice Intensification practices in irrigated areas of Alatona. 
Trainers used posters and trained 1,546 producers, including 1,034 women. Training topics included the 
application of organic fertilizer, land preparation, establishing nurseries, transplanting seedlings, fertilization 
regimes, irrigation regimes and plot maintenance, and harvest techniques. 
Financial intermediation 
In  2017,  with  support  from  CVC,  financial  intermediaries  formed  the  APIFIMA  to  establish  minimum 
standards  for  their  profession  and  reinforce  the  credibility  and  sustainability  of  their  services.  The 
association established a toolkit that provides a systematic process for due diligence and loan application 
packaging. According to CVC reports, APIFIMA supported the expansion of the agricultural portfolios of 
12  Malian  financial  institutions.  It  worked  with  more  than  120  wholesalers  and  agribusinesses  (input 
suppliers,  cooperatives,  and  cereal  processors)  to  improve  their  bookkeeping.  It  also  helped  these 
businesses  prepare  financial  documents  to  submit  to  banks  to  support  their  loan  applications  and 
demonstrate their improved financial management capacity to lenders. Thus, it helped mobilize more than 

38 

L4G 

$20,331,216  of  financing  to  59,253  farms  and  agribusinesses.  APIFIMA  reduced  default  rates  on  loans 
through APIFIMA members’ involvement in tracking repayments. 
Mentoring for women 
CVC supported the development of a Gender Mentor Association to create mentorship among women. 
The  mentor  association  established  a  nine-member  committee,  adopted  rules  and  regulations  of  the 
association, and developed a roadmap defining the actions, managers, and the implementation schedule 
for scaling up mentoring activities after the end of the CVC Project. 
The approach generated and disseminated information on gender-based opportunities and constraints to 
raise awareness and support the development of programs that integrate gender equality in agribusiness 
and food security activities. According to CVC reports, mentoring had a snowball effect within CVC-
assisted mixed POs. Since the beginning of the mentoring program, CVC strengthened the capacity of 
seven mentors, including three women, and 53 mentored producers from 20 POs. 
b. 
L4G implements a market oriented approach which integrates improved production with market demand. 
In line with this approach, most of L4G’s efforts respond to existing market demands both within Mali and 
within the West African sub-region. Specifically, production activities and targets respond to needs based 
on market demand to domestic and export increase trade. 
Organization  capacity  strengthening  and  leadership  building  and  training  will  be  critical  factors  under-
pinning most of L4G’s interventions. From basic literacy to business skills, organizational management, 
production  and  management  technologies,  marketing,  and  advocacy,  there  is  a  great  need  for 
strengthening  capabilities  of  all  actors  to  catalyze  the  necessary  upgrading  and  investments.  Building 
management and leadership capacity of men and women throughout the chain is critical to ensuring that 
the L4G’s results are market driven and sustainable in the long term, and at multiple levels. 
Vaccination campaigns 
L4G  introduced  Private  Proximity  Veterinarian  Services  approach  (SVPPs)  in  the  Koro  and  Bankass 
Cercles  to  improve  livestock  health  care  delivery.  The  SVPP  system  partnered  three  licensed  private 
veterinarians with 76 auxiliaries in order to deliver veterinarian services to animals in remote areas not 
reached by state services. L4G initially provided each of the three licensed private veterinarians with a 
starter kit and it annually provides technical animal health and management training. In 2018, the three 
SVPPs vaccinated 287,525 animals against major crippling diseases, including Cattle Pneumonia (PPCB) and 
sheep/goat pasteurellosis. 
In July 2018, L4G partnered with the Malian Laboratoire Central Vétérinaire to evaluate the occurrence 
of contagious and parasitic diseases of in L4G coverage areas. To conduct the study, LCV visited 11 sites 
for epidemiological surveys and sampling. This included farm visits for clinical examinations of animals and 
the  collection  of  clinical  and  epidemiological  data  and  field  sampling  from  270  cattle  and  450  small 
ruminants. The vaccination coverage rate increased from 8% in 2014 to 20% in 2018. 
Fattening techniques 
L4G collaborated with Producer Organizations (PO) to establish animal fattening demonstration sites in 
the Mopti and the Timbuktu regions. L4G and POs agreed to co-finance (L4G contributed 53%, and POs 
47%)  the  supplies,  equipment,  and  materials  needed  to  demonstrate  best  practices  and  improved 
technologies. In addition, the POs purchased all the animals (10 cattle or 10 sheep per site) to use for 
demonstration  purposes.  L4G  provided  livestock  fatteners  and  training  materials  illustrating  how  to 
formulate a healthy and balanced diet for animals. It adapted low-cost locally available feeds with new 
technologies, such as treatment of straw with urea, supplementation with multi-nutritional licking blocks, 
and special intensive fattening feeds. The success of fattening efforts, combined with improved veterinary 

39 

care,  resulted  in  healthy  animals  that  met  market  requirements.  For  example,  fatteners  were  able  to 
deliver cattle weighing at least 300 kg to LAHAM, which is the only modern slaughterhouse in Mali. 
Fodder shortage 
Especially  during  the  dry  season,  which  in  the  Sahel  lasts  for  about  nine  months,  fodder  shortage 
constitutes a major challenge to successful livestock production in Mali. For this reason, L4G has promoted 
the cultivation of dual-use fodder crops such as cowpea, groundnut, sorghum, millet, and Moringa. Such 
crops  provide  food  for  humans,  in  the  form  of  grains  or  seeds,  while  the  stalks  and  chaff  provide  a 
nutritious source of fodder for livestock. 
Livestock market information system (LMIS) 
Livestock  POs,  animal  fatteners,  and  other  producers  need  access  to  timely  and  accurate  market 
information to better understand the demand for livestock in various markets and to be able to supply it. 
For this reason, L4G launched a pilot LMIS mobile-phone app, known as SUGU (which means market in 
the Bambara language). In the Koro, Bankass, Mopti, and Djenné Districts or Circles, L4G has partnered 
with 10 existing Livestock Market Management Committees and has trained 10 enumerators to collect 
market data via the SUGU app. 
Water point improvements 
L4G carried out five drillings in livestock markets in the villages of Doundé, Koulogon Habbé, Ouonkoro, 
Tori,  and  Youdiou.  In  each  water  point,  physico-chemical  analyses  were  conducted  and  photovoltaic 
pumping systems were built. L4G trained five water committees, including 27 participants (five women 
and 22 men), on the use of water infrastructure and related resource management 
C) Existing Data 
The Evaluation Team is expected to conduct a short review of the relevant literature and USAID guidance. 
In addition, USAID Mali will share the following documents for a desk review: 

•  Contracts (2) 
•  Gender analysis reports (2) 
•  Gender assessment reports (2) 
•  Activity MEL Plans 
•  Quarterly reports (27) 
•  Annual Activity Reports CVC & L4G (8) 
•  CVC midterm evaluation report (I) 

While the Evaluation Design will likely rely on some primary data, the Evaluation Team is also encouraged 
to take advantage of existing (secondary) datasets for its analyses. The following data will be shared by 
USAID Mali: 

•  Activity monitoring data for both CVC and L4G (in database format) 

USAID Mali will provide initial contacts to the following stakeholders: 

•  USAID Mission Staff 
•  Prime Implementing Partners, Sub Partners 
•  Other development partners working in the areas of livestock and agricultural sector 
•  Key staff from Ministry of Livestock and Fishery at National, Regional, and Sub Regional levels 
•  Key staff from Ministry of Agriculture at National, Regional, and Sub Regional levels 

 

 

40 

II.  EVALUATION RATIONALE 
A)  Evaluation Purpose 
This EOI covers the final evaluations for the two flagship AEG activities in Mali (Cereal Value Chain and 
Livestock for Growth) of the USAID/Mali Agriculture and Economic Growth (AEG) Office. The purpose 
of the evaluations is to inform the design of future activities under the Global Food Security Strategy 
(GFSS) country plan. 
The  evaluation  questions  cover  particular  aspects  of  implementation  where  lessons  can  be  learned 
towards better understanding the sustainability of the models developed through the implementation. The 
evaluation findings will also constitute evidence to inform the co-design process and adaptive management 
for  a  new  set  of  activities  in  the  livestock  and  cereal  sectors  in  Mali,  under  a  new  Project  Appraisal 
Document produced by AEG. The evaluations will complement and confirm lessons learned that have 
been collected from the implementing partners. 
B)  Audience and Intended Uses 
The main audience of these evaluations is USAID. This includes the USAID/Mali AEG office but also the 
mission as a whole and the Bureau for Resilience and Food Security (RFS) in Washington. As the final 
report  will  be  available  publicly  USAID  expects  that  the  Government  of  Mali  (GOM)  and  other 
development partners will find the results useful as well. 
C)  Evaluation Questions 
This EOI requests the final evaluation for the two flagship AEG activities in Mali (Cereal Value Chain and 
Livestock for Growth) of the USAID/Mali Agriculture and Economic Growth (AEG) Office. 
The evaluation will employ mixed methods, using quantitative and qualitative data to answer the evaluation 
questions; the evaluation should note strengths, weaknesses, and opportunities for improvement. 
a.  CVC 

2. 

1.  To  what  extent  have  the  Community  Agrobusiness  Teams  (CATs)  continued  their  capacity 

building and networking since the end of the CVC activity? 
In what ways, if any, did CVC’s private sector engagement strategy (with Planète Distribution) 
benefit farmers? Did it compensate for missing financial market actors and/or did it displace other 
actors (i.e., did it give an unfair advantage to Planète Distribution compared to other distributors 
in the market)? Are there other positive or negative unintended outcomes that affected the private 
sector? 

3.  To what extent were Producer Organizations (POs) able to negotiate profitable contracts with 

brokers? 

4.  From the perspective of POs, Planète Distribution, and lenders, what is APIFIMA’s (Financière du 
Mali/Professional Association of Financial Intermediation in Mali) value as an intermediary between 
beneficiaries and the banks? 
In what ways, if any, did the mentoring activity affect women’s ability to successfully pursue their 
professional goals? To what extent do women feel their voices are heard in mixed gender POs 
after completing the mentoring program?11 

5. 

Questions 1 through 5 will be addressed using disaggregated data to the extent possible, to see how 
vulnerable households, women and youth were affected. 

                                                 
11 The questions regarding gender empowerment should be considered through a context specific lens.  

41 

b.  L4G 

1.  To what extent do the trained auxiliaries continue to engage in activities that improve animal 

health in their villages? Are vaccines available in the villages of auxiliaries trained by SVPPs? 

2.  From the beneficiaries perspective, to what extent did access to the co-located introduction of 
new  fattening  technologies  and  vaccination  programming  improve  beneficiary’s  productivity, 
access markets, and incomes? How did the co-location contribute to the improvements? 

3.  How  has  the  presence  of  water  management  systems  impacted  the  relationship/cohabitation 

between users? 

4.  How effectively are the water management systems meeting the needs of the users? 

Questions 1 through 4 will be addressed using disaggregated data to the extent possible, to see how need 
to also examine how L4G affected target populations of vulnerable households, women, and youth. 
III. TIMEFRAME & TRAVEL 
A)  Timeframe 
The evaluations shall take place over a period of 50 weeks (please see deliverable timeline below) with an 
end date of April 2020. 
B)  Travel 
Both evaluations require travel to and within Mali to be carried out at one time. In addition to Bamako, 
the evaluation team will be required to travel to Mopti and Timbuktu regions. Duration of travel will be 
dependent on the methodology proposed by the contractor and the security situation. 
IV. DELIVERABLES & DESIGN 
A)  Description of deliverables 
The evaluation team (ET) shall present the following as deliverables during the implementation for each 
evaluation. The listed meetings and communications do not preclude additional communications, to be 
agreed upon by both parties, as needed. All electronic text deliverables must be submitted in MS Word 
or PPT format. Quantitative and qualitative data deliverables shall be delivered in relevant formats such as 
Stata, Excel, CSV, etc. 
Post-award Kickoff Meeting: PEEL shall hold kickoff conference calls (or in-person meetings) with the 
Mission, activity IP representatives, and other relevant stakeholders to inform details of the Concept Note 
and review expected deliverables and timeline. Other items on the agenda for the kickoff calls/meetings 
may include: 

•  ET questions to clarify the evaluation questions or other relevant topics. 
•  Establish expectations for the Concept Note. 
• 

Identify possible additional sources of information available to the ET for its desk review. 

Concept Note: The ET shall submit a draft Concept Note after the post-award kickoff meeting. The 
Concept Note should demonstrate careful and realistic planning and include (1) the finalized evaluation 
questions, (2), a brief description of the evaluation design, data collection methods, and analysis methods, 
(3)  the  anticipated  schedule  and  logistics,  and  security  arrangements  for  deliverables  and  evaluation 
activities detailed, (4) an Evaluation Design Matrix linking each question to relevant data source, data type 
and data analysis), (5) list of the proposed key personnel on the evaluation team, delineated by roles and 
responsibilities, and (6) budget for the evaluation. 
USAID shall provide written feedback to the Concept Note, which will be approved by the PEEL COR 
and concurred by the activity manager before the evaluation can begin. 

42 

Evaluation Design Protocol: Upon approval of the concept note, the ET shall submit an evaluation 
plan that elaborates the proposed evaluation design. The evaluation design should reference the relevant 
literature; detail the approach to answer the evaluation questions (including data collection methods, data 
sources,  selection  criteria  and  sampling  plan,  description  of  data  collection  instruments,  and  a  specific 
technical analysis plan). The evaluation design should be consistent with the information in the Concept 
Note  regarding  the  evaluation  schedule,  logistics  and  security  arrangements,  and  members  of  the 
evaluation team with delineated roles and responsibilities. 
The Evaluation Design Protocol will include the Draft Data Collection Tools for both quantitative and 
qualitative components of the evaluation. The tools should include questionnaires, forms, and guides for 
data collectors. 
USAID shall provide written feedback on the Evaluation Protocol and draft data collection tools. USAID 
approval of Evaluation Protocol and data collection tools will be required before any field work for the 
evaluation can begin. 
In-brief and Discussion: Preceding the field-based data collection phase in Mali, the ET will provide an 
in-brief for USAID/Mali, the activity IP and other relevant stakeholders, as determined by USAID/Mali. The 
in-brief should include a presentation on the main features of the evaluation design, data collection tools, 
and logistics. This should provide the opportunity to address or clarify USAID’s written feedback on the 
data collection tools and to inform the relevant local authority about the kick-off of the field work. 
Data  Collection  Training  and  Pilot  test:  The  ET  should  train  data  collectors  as  required  by  the 
chosen evaluation methodology. The ET shall conduct a data collection field test for quantitative data 
collection, using digital data collection tools, for its whole evaluation team (as relevant). This is the final 
test of the team logistics, team performance, and data quality systems in place. The ET shall document any 
changes to the data collection tools during training and piloting and submit the final data collection tools 
to be used for the evaluation to USAID following the pilot test. 
Weekly Updates: Once field activities begin, the ET shall provide USAID with weekly progress updates 
to keep the COR and/or Activity Manager informed on progress on the evaluation. These updates should 
brief USAID on data collection progress to-date and any challenges that arise. The ET and USAID can 
negotiate the best format to provide these updates. 
Draft Evaluation Report and Executive Summary: The ET shall submit a draft report, including an 
executive summary of no more than 10 pages. The executive summary must present key findings that 
answer  each  evaluation  question  as  well  as  conclusions  pertinent  to  the  audience  and  purpose  of  the 
evaluation. Please refer to USAID guidance and the sections below for required report content and format 
guidelines. The ET must submit drafts of the evaluation report in English and the executive summary in 
both English and French. 
USAID shall provide written feedback on the draft evaluation report. Additional drafts may be needed. 
Final  Report  and  Executive  Summary:  The  ET  shall  finalize  the  evaluation  report  and  executive 
summary, submitting them electronically in both pdf and Word format to USAID. The final report shall 
incorporate,  clarify,  correct  and/or  adjust  the  report  in  accordance  with  the  comments  provided  by 
USAID. The final report will be approved by the COR with concurrence by the Activity Manager. 
The  ET  must  submit  the  evaluation  report  in  English  and  the  executive  summary  in  both  English  and 
French. 
The contractor shall upload the 508 compliant final report to the Development Experience Clearinghouse 
(DEC) website no later than one week following final approval of the final report. 

43 

Draft  Infographic:  In  addition  to  the  final  report,  the  ET  shall  submit  a  draft  two  page  infographic 
summarizing the evaluation findings and recommendations. The infographic shall be in both English and 
French and be designed for the evaluation audience identified by USAID. 
USAID shall provide written feedback on the infographic. 
Final Infographic: After incorporating the feedback provided by USAID, the ET should submit a final 
infographic in both English and French. The infographic should be submitted in both pdf and source file 
format. 
Findings Presentation: The ET should present the evaluation findings to USAID/Mali, IPs, and RFS if 
relevant, through a PowerPoint presentation. This is typically delivered through a webinar. USAID/Mali 
can consider a local dissemination event with other relevant stakeholders as required. 
Data Set and Supporting Documents: The ET shall send all data and supporting documents gathered 
during the evaluation to USAID. This shall include all data (quantitative and qualitative) used in the analysis. 
For quantitative data, this includes a database with all the data (and datasets) used, codebook, code, and 
analysis files. For qualitative data, this includes translation of all scripted observations, interviews, group 
discussions, and reviewed documents. Source documentation such as reports and publications should also 
be included. Quantitative and qualitative data deliverables shall be delivered in relevant formats such as 
Stata, Excel, CSV, etc. 
Data Submission of quantitative data: The ET must submit to USAID and the Development Data 
Library  (DDL),  at  www.usaid.gov/data,  in  a  machine-readable,  non-proprietary  format,  a  copy  of  any 
dataset created or obtained in performance of this award, including Datasets produced by a subcontractor 
at any tier. ADS 579 detailing USAID’s Open Data Policy provides additional information about submission. 
The ET must ensure their submissions meet all requirements, including the protection of any personally 
identifiable information (PII). 
 B)  Suggested timeline for deliverables 
Below is a suggested timeline for deliverables. A final timeline for deliverables will be agreed upon in the 
evaluation  concept  note.  Contract  Start  Date  (CSD)  indicates  the  date  that  the  work  assignment  is 
approved by the COR. This timeline suggests 40 weeks to complete an evaluation. The ET is encouraged 
to submit a timeline that is as compressed as possible while leaving enough time to produce a rigorous 
evaluation. 

Evaluation Deliverable 

Work Assignment Kickoff Meeting(s) 
Draft concept note 
USAID review of concept note 
Final concept note 
Evaluation Design Protocol and Draft Data Collection 
Tools  
Written feedback on the Evaluation Design Protocol 
and Draft Data Collection Tools 
In-brief Meeting 
Data Collection Pretest 
Final Data Collection Tools and Testing Protocol 
Complete Data Collection 
Draft Evaluation Report and Brief 
Data Set and Supporting Documents 

Deadline for Completion With 
Respect to Contract Start Date 

(CSD) 

within 5 business days of CSD 
within 15 business days of CSD 
within 20 business days of CSD 
within 35 business days of CSD 
within 50 business days of CSD 

within 55 business days of CSD 
within 60 business days of CSD 
within 65 business days of CSD 
within 70 business days of CSD and 
before the beginning of field testing 
within 100 business days of CSD 
within 160 business days of CSD 
within 160 business days of CSD 

Responsible 

Party 
PEEL 
ET 

USAID 

ET 
ET 

USAID 

ET 
ET 
ET 
ET 
ET 
ET 

44 

Evaluation Deliverable 

Written feedback to the Draft Evaluation Report and 
Brief 
Final Report and Brief 
Additional comments or approval 
Draft Infographic  
Final Infographic for Dissemination of Evaluation Report 
to Stakeholders 
Publication on DEC 
Data submission to DDL 

Deadline for Completion With 
Respect to Contract Start Date 

(CSD) 

Responsible 

Party 

within 175 business days of CSD 
within 190 days of CSD 
within 195  business days of CSD 
 within 200 days of CSD 
within 212 days of CSD 
within 230 days of CSD 
within 230 days of CSD 

USAID 

ET 

USAID 

ET 
ET 
ET 
ET 

Technical requirements 
Evaluation Design 

C) 
1. 
The performance evaluations should make appropriate use of best evaluation practices and apply mixed 
methods  as  recommended  by  the  USAID  Evaluation  Policy.  There  should  be  a  clear  and  explicit  link 
between each evaluation question and the methods to address them. Methods should include quantitative 
and qualitative data collection and data analysis, as appropriate. An illustrative evaluation matrix provides 
initial examples of how some questions might be answered but the evaluation team should demonstrate 
its expertise by proposing data collection and analysis that it deems best fitted to each evaluation question 
and according to the agricultural, socio-economic, cultural and security context of the related Zones of 
Influence. 
When  designing  and  budgeting  the  evaluation,  the  contractor  should  take  into  account  the  following 
criteria: 

•  Security considerations in the zones of influence 
•  Road conditions to targeted villages 
•  Gender roles among crop and livestock actors 
•  Predominant crop and livestock activities 

The evaluation design should clearly articulate the link between each evaluation question, the proposed 
data sources, data collection method, and the analysis plan for these data. For example, the design may 
describe the regression model and statistics to be used in quantitative analysis. For qualitative approaches, 
the  design  may  detail  each  planned  analytical  step  (e.g.,  coding  frame,  how  it  was  developed).  The 
evaluation design should demonstrate that the proposed approaches are best practice (based on evaluation 
and research literature), that they are intended to provide robust answers to each evaluation question, 
and that they are suitable to the Mali context. 
Each evaluation question should also examine subsets of relevant populations such as poorer households 
and women and youth. For the relevant groups, the analysis may require more than simple disaggregation 
of  quantitative  data.  For  example,  analysis  of  gender  dynamics  is  more  than  statistics  by  gender.  The 
evaluation team should refer to relevant USAID guidance on gender and inclusion and propose specific 
evaluation designs, as appropriate. 
In addition to proposing a strong theoretical evaluation design, the evaluation team should plan on using 
standard empirical tools, as relevant to the chosen methodology. This could include statistical software 
for quantitative analysis (e.g., SPSS, or STATA) and software for qualitative analysis (e.g., Atlas.ti or NVivo). 
2. Primary Data Collection Instruments 
The  evaluation  team  may  propose  to  design  quantitative  data  collection  instruments  and  qualitative 
protocols to gather data as appropriate. Though such instruments and protocol may be based on existing 

45 

tools, they will need to be adapted and tested so that they address the specific evaluation questions and 
the Mali context. Therefore the evaluation team should include a detailed plan for relevant test of such 
instruments. 
The proposal should be specific and name each method used, the reason to use it and the data sources 
for each method. For example, what is meant by Focus Group Discussion, what is the criteria for the 
selection of its participants and why would Focus Group Discussion be more appropriate than a Group 
Discussion or a Key Informant Interview for a particular data source and a particular evaluation question? 
All quantitative data should be collected digitally and the proposal should demonstrate that proper data 
quality assurance systems will be put in place. 
3. Primary Data Collection 
The ET shall properly train all enumerators to appropriately collect quantitative and qualitative data, as 
needed. Proper data quality checks and supervision should be put in place. Data quality should be checked 
frequently and issues should be reported during weekly meetings. Any quantitative data shall be collected 
digitally. Automated and manual data quality systems shall be put in place. 
4. Methodological Strengths & Limitations 
The  evaluation  team  shall  explain  the  strengths  and  weaknesses  for  the  evaluation  methodologies 
proposed under this EOI. In explaining the limitations, the evaluation team shall further explain factors 
contributing to the selection of the proposed methodology despite its limitation and the means to be 
employed by the contractor to mitigate the potential effect of the limitation. 
5. Evaluation Matrix for CVC Evaluation 
The illustrative evaluation matrix below provides some examples of how some evaluation questions might 
be answered but the evaluation team should demonstrate its expertise by proposing data collection and 
analysis  that  is  best  fitted  and  specific  to  each  CVC  evaluation  question.  USAID/Mali  may  facilitate 
introductions and meetings with some of the proposed data sources. 

Evaluation Questions 

To what extent have the 
Community Agrobusiness 
Teams (CATs) continued their 
capacity building and 
networking since the end of 
the CVC activity?  

Outcome 
Measures 
Please include 
measure and 
or indicator(s) 

Data Sources 

•  CATs 
•  G-Force 
•  Nièta Conseil 
•  DRA Sikasso & Mopti  
•  CMDT Sikasso 
•  Producer Organizations 
•  CVC Quarterly, annual & 

final reports 

•  CVC Mid Term 

Evaluation report 

•  CVC Success stories 

Data 

Collection 
Method 

Please include 
quantitative 
and qualitative 
methods 

Data 

Analysis 
Method 
- 

46 

Evaluation Questions 

In what ways, if any, did CVC’s 
private sector engagement 
strategy (with Planet 
Distribution) benefit farmers? 
Did it compensate for missing 
financial market actors and/or 
did it displace other actors (i.e., 
did it give an unfair advantage 
to Planète Distribution 
compared to other 
distributors in the market)? 
Are there other positive or 
negative unintended outcomes 
for the private sector?  
To what extent were Producer 
Organizations (POs) able to 
negotiate profitable contracts 
with brokers? 

Outcome 
Measures 
Please include 
measure and 
or indicator(s) 

Please include 
measure and 
or indicator(s) 

Please include 
measure and 
or indicator(s) 

From the perspective of POs, 
Planète Distribution, and 
lenders, what is APIFIMA’s 
(Financière du Mali/ 
Professional Association of 
Financial Intermediation in 
Mali) value as an intermediary 
between beneficiaries and the 
banks? 

Data Sources 

•  G-Force 
•  Nièta Conseil   
•  Planète Distribution 
•  Banque Malienne de 

Solidarité (BMS) Mopti 
•  Producer Organizations 
(FDRY & FUSCOCYN) 

•  CVC Quarterly, annual & 

final reports 

•  CVC Success stories 

•  Cereal Dealers (Moulaye 

Sountoura, Badian 
Doumbia) 

•  Groupement des 

Commerçants Mil Sorgho 
du Mali (GCMS)  

•  Agro Dealers 

(DUNKAFA, Camara 
Semance) 

•  CVC Quarterly, annual & 

final reports 

•  CVC Mid Term 

Evaluation report 

•  CVC Success stories 
•  Planète Distribution 
•  Banque Nationale pour le 

Développement de 
l’Agriculture (BNDA) 
•  SORO YIRIWASO (a 

microfinance institution) 

•  Banque Malienne de 

Solidarité (BMS) Mopti 
•  Producer Organizations 
(FDRY & FUSCOCYN, 
etc.) 

•  G-Force 
•  Nièta Conseil 
•  DRA Sikasso & Mopti 
•  CMDT Sikasso 
•  CVC Quarterly, annual & 

final reports 

•  CVC Success stories 

Data 

Analysis 
Method 
- 

Data 

Collection 
Method 

Please include 
quantitative 
and qualitative 
methods 

- 

Please include 
quantitative 
and qualitative 
methods 

Please include 
qualitative 
methods 

- 

47 

Outcome 
Measures 
Please include 
measure and 
or indicator(s) 

Evaluation Questions 

In what ways, if any, did the 
mentoring activity affect 
women’s ability to successfully 
pursue their professional goals? 
To what extent do women feel 
their voices are heard in mixed 
gender POs after completing 
the mentoring program? 

Data Sources 

•  Mentors (Ms. Askofaré 
Ouleymatou Tamboura, 
M. Yaya Diallo, Kané 
Nana Sanou, Diallo 
Assetou Traoré)  

•  Mentees (Chata Sangaré, 

Fanta Bah)  

•  CVC Quarterly, annual & 

final reports 

•  CVC Success stories 

Data 

Collection 
Method 

Please include 
qualitative 
methods 

Data 

Analysis 
Method 
- 

Evaluation matrix for L4G evaluation 
The illustrative evaluation matrix provides some examples of how some evaluation question might be 
answered but the Evaluation Team should demonstrate its expertise by proposing data collection and 
analysis that is best fitted and specific to each L4G evaluation question. USAID/Mali and the L4G may 
facilitate introductions and meetings with some of the proposed data sources. 

Evaluation Questions 

To what extent do the trained 
auxiliaries continue to engage in 
activities that improve animal 
health in their villages? Are 
vaccines available in the villages 
of auxiliaries trained by SVPPs? 

From the beneficiaries’ 
perspective, did their access to 
the co-located introduction of 
new fattening technologies and a 
vaccination programming 
improve beneficiary’s 
productivity, access markets, and 
incomes? How did the co-
location contribute to the 
improvements? 
How has the presence of water 
management systems impacted 
the relationship/cohabitation 
between users?  

Outcome 
Measures 
Please include 
measure and or 
indicator(s) 

Please include 
measure and or 
indicator(s) 

Please include 
measure and or 
indicator(s) 

Data Sources 

•  Auxiliaries 
•  Veterinarians 
•  Livestock farmers 
•  L4G quarterly, annual and 

final reports 

•  Success stories 
• 

IP internal assessments 
and studies 

•  Beneficiaries of co-located 

programming 

•  L4G quarterly, annual and 

final reports 

•  Success stories 
• 

IP internal assessments 
and studies 

•  Users of water 

management systems 

•  Water point management 

committees 

•  Livestock buyers 

organizations 

•  L4G quarterly, annual and 

final reports 

•  Success stories 
• 

IP internal assessments 
and studies 

Data 

Analysis 
Method 
- 

- 

- 

Data 

Collection 
Method 
Please 
include 
quantitative 
and 
qualitative 
methods 

Please 
include 
qualitative 
methods 

Please 
include 
qualitative 
methods 

48 

Evaluation Questions 

How effectively are the water 
management systems meeting the 
needs of the users? 

Outcome 
Measures 
Please include 
measure and or 
indicator(s) 

 

 

Data Sources 

•  Users of water 

management systems 

•  Water point management 

committees 

•  Livestock buyers 

organizations 

•  Secondary data sources 

on water 
availability/scarcity 

•  L4G quarterly, annual and 

final reports 

•  Success stories 
• 

IP internal assessments 
and studies 

Data 

Analysis 
Method 
- 

Data 

Collection 
Method 
Please 
include 
quantitative 
and 
qualitative 
methods 

49 

V. TEAM COMPOSITION 
The evaluation team assembled shall include technical and evaluation specialists. The ET shall propose at 
least three key personnel, including a Senior Team Leader. For all key personnel, preference will be given 
to  Malian  or  African  nationals.  All  key  personnel  must  have  experience  in  their  field  and  in  Africa, 
preferably  in  Mali  or  the  Sahel.  The  contractor  is  expected  to  leverage  proposed  key  staff  for  both 
evaluations where applicable, particularly the senior team leader. 
SENIOR TEAM LEADER 
The Senior Team Leader will be responsible for leading the team both administratively and technically. 
The Senior Team Leader must have extensive evaluation experience of large scale development activities 
in Africa. S/he will be responsible for ensuring timely submission of deliverables and the main point of 
contact for USAID. S/he should: 

•  Be  able  to  demonstrate  technical  expertise,  skills  and  experience  in  evaluating  agriculture 

programs using robust mixed-method evaluation designs, preferably including: 

o  Designing qualitative and quantitative data collection tools and protocols 
o  Collecting and analyzing qualitative and quantitative data 
o  Analyzing gender questions in agricultural settings in Francophone West Africa 
o  Analyzing sustainability in agricultural settings in Francophone West Africa 
o  Have experience evaluating activities related to at least 2 of these areas: 

Livestock value chains, 

-  Cereals value chains, 
- 
-  Cereal production, 
- 
-  Agricultural finance. 

Livestock production, 

•  Hold  at  minimum  of  a  Master’s  degree  in  evaluation/research  methodology,  social  science, 

agriculture or other relevant field. 

•  Have  a  minimum  of  10  years  of  progressively  responsible  experience  in  the  evaluation  of 

development programs. This should include a team leader role in at least two evaluations. 

•  Be willing and able to work in Mali for as required by the workplan, to include travel within Mali 

as permitted by the security situation, 

•  Possess professional proficiency to speak and write in both French and English 
•  Possess outstanding communication skills, with proven experience interacting effectively with a 
broad range of internal and external partners, including international organizations, host country 
government officials, and NGO counterparts. 

•  Preferably have experience leading an evaluation of a USAID activity. 

OTHER KEY PERSONNEL 
Additionally, the following skills and experience should be present to some extent within the additional 
key personnel (USAID suggests limiting key personnel to 5 or less): 

•  A minimum of a Master’s degree in a field relevant for the evaluations (international development, 

livestock, agriculture, agribusiness, agricultural economics, or a related field) 

•  At least 5 years of experience with Malian livestock and cereal activities 
•  Experience in veterinary medicine, animal health, animal production, animal husbandry or related 

•  A minimum of 5 years working on development activities or evaluations in West Africa, preferably 

fields 

in Mali 

50 

•  A minimum of 5 years of progressively responsible experience in the evaluation of development 

programs including: 

o  Designing qualitative and quantitative data collection tools and protocols 
o  Collecting and analyzing qualitative and quantitative data 
o  Analyzing gender questions in agricultural settings in Francophone West Africa 
o  Analyzing sustainability in agricultural settings in Francophone West Africa 

•  Presenting to a professional audience, facilitating learning events and training data collectors 
•  Excellent knowledge and experience in the use of a quantitative software such as SPSS, Epi Info, 

STATA, or SAS (as relevant if required by proposed evaluation design) 

•  Experience in the use of qualitative analysis software such as Atlast.ti, NVivo, or MAXQDA (as 

relevant when required by proposed evaluation design) 

•  Ability to program tablet based data collection software (as relevant when required by proposed 

evaluation design) 

VI. Logistics and Security 
Logistics 
The contractor shall be responsible for organizing transport and lodging for evaluation team members and 
providing other logistical support for core evaluation team staff and data collection teams. Infrastructure 
in Mali is not very developed and quality of roads declines outside of Bamako. Internet access may also be 
limited in certain regions. The evaluation design should take these things into consideration and explicitly 
detail how the contractor plans to deal with these challenges. 
Security Arrangement 
The contractor should be aware of the security situation in Mali and should propose an evaluation design 
that takes this situation into consideration. The contractor should also present a clear plan to deal with 
anticipated security challenges, including the proposed plan to address inaccessibility of data collection 
areas. USAID will not take responsibility for making security arrangement for the contractor but requires 
the contractor submit an outline of their anticipated security arrangements to ensure the safety of all team 
members and data collectors. 
 

 

51 

ANNEX  2:  FIELDWORK  SCHEDULE  OF  FOCUS  GROUP  DISCUSSIONS  AND  KEY 
INFORMANT INTERVIEWS 

Date 

Region/Circle 

Commune 

Village 

10/14 

Mopti/Koro 

10/15 

Mopti/Koro 

Koro 

Koro 

10/16 

Mopti/Koro 

Pel-Maoude 

Koro 

Koro Center and 
Tere 
Pel-Maoude 

10/17 
10/19 

Mopti/Koro 
Mopti/Bankass 

Koporoma 
Bankass 

Koporoma 
Bankass Center  

10/20 

Mopti/Bankass 

Dimbal-Habee 

Logon 

10/21 

Mopti/Bandiagara 

Dandoli 

Dandoli 

10/22 
10/23 
10/24 
10/26 

Mopti/Mopti 
Mopti/Djenné 
Mopti/Mopti 
Mopti/Bankass 

10/27 

Mopti/Bankass 

10/29 

Timbuktu/Diré 

Socoura 
Fakala 
Mopti 
Mopti 

Kani-Bozon 
Bourem Sidi 
Amar 

Gnimitongo 
Sofara 
Mopti Center 
Mopti Center 

Ende Toro 

PO 

VAs and Water 
Point 
Committee 
Moni-Ire and 
Bire-Ire 
Femmes de Pel 
Maoude 
Amokogo/ 
Yakene 
- 
Hommes de 
Logon/Femmes 
de Logon 
Maison Familiale 
and Yam 
Girobolo 
Toumo 
Coop Kossou 
Plateforme de 
Juenes 
- 
VAs 
Amaigre and PO 
Yerin 

Purpose 

FGDs  

KIIs and 
FGD 
FGD 

FGD 
KIIs 

FGDs 

FGDs 

FGD 
FGD  
KIIs 
FGD and 
KIIs 
FGD 

Bourem Sidi Amar  Waivo Goroben 

FGD 

10/29 

Mopti/Bankass 

Bankass 

Bankass Center 

10/30 
10/31 
11/2 

Timbuktu/Diré 
Timbuktu/Goundam 
Timbuktu/Niafunké 

Tindirma 
Tonka 
Soboundo 

Tindirma 
Tonka 
Sibonne 

 

 

Water Point 
Committee of 
Tori/PO Tori 
Falane 
Mandiara 
Coop de 
Sibonne 

FGD 

FGD 
FGD 
FGD 

52 

ANNEX 3: FOCUS GROUP DISCUSSION AND KEY INFORMANT INTERVIEW GUIDES 
Focus Group Discussion Guide for L4G Farmers 
1.  Please tell us something about your animals: 

•  What animals do you keep and how many? 
•  What diseases do your animals suffer from by type and how common are they? 

2.  Do you have your animals vaccinated and who does it? 

•  How often do you like to have your animals vaccinated? 
•  Do you know the diseases that are prevented by vaccination? 
•  Which animal types do you vaccinate and when did you last do it? 
•  Who did the vaccination? Was this given by the SVPP veterinarian or someone else? 
•  Were there enough doses of vaccines to vaccinate all your animals? All the animals in the village? 
•  What is the charge for vaccinating your animals? 
•  Do you see a difference in the health of your animals from the vaccinations? What is different 
•  Were there any problems with the vaccination program that you can tell us about? 
•  How could the vaccination programs be improved? 

3.  Do you have a trained auxiliary that helps you in this village? 

Is the auxiliary still coming as often as before? 

•  When did this auxiliary first start helping you here? 
• 
•  How often is he here in this village to help you? And when during the year? 
•  What does the AE do specifically to help you? 
•  How important to you is having the auxiliary help you in this village? 
•  How  often  does  the  private  veterinarian  (SVPP)  come  here  and  what  does  he  do  besides 

vaccinations? 

4.  How can they improve the vaccination program? 
5.  Do you fatten your animals? 

•  Did you learn about fattening through training in the Farmer Field School (FFS) in your village? 
•  When did this occur, how long did this training last, and who taught you? 
•  Did you learn some totally new techniques for fattening your animals in the FFS? 
•  Which specific techniques do you now use that you did not use before this training? 
•  Which of these new techniques have had the most fattening effect on your animals? 
•  Are you fattening more animals since the FFS training? How many more? 
•  How much time do you spend now to fatten various animal types? Which months by type? 
•  Are these fattening periods as long as period the training and new techniques? 
•  Do you now earn more money selling fattened animals than before the training? Can you estimate 

about how much more for different animal types? 

53 

•  How do you think the fattening training in the FFS could be improved? 
•  Do they ask you to pass the knowledge on to other people? How could they reach more people? 
•  How could they improve what is taught? Should they introduce new topics or teach them in a 

different way? 

6.  Are there livestock dealers (collectors, wholesalers, merchants) to whom you can sell in 

the markets? 
•  Give a description of the different types of livestock dealers. 
•  Have you made contact with these dealers to provide them with specific quantities of your offtake? 

54 

Focus Group Discussion Guide for Water Point Management Committees 
1.  When did your new water point begin to function? 
2.  How many members are in your committee and how were members chosen? 
3.  Where did this area get its water previously? For animals and for households? 
4.  How long did it take to obtain your water previously compared to now? 
5.  Who are the various users using this water source? 

•  How many people are using this water point now? 
•  How far do the farthest users live? 
• 

Is this water point supplying all the surrounding communities’ needs? If not, why not? 

6.  Are there any conflicts between various users? Please describe. 

•  Are there any conflicts between animal and household needs? Please describe. 
•  What rules have you set up to regulate water sharing for animals and household needs? 
•  Do the users obey the rules and how does the committee resolve these conflicts? 

7.  What should be improved in water use in your village? 
 

 

55 

L4G Key Informant Interview Guide: Government Officials 
Lead In: We are here to ask you a few questions about the Livestock for Growth program sponsored in 
Mali as part of the Feed the Future program of the U.S. Government. We are trying to understand certain 
parts of the program and how it has benefited farmers and their livestock. 
1.   Could you briefly tell us about your role as _____[Title]____? 
2.  Are you familiar with the L4G program? 

a.  How do you know about it? 
b.  What do you think overall of the program, briefly? 

3.  [For Government officials responsible for vaccination] What are the barriers to achieving 

full vaccination of animals in Mopti (and/or Timbuktu)? 

4.  Do  you  know  about  the  part  of  the  program  that  uses  veterinary  auxiliaries  to  visit 

villages and help the veterinarians? 
a.  Do you think that is helping to increase vaccination rates? 
b.  What could be improved with this part of L4G? 

5.  Are you familiar with the Farmer Field Schools sponsored by L4G [may need to explain 

Is this program helping farmers improve their livestock health? 

this]? 
a. 
b.  Are more healthy animals being sent to market? 
c.  How has this occurred? 
d.  What are the barriers to getting animals fattened and to market here? 

6.  Is it helpful to have the Farmer Field Schools and the veterinary auxiliaries co-located in 

the same villages? 
a.  Why? How does it help? 

7.  Are you familiar with the improvements in water points as part of L4G? 

a.  Are you familiar with the water point management committees in certain villages? 
b.  Are these committees a good way to manage the water? 
c.  How do they help, in your opinion? 

8.  Wrap up question: What further advice can you give to improve the L4G programs?  

a.  Do you think they should expand to other parts of Mali? 
b.  How should they change the program if they do expand it? 

 

 

56 

L4G Key Informant Interview Guide: Private Veterinarians (SVPPs) 
Lead In: We are here to ask you a few questions about the Livestock for Growth program sponsored in 
Mali as part of the Feed the Future program of the U.S. Government. We are trying to understand certain 
parts of the program and how it has benefited farmers and their livestock. 
1.   Could you briefly tell us about your job as a private veterinarian here in Koro (Bankass)? 

a.  Where is your office? 
b.  How much of your time was spent on the L4G program activities? 
c.  What did you do for the program? 
d.  Have you continued in that role, and, if so, who reimburses you? 

2.  What did you do to train the veterinary auxiliaries? 

a.  What did you train them to do? 
b.  Where did you train them? 
c.  How did you supervise them? 
d.  What do you think overall of the program, briefly? 
e.  Did the program increase vaccination rates? How much? 
f.  What could be improved with this part of L4G? 

3.  Are you familiar with the Farmer Field Schools sponsored by L4G [may need to explain 

Is this program helping farmers improve their livestock health? 

this]? 
a. 
b.  Are more healthy animals being sent to market? 
c.  How has this occurred? 
d.  What are the barriers to getting animals fattened and to market here? 

4.  Is it helpful to have the Farmer Field Schools and the veterinary auxiliaries co-located in 

the same villages? 
a.  Why? How does it help? 

5.  Wrap up question: What further advice can you give to improve the L4G programs? 

a.  Do you think they should expand to other parts of Mali? 
b.  How should they change the program if they do expand it? 

57 

L4G Key Informant Interview Guide: Other 
Lead In: We are here to ask you a few questions about the Livestock for Growth program sponsored in 
Mali as part of the Feed the Future program of the U.S. Government. We are trying to understand certain 
parts of the program and how it has benefited farmers and their livestock. 
[Note: Depending on who you are interviewing, you should tailor the questions to the person’s 
job/role, and what they may know about.] 
1.   Could you briefly tell us about your role as _____[Title]____? 
2.  Are you familiar with the L4G program [may need to explain it]? 

a.  How do you know about it? 
b.  What do you think overall of the program, briefly? 

3.  From your perspective, what are the barriers to achieving full vaccination of animals in 

Mopti (and/or Timbuktu)? 

4.  Do  you  know  about  the  part  of  the  program  that  uses  veterinary  auxiliaries  to  visit 

villages and help the veterinarians? 
a.  Do you think that is helping to increase vaccination rates? 
b.  What could be improved with this part of L4G? 

5.  Are you familiar with the Farmer Field Schools sponsored by L4G [may need to explain 

Is this program helping farmers improve their livestock health? 

this]? 
a. 
b.  Are more healthy animals being sent to market? 
c.  How has this occurred? 
d.  What are the barriers to getting animals fattened and to market here? 

6.  Is it helpful to have the Farmer Field Schools and the veterinary auxiliaries co-located in 

the same villages? 
a.  Why? How does it help? 

7.  Are you familiar with the improvements in water points as part of L4G? 

a.  Are you familiar with the water point management committees in certain villages? 
b.  Are these committees a good way to manage the water? 
c.  How do they help, in your opinion? 

8.  Wrap up question: What further advice can you give to improve the L4G programs? 

a.  Do you think they should expand to other parts of Mali? 
b.  How should they change the program if they do expand it? 

 

 

58 

ANNEX 4: LIST OF DOCUMENTS REVIEWED 
1.  L4G Quarterly Reports, AECOM/DT Global: Quarters 1-3, Fiscal Years 2014-2018 and Q 1-2, FY 

2019. 

2.  L4G Annual Reports, AECOM/DT Global: Fiscal Years 2015-2019. 
3.  Other AECOM/DT Global Reports: 

a.  Mali Livestock for Growth (L4G) Gender Analysis, February 2015. 
b.  USAID Mali Livestock for Growth Program (L4G) Baseline Data Study Final Report, September, 

2015. 

c.  The Implementation Areas of the Livestock for Growth Program: Analysis and Classification of 
Constraints and Actions of Priority: Report of the August 12-13, 2015 Workshop in Bamako, 
November 2015. 

4.  Other Reports Prepared for DT Global (as background for Final Report) 

a.  Mali Livestock for Growth (L4G) Final Survey Report: Survey and Focus Group Discussion Data 

and Analysis, by International Business & Technical Consultants, Inc., no date. 

b.  High Level Analysis of Livestock-owning Households in Target Communities Before and During 

L4G Activities, prepared by Fraym, no date. 

c.  High-level Analysis of Animal Health in Target Communities Before and During L4G Activities, 

prepared by Fraym, no date. 

d.  The Security Context in Target Communities During L4G Activities, prepared by Fraym, no date. 
e.  Ruminant Livestock Fattening under L4G: Findings of a Sample Survey and Recommendations for 

Future Programming, prepared by John S. Holtzman and Seydou Sidibé, September 2019. 

 

 

59 

ANNEX 5: DISCLOSURE OF CONFLICTS OF INTEREST 
 

 

60 

 

61 

 

62 

 

63 

 

64 

 

65 

[ • VAs should be assisted with start-up funds to acquire their first stock of supplies and transportation. 0 • Future livestock activities should increase th... , the same type closer to more villages, involving more people in the training, and extending the length of 0 the training in each case. These recommendatio... 1 would presumably extend the geographic coverag... 2 in FFS training addresses the risk of knowledg... 3 their cascading role or are unable to grasp th... 4 others. In other words, the number initially t... 5 need for subsequent cascade training reduced. ... 6 per diem for the FFS training and the lack of ... 7 “entirely inadequate.” This issue clearly limi... 8 According to PO members, the plan for cascadin... , • L4G donated animal feed, seed for forage, dual-use crops, and materials for making licking blocks, 0 NaN which permitted more FFS beneficiaries to fatt... 1 NaN had great difficulty using the new fattening t... 2 • Stock raisers and animal fatteners overwhelmin... 3 NaN by greater and faster weight gain and reduced ... 4 NaN from shortening fattening cycles, and an incre... 5 NaN However, outcomes in these areas fell sharply ... 6 • The cascading training model used by L4G was s... 7 NaN participants in cascade training sessions. Nev... 8 NaN villages, since all PO members met seemed equa... 9 NaN techniques. 10 • The state technical services in charge of anim... , Region Male Female Youth Total Unnamed: 0 0 NaN NaN NaN NaN NaN Number 1 NaN NaN NaN NaN NaN of FGDs 2 Co-Located - - - - - 3 Mopti/Koro 0 26 14 40 5 4 Mopti/Bankass 13 31 NaN 44 5 5 Non Co-Located - - - - - 6 Mopti/Bandiagara 8 8 - 16 2 7 Mopti/Mopti 5 6 - 11 1 8 Mopti/Djenné - - 9 9 1 9 Timbuktu/Diré 5 11 - 16 2 10 Timbuktu/Goundam 4 6 - 10 1 11 Timbuktu/Niafunké 8 - - 8 1 12 Total 43 88 23 154 18, Name Title Organization 0 Government Representatives NaN 1 Oumar Din President Koro circle 2 Issa Coulibaly Chief of Veterinary Service Koro circle 3 Issa Sagara First Deputy to Mayor Koro circle 4 NaN Local Service of Animal 5 Hamidou Dougnon Chief of Services Production and Industries 6 NaN (SLPIA), Koro circle 7 Advisor for Rural Development, Regional Mamado... NaN 8 Regional Directorate for Animal Production Ham... NaN 9 Jean Baptiste Traore Director for Veterinary S... Mopti region 10 Moussa Maiga Chief of Veterinary Service Bankass circle 11 Hama Sy First Deputy to Mayor Bankass circle 12 Kaleb Tessougue and Mr. First Vice President a... NaN 13 Bankass circle Soumbougou Circle Council NaN 14 Youssef Traore Head of Pasture Resources SLPIA, Bankass circle 15 Abdul Aziz Traore Director of Hydraulic Services Bankass circle 16 NGO Sector Representative NaN 17 NaN International Livestock 18 Housseyni Kokena Project Supervisor Research Institute 19 NaN (ILRI)/Mopti 20 Private Veterinarians Contracted with L4G (SVPPs) NaN 21 Laya Togo SVPP Bankass District 22 Hamidou Sokonda SVPP Bankass District 23 Former L4G Staff NaN 24 Thomas Herlehy Senior Program Manager Advisor ... DT Global 25 Izza Soubiane Data Manager DT Global 26 Jean Poudiougo Former L4G Field Agent DT Global/Mopti, 2016-2017 Type of Vaccine 2015-2016 Unnamed: 0 Unnamed: 1 0 Bankass Koro Total Bankass Koro Total 1 Contagious Cattle Pneumonia 36,266 4,327 40,593 78,283 85,081 163,364 2 Cattle Pasteurollosis 24,910 17,000 41,910 65,154 23,366 88,520 3 Sheep/Goat Pasteurollosis 82,534 38,645 121,179 166,628 40,490 207,568 4 Total 143,710 59,972 203,682 310,065 148,937 459,452, Type of Positive Impression Number of Mentions 0 Learning about how to improve animal health 14 1 More ready access to veterinary services 7 2 Higher number of animals vaccinated 3 3 Fewer animal deaths due to vaccines 8 4 Greater payment flexibility 3, Type of Challenge Number of Mentions 0 Cost of vaccinations 3 1 Theft of herds or insecurity at vaccination ca... 2 2 Lack of vaccines available 1 3 Lack of quality vaccine 1 4 Vaccines not located in close proximity 1, Unnamed: 0 Unnamed: 1 Number of VAs Number of VAs.1 Unnamed: 2 0 NaN NaN NaN NaN Number of VAs 1 NaN Circle NaN NaN NaN 2 NaN NaN Trained Operating NaN 3 NaN NaN NaN NaN Working with SVPP 4 NaN NaN NaN NaN Vets 5 Bankass NaN 49 12 12 6 Koro NaN 27 15 6 7 Total NaN 76 27 18, • In order to increase population access to vaccines and medicines, future activities should support 0 NaN private veterinarians and VAs by equipping new... 1 NaN medicines, and thermos-tolerant vaccines. This... 2 NaN L4G deteriorates. Maintaining the cold chain i... 3 NaN care and vaccination campaigns in Mali. If sta... 4 NaN necessary, whether by USAID or through a colla... 5 • Credit linkages between SVPPs and local banks ... 6 NaN activities. Contacts with banks were initiate... 7 NaN through. The private veterinarians need to fin... 8 NaN conditions can reimburse these bank loans. Of ... 9 NaN agriculturalists, but with a return to securit... 10 NaN conditions, alternative credit sources should ... 11 • With its experience in financial intermediatio... 12 NaN Intermediation of Mali (APIFIMA) could be call... 13 NaN veterinarians and provide advice in reimbursem... 14 NaN for its own agents. This should be a part of a... 15 NaN sector. 16 • At the same time, VAs should be assisted with ... , Type of Skill Learned Number of Mentions 0 How to grow and improve fodder 17 1 Fattening techniques (i.e., timing of fattening) 17 2 Estimating weight of animals 7 3 Marketing techniques and contracts 7 4 Calculating profits 7 5 Ability to fatten more heads 15, Unnamed: 0 Unnamed: 1 Number ... Unnamed: 3 Unnamed: 4 Unnamed: 5 0 NaN NaN NaN ... NaN NaN NaN 1 Type of Number of NaN ... NaN NaN NaN 2 NaN NaN NaN ... Average Sales Gross Margin Percent 3 Animal Enterprises NaN ... NaN NaN NaN 4 NaN NaN of ... NaN NaN NaN 5 NaN NaN Livestock ... NaN NaN NaN 6 NaN NaN NaN ... NaN NaN NaN 7 NaN NaN NaN ... Price (CFAF (CFAF Increase 8 NaN NaN NaN ... NaN NaN NaN 9 NaN NaN NaN ... thousands) thousands) in Value 10 Cattle 21 182 ... 304.3 135.5 80% 11 Sheep 33 216 ... 77.8 41.6 115% [12 rows x 7 columns], Unnamed: 0 Increased Prices in CFAF 0 POs/Circles (Thousands) 1 NaN Cattle Sheep 2 NaN Co-Located Circles/Mopti 3 PO 1 -- 10-50 4 PO 2 75-100 25 5 PO 3 -- 10-15 6 PO 4 -- 25-35 7 PO 5 25-50 5-20 8 Non Co-Located Circles/Mopti NaN 9 PO 1 50-100 30-60 10 PO 2 100-125 5-20 11 Non Co-Located Circles/Timbuktu NaN 12 PO 1 -- 30-60 13 PO 2 75-90 30-50 14 PO 3 100 10-50 15 PO 4 100-150 30-50, Unnamed: 0 Goats Sheep Cattle 0 Total selling livestock 47 391 115 1 Total who made more money 42 351 104 2 Percent who made more 89.4% 89.8% 90.4%, Unnamed: 0 Number Percent 0 Yes, it made a difference 302 56.1 1 No, it did not 236 43.9 2 Total 538 100.0, Indicator Unnamed: 0 ... Unnamed: 3 Unnamed: 4 0 NaN Baseline ... NaN NaN 1 NaN (2014) ... NaN NaN 2 NaN NaN ... FY 2017 FY 2018 3 Gross Margin: Cattle5* $40 ... $156 $288 4 Gross Margin: Sheep* $33 ... $27 $47 5 Value of Incremental Sales: Cattle* - ... $1,038,091 $1,656,264 6 Value of Incremental Sales: Sheep* - ... $703,008 $843,649 7 Value of Exports: Cattle* $781,257 ... $735,041 $737,447 8 Value of Exports: Sheep* $417,453 ... $353,948 $0 9 Offtake Rate: Cattle6** 14.5% ... 34.9% 83.1% 10 Offtake Rate: Small Ruminants** 19.9% ... 36.9% 71.1% [11 rows x 6 columns], Shock to Livelihood 2014 (%) 2017 (%) 0 Drought 51 56 1 Violence and Conflict 8 2 2 Illness and Accident 7 7 3 High Food Prices 5 13, Characteristics Tori Village Koro Center 0 Number of Members 8 16 (8 active) 1 Initiation Date February 2017 December 2018 2 Chosen by the mayor’s office in Method of Member NaN 3 Chosen by the mayor’s office Selection consul... NaN 4 village chief NaN 5 Membership Criteria Literate and resident of v... Not specified 6 First come, first served (exception for Rule f... NaN 7 elders) elders) 8 Type of Use For home use and for animals For home use and for animals 9 Per bucket: 5 CFAF; Per cow: 25 CFAF; Fees Per... NaN 10 CFAF; Per sheep: 5 CFAF Per sheep: 10 CFAF 11 80% to the mayor’s office for general NaN 12 use of the commune; 20% for 3% to mayor’s office (currently under 13 dispute); remainder for committee to Use of Wa... NaN 14 and to pay the guardian of the pump maintain infrastructure and to pay the 15 who collects fees. This is clearly not guardian of the pump who collects fees 16 sufficient to sustain the water point. NaN, 1. ... Cereal Value Chain (CVC) 0 2.0 ... AID-688-C-13-00002 1 3.0 ... October 17, 2013 October 16, 2 NaN ... 2018 3 4.0 ... NaN 4 NaN ... NaN 5 NaN ... $24,971,628 6 5.0 ... NaN 7 NaN ... NaN 8 NaN ... ACDI/VOCA 9 6.0 ... NaN 10 NaN ... NaN 11 NaN ... Amadou Diane [12 rows x 4 columns], Unnamed: 0 Deadline for Completion With 0 Evaluation Deliverable Respect to Contract Start Date 1 NaN Responsible 2 NaN (CSD) 3 NaN Party 4 Work Assignment Kickoff Meeting(s) within 5 business days of CSD PEEL 5 Draft concept note within 15 business days of CSD ET 6 USAID review of concept note within 20 business days of CSD USAID 7 Final concept note within 35 business days of CSD ET 8 Evaluation Design Protocol and Draft Data Coll... NaN 9 ET Tools within 50 business days of CSD 10 Written feedback on the Evaluation Design Prot... NaN 11 USAID and Draft Data Collection Tools within 55 business days of CSD 12 In-brief Meeting within 60 business days of CSD ET 13 Data Collection Pretest within 65 business days of CSD ET 14 within 70 business days of CSD and Final Data ... ET before the beginning of field testing 15 Complete Data Collection within 100 business days of CSD ET 16 Draft Evaluation Report and Brief within 160 business days of CSD ET 17 Data Set and Supporting Documents within 160 business days of CSD ET, Unnamed: 0 Deadline for Completion With 0 Evaluation Deliverable Respect to Contract Start Date 1 NaN Responsible 2 NaN (CSD) 3 NaN Party 4 Written feedback to the Draft Evaluation Repor... NaN 5 USAID Brief within 175 business days of CSD 6 Final Report and Brief within 190 days of CSD ET 7 Additional comments or approval within 195 business days of CSD USAID 8 Draft Infographic within 200 days of CSD ET 9 Final Infographic for Dissemination of Evaluat... NaN 10 ET to Stakeholders within 212 days of CSD 11 Publication on DEC within 230 days of CSD ET 12 Data submission to DDL within 230 days of CSD ET, Evaluation Questions Unnamed: 0 ... Unnamed: 3 Unnamed: 4 0 NaN Outcome ... NaN NaN 1 NaN NaN ... Data Data 2 NaN Measures ... NaN NaN 3 NaN NaN ... Collection Analysis 4 NaN NaN ... Method Method 5 To what extent have the Please include ... Please include - 6 Community Agrobusiness measure and ... quantitative NaN 7 Teams (CATs) continued their or indicator(s) ... and qualitative NaN 8 capacity building and NaN ... methods NaN 9 networking since the end of NaN ... NaN NaN 10 the CVC activity? NaN ... NaN NaN 11 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 12 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 13 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 14 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 15 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN [16 rows x 6 columns], The proposal should be specific and name each method used, the reason to use it and the data sources 0 for each method. For example, what is meant by... 1 selection of its participants and why would Fo... 2 Discussion or a Key Informant Interview for a ... 3 All quantitative data should be collected digi... , Evaluation Questions 0 Evaluation Questions, Evaluation Questions ... Unnamed: 5 0 Evaluation Questions ... NaN 1 NaN ... NaN 2 NaN ... NaN 3 In what ways, if any, did CVC’s\rprivate secto... ... NaN 4 To what extent were Producer\rOrganizations (P... ... NaN 5 From the perspective of POs,\rPlanète Distribu... ... NaN [6 rows x 11 columns], Outcome\rMeasures 0 NaN 1 NaN, Data Sources 0 Data Sources, Unnamed: 0 Unnamed: 1 ... Data Data.1 0 Evaluation Questions NaN ... NaN NaN 1 NaN Outcome ... NaN NaN 2 NaN Measures ... NaN NaN 3 NaN NaN ... Collection Analysis 4 NaN NaN ... Method Method 5 In what ways, if any, did the Please include ... Please include - 6 mentoring activity affect measure and ... qualitative NaN 7 women’s ability to successfully or indicator(s) ... methods NaN 8 pursue their professional goals? NaN ... NaN NaN 9 To what extent do women feel NaN ... NaN NaN 10 their voices are heard in mixed NaN ... NaN NaN 11 gender POs after completing NaN ... NaN NaN 12 the mentoring program? NaN ... NaN NaN 13 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 14 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN [15 rows x 6 columns], Evaluation Questions Unnamed: 0 ... Unnamed: 3 Unnamed: 4 0 NaN Outcome ... NaN NaN 1 NaN NaN ... Data Data 2 NaN Measures ... NaN NaN 3 NaN NaN ... Collection Analysis 4 NaN NaN ... Method Method 5 To what extent do the trained Please include ... Please - 6 auxiliaries continue to engage in measure and or ... include NaN 7 activities that improve animal indicator(s) ... quantitative NaN 8 health in their villages? Are NaN ... and NaN 9 vaccines available in the villages NaN ... qualitative NaN 10 of auxiliaries trained by SVPPs? NaN ... methods NaN 11 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 12 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 13 From the beneficiaries’ Please include ... Please - 14 perspective, did their access to measure and or ... include NaN 15 the co-located introduction of indicator(s) ... qualitative NaN 16 new fattening technologies and a NaN ... methods NaN 17 vaccination programming NaN ... NaN NaN 18 improve beneficiary’s NaN ... NaN NaN 19 productivity, access markets, and NaN ... NaN NaN 20 incomes? How did the co- NaN ... NaN NaN 21 location contribute to the NaN ... NaN NaN 22 improvements? NaN ... NaN NaN 23 How has the presence of water Please include ... Please - 24 management systems impacted measure and or ... include NaN 25 the relationship/cohabitation indicator(s) ... qualitative NaN 26 between users? NaN ... methods NaN 27 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 28 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 29 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 30 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 31 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 32 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 33 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN [34 rows x 6 columns], Evaluation Questions Unnamed: 0 ... Unnamed: 3 Unnamed: 4 0 NaN Outcome ... NaN NaN 1 NaN NaN ... Data Data 2 NaN Measures ... NaN NaN 3 NaN NaN ... Collection Analysis 4 NaN NaN ... Method Method 5 How effectively are the water Please include ... Please - 6 management systems meeting the measure and or ... include NaN 7 needs of the users? indicator(s) ... quantitative NaN 8 NaN NaN ... and NaN 9 NaN NaN ... qualitative NaN 10 NaN NaN ... methods NaN 11 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 12 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 13 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 14 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 15 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 16 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 17 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN 18 NaN NaN ... NaN NaN [19 rows x 6 columns], Date Region/Circle Commune ... PO Purpose 0 NaN NaN ... VAs and Water NaN 1 10/14 Mopti/Koro Koro ... Point FGDs 2 NaN NaN ... Committee NaN 3 KIIs and 10/15 Mopti/Koro Koro ... Moni-Ire and NaN 4 NaN NaN ... Bire-Ire FGD 5 Femmes de Pel 10/16 Mopti/Koro Pel-Maoude ... FGD Maoude NaN 6 Amokogo/ 10/17 Mopti/Koro Koporoma ... FGD Yakene NaN 7 10/19 Mopti/Bankass Bankass ... - KIIs 8 NaN NaN ... Hommes de NaN 9 10/20 Mopti/Bankass Dimbal-Habee ... Logon/Femmes FGDs 10 NaN NaN ... de Logon NaN 11 NaN NaN ... Maison Familiale NaN 12 and Yam 10/21 Mopti/Bandiagara Dandoli ... FGDs Girobolo NaN 13 NaN NaN ... Toumo NaN 14 10/22 Mopti/Mopti Socoura ... Coop Kossou FGD 15 Plateforme de 10/23 Mopti/Djenné Fakala ... FGD Juenes NaN 16 10/24 Mopti/Mopti Mopti ... - KIIs 17 FGD and 10/26 Mopti/Bankass Mopti ... VAs NaN 18 NaN NaN ... NaN KIIs 19 Amaigre and PO 10/27 Mopti/Bankass Kani-Bozon ... FGD Yerin NaN 20 Bourem Sidi 10/29 Timbuktu/Diré FGD Amar ... Waivo Goroben NaN 21 NaN NaN ... Water Point NaN 22 10/29 Mopti/Bankass Bankass ... Committee of FGD 23 NaN NaN ... Tori/PO Tori NaN 24 10/30 Timbuktu/Diré Tindirma ... Falane FGD 25 10/31 Timbuktu/Goundam Tonka ... Mandiara FGD 26 Coop de 11/2 Timbuktu/Niafunké Soboundo ... FGD Sibonne NaN [27 rows x 5 columns], 2. Are you familiar with the L4G program [may need to explain it]? 0 NaN a. How do you know about it? 1 NaN b. What do you think overall of the program, b... 2 3.0 From your perspective, what are the barriers t... 3 NaN Mopti (and/or Timbuktu)? 4 4.0 Do you know about the part of the program that... 5 NaN villages and help the veterinarians? 6 NaN a. Do you think that is helping to increase va... 7 NaN b. What could be improved with this part of L4G? 8 5.0 Are you familiar with the Farmer Field Schools... 9 NaN this]? 10 NaN a. Is this program helping farmers improve the... 11 NaN b. Are more healthy animals being sent to market? 12 NaN c. How has this occurred? 13 NaN d. What are the barriers to getting animals fa... 14 6.0 Is it helpful to have the Farmer Field Schools... ]